Opening to the eternal spin-off of Poketopia: Unhinged post-finale (Beyond Cosmic Episodes)

This is a surreal and heartfelt spin-off of Pokétopia: Unhinged 1-4 series, featuring 6 Hourai-Immortals and 1 prisoner of Diavolo Death Loop forced to go along with them, all 7 are each unique Pokemons. You don't need to read the original quadrilogy to enjoy this, though fans will catch deeper meaning behind the illusions, legacy, and quiet grief hiding beneath the whimsy.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 1: Recap - And So the Loop Spirals Onward

This will recap events from "Poketopia: Unhinged 4 - It's About Life Types" (at Chapter 24-26).
You can enjoy this even without knowledge about the original quadrilogy of the 4 main stories.

-

Casts:

The Immortal Six (Touhou Hourai-Immortal style) :

Gardevoir (stuck in a policewoman uniform and pencil skirt):
The leader of the immortals. She serves as a police officer, detective, prison warden, engineer, and prophetic seer. She oversees the balance and justice within the immortal herd and is the most rational mind among them.

Alolan Ninetales (stuck in a light blue sundress):
A generator of cold and sculptor of ice. Often the comedic relief, she helps produce ice cubes, preserve ingredients, and add flair with her frozen artistry. Despite her elegance, she enjoys slapstick moments and lighthearted mischief.

Flareon (stuck in a fireproof butler uniform):
The ever-burning cook. He can now handle even poisonous ingredients with no concern, gracefully walks across lava, but remains weak to drowning. His cuisine is legendary, with flavor and heat matched only by his eternal dedication.

Vaporeon (stuck in a swimming maid uniform):
Flareon’s lifelong wife, beverage artisan, and personal lifeguard. She cools lava into obsidian when necessary and navigates all cool-to-warm liquids with ease. Her flowing presence balances Flareon’s fiery energy.

Lil Eve, the Eight-Element Eevee (stuck in a seifuku):
The biological daughter of Vaporeon and Flareon. A versatile all-rounder, she harnesses eight elemental abilities, six honoring the long-gone past, and two reflecting her immortal parents. Youthful, wise, and emotionally radiant.

Keldeo [non-Mythical] (stuck in a gakuran uniform):
Lil Eve’s boyfriend and chivalrous knight. Though based on a Mythical species, he is the child of two mortal Pokémon, Galarian Rapidash and Gastrier, which allowed him to achieve Hourai-style immortality. Courageous, fast, and dependable, he also serves as secondary lifeguard and planetary delivery knight. Keldeo carries the Regigigas Death Loop Tablet, visiting planet after planet as a gentle reminder of the price of selfish immortality.

Meanwhile...
Regigigas (the main villain of Poketopia: Unhinged 4 - It's About Life Types)...
...is eternally trapped within the Death Loop Tablet (themed in Arceus' colored case, a Jojo's Diavolo Death Loop but visible to others), where he must relive countless humiliating and painful deaths, forever smelling the delicious food and drinks made by Flareon and Vaporeon, unable to taste, move, or truly die. A poetic punishment for the one who dared to slay Arceus.

(Curious why they ended up like this? Poketopia: Unhinged 4 - It's About Life Types directly tells the events of it, but its trilogy of prequels also tells what leads them into this point as well...)

-

Recap, "And So the Loop Spirals Onward"

A million years had passed since the main events of Poketopia: Unhinged 4 - It's About Life Types (before Chapter 24). The world had evolved into something unrecognizably futuristic, yet the Immortal Six remained unchanged, eternal figures frozen in time.

Alolan Ninetales stood solemnly beside Mamoswine’s weathered grave, her fur glistening with ancient stardust. Gardevoir, her gown pristine even after eons, knelt at the twin graves of Lucario and Machamp. Not far away, nestled between Megagross’s dormant core and Jolteon’s final resting spot, lay the shared graves of Umbreon and Espeon. Flareon, the eternal butler, saluted with dignity, his flames dim but resolute.

At his side stood his immortal wife, the serene Vaporeon in eternal maid uniform, and their daughter, Lil Eve, still donning her ever-iconic seifuku, yet now grown. She wept silently at the graves of Sylveon, Glaceon, and Leafeon. Beside her, Keldeo, grown into an adult clad eternally in gakuran, bowed in deep respect to his mother, Galarian Rapidash, and the dignified grave of Gastrier, alongside the others of equine kind.

There were more graves than the stars cared to count, especially Tyranitar's and Tinkaton's grave, but the memories endured.

Keldeo and Lil Eve glanced at their seemingly infinite numbers of their descendants' graves, same for their siblings or Vaporeon's and Flareon's descendant's graves.

Together, the Immortal Six boarded the spacecraft, a vessel constructed by Gardevoir herself, with Hoopa’s final rings fused into its propulsion system. It could see the future like Delphox once did. Its resources were endless, sustained by cycles of water, fire, ice, and electricity.

They departed.

-

2 Billion Years Later

Still adrift in their uniforms, the Immortal Six voyaged across the galaxies. The Regigigas Death Loop tablet, gifted by Mewtwo, hummed quietly, its countdown frozen at 2.1 billion years remaining.

Vaporeon gently bridal-carried the sleeping Flareon, while Lil Eve mirrored her mother, cradling Keldeo as he dozed in weightless peace. Gardevoir and Alolan Ninetales steered the ship with practiced grace, their eyes tracing the quantum lattice of the cosmos.

An alert chimed.

A dimensional rift opened, another ship had entered their realm, piloted by futuristic humans. A human woman guided the vessel, firm yet curious. A human man barked orders with charm, only to turn smitten upon seeing Gardevoir. He reached toward her with admiration, only to be slapped lightly on the head by the woman. The room erupted in laughter, across species, across time.

The Death Loop tablet screamed once more.

Lil Eve calmly handed it to the startled human male. "Hold this for a while," she whispered with a sly grin.

As the two vessels docked in orbit over a lush, human-dominated world, a new journey awaited, not one of survival, but of strange companionship. Lil Eve nestled into the warmth of the human woman's gentle petting.

And with that, Poketopia: Unhinged came to a close.

Eternal life, a fiction. A comfort. A shock. A cosmic joke.
But above all... a story worth telling. 

-

[Scene: Outer colony planet, peaceful and bathed in sunset light. The Immortal Six walk together, their uniforms shimmering with age-defying grace.]

A lone human man from the futuristic dimension steps forward, sunglasses, obnoxious smirk, and way too confident for someone who has no idea who he’s dealing with.

Pervert:
“Woo-wee! Four beauties with a schoolgirl? Damn, where's your lucky charm, huh boys?”

Flareon exhales a puff of polite lava steam, raising an eyebrow without a word. Keldeo shifts, sighing like he’s seen this too many times. The women? Utterly unfazed, walking past like he’s just background noise in a 10,000-year-old opera.

Gardevoir (telepathically to the group):
“Is it really catcalling if your voice never reaches relevance?”

Then... a horrifying scream cuts through the calm like a rip in space.

Nearby, the Regigigas Death Loop Tablet pulses, Regigigas is being stabbed repeatedly by an artificial human woman built for poetic justice, each scream more unhinged than the last.

Regigigas:
“NOT AGAIN, IS THAT A SPORK?! PLEASE JUST GIVE ME A BREAK!”

The pervert looks on, jaw dropping in horror. The tablet flashes with each scream. Regigigas smells something delicious and sobs, “Flareon’s grilled curry again?” before getting stabbed anew.

Artificial Woman:
“Shut up and suffer, you lore-breaking hypocrite.”

The man trips, scrambling backward.

Pervert:
“O-okay! I take it back! This universe is cursed!”

He flees in terror, vanishing into the woods like a Looney Tune extra. A nearby human woman, poised, sipping Vaporeon’s lavender iced tea, sighs, watching him go.

Human Woman:
“Hopeless.”

The Immortal Six pass her calmly, Gardevoir giving a nod of respect. Regigigas screams in the background. Scene fades.

-

[Scene: The same outer colony park, peaceful. Gardevoir and the other five immortals are casually seated at a tea table with the futuristic human woman. The air is serene, almost slice-of-life. Vaporeon pours beverages; Flareon roasts marshmallows by hand. Alolan Ninetales reclines like she’s on vacation.]

Alolan Ninetales (giggling):
“You know… it’s been, what, a few centuries since I last saw a gacha game ad? Kinda nostalgic in the worst way.”

Lil Eve (curious):
“Gacha? Is that like a lottery?”

Keldeo:
“Sounds shady. Was it a sport or…?”

Gardevoir (sternly):
“Don’t. Just… don’t go down that road.”

Vaporeon (flat):
“You’ll spend your existence fishing for pixels instead of meaning.”

Flareon (grinning):
“And no food comes from that. Only hunger.”

The calm is broken, again, by the same perverted man bumbling into view, holding some worn-out future device with questionable images.

Pervert:
“Heh, heyyy ladies. Did you know that in terms of...”

SLAM!

The human woman slams the Regigigas Death Loop Tablet on the table. The display lights up: Regigigas flailing, drowning in a pool of artificial Sharpedos, screaming for air as the AI sharks just swim in circles chewing occasionally.

Regigigas (on loop):
“I CAN’T SWIM! STOP USING POOL SIMULATIONS!! AAAAAA!”

Everyone turns to stare. The pervert freezes, jaw trembling. He's about to ragequit, 

Pervert (sputtering):
“I... okay you know what I’m...”

Before he can finish, another sane human man enters calmly, dressed neatly.

Sane Man:
“Apologies for the interruption. I brought you all a prototype hospitality unit, robotic maid, voice-modded and trained with non-problematic AI datasets.”

He bows politely, presenting a beautifully-designed maid-bot that curtsies respectfully.

Pervert (snorting):
“Heh, I could teach her a few things...”

CRASH!
He tries to throw a rock through the window. Before it hits, Gardevoir’s eyes glow.

Gardevoir (calmly):
“No.”

Time freezes. She walks up to him, places two fingers on his forehead, and in a bright flash, 

Pervert (blinking, dazed):
“Huh? Was I… here for something?”

Gardevoir:
“No. Go home.”

He nods and shuffles away, harmless, humming some off-tune song. Everyone exhales.

Human Woman (smirking):
“Nothing like a live demo of ‘why mortals shouldn’t chase immortality.’”

Flareon:
“Or mermaids in maid outfits.”

Lil Eve (deadpan):
“Or pool Sharpedos.”

They all laugh. Scene fades with Regigigas screaming in the background again.

-

[Scene continues after memory-erased pervert exits. Peace returns briefly.]

Regigigas (muffled from tablet screen):
“Hah… guess I’m the official anti-pervert shield now, huh?”

Immediately, a giant mechanized drill bursts from off-screen into Regigigas’ back, violently spinning. His screams fill the display, blood spattering inside the tablet frame. The immortals glance over. No one flinches.

Gardevoir (bored):
“He’s getting poetic.”

Alolan Ninetales (sipping iced tea):
“Bit more blood this time.”

Lil Eve (genuinely curious):
“Do you think the artificial Sharpedos are syncing with the drill?”

Flareon (unbothered):
“Meh. I’ll roast dinner.”

Vaporeon (stretching):
“Guess I’ll mop. Again.”

The human woman smiles calmly, stepping away from the tablet and bowing politely.

Human Woman:
“Thank you all for your patience. You didn’t have to… but I appreciate it.”

Gardevoir (gracefully bowing in return):
“We insist. Politeness still matters.”

[Cue domestic montage with warm music playing faintly:]

- Vaporeon glides through the house, elegantly mopping floors and serving homemade lemonade.

- Flareon expertly grills and sautés with blazing but controlled flames, dinner sizzling under his care.

- Keldeo watches the woman's kids in the yard, shielding them from wayward drones and offering swordplay lessons with pool noodles.

- Lil Eve tends a hybrid garden, planting flame-resistant peonies and hydrating elemental fruit bushes.

- Alolan Ninetales reorganizes the fridge, carefully navigating its chilly breath away from nearby stoves with cartoonish paranoia.

- Gardevoir organizes the library, scanning and cross-referencing tomes with ease, her psychic aura dusting shelves automatically.

Human Woman (smiling warmly):
“You’re all welcome to stay as long as you need. Finding proper shelter is no small feat.”

Flareon (relieved):
“Much better than parking the spaceship in downtown again.”

Vaporeon:
“Last time it got three parking tickets and a mecha-cat graffiti.”

Lil Eve (playfully):
“I kept the graffiti.”

They all chuckle. Scene ends with a soft pan upward, showing the spaceship parked safely outside the outskirts, lights twinkling under the stars, while the Death Loop Tablet quietly screams from the corner of the room.

-

[Epilogue: Bells of Immortality]

Somewhere far from battlefields, gacha hells, and collapsing cities, a calm evening fell across a futuristic suburban enclave, its most notable residents not of this world, but weary wanderers of many sagas. The Immortal Six had seen centuries pass and now spent their twilight lounging in borrowed peace, tending gardens, sipping drinks, and babysitting the children of a kind human woman who welcomed them in without question.

Then came him.
Again.

A sweaty, disheveled human man, one of those who slipped through the dimensional cracks of the futuristic realm. His eyes darted toward the immortal women, Gardevoir, Alolan Ninetales, Vaporeon, and Lil Eve, before he straightened up with perverse confidence.

Perverted Man:
"Did you know that in terms of..."

SLAM!

Before he could finish the cursed sentence, the human woman casually slapped the Regigigas Death Loop Tablet onto the table with a satisfying thud. Its screen lit up violently.

[Tablet Playback: Regigigas flailing inside a pool of artificial Sharpedos, screaming between gurgles, as a drill churns behind him.]

Regigigas (on screen):
“THIS IS NOT BETTER THAN ARCEUUUUUS!!”

The pervert froze. Sweat beading, pupils shrinking.

Vaporeon (rubbing her temples):
"I've seen enough."

Flareon (mild chuckle, placing a paw on her shoulder):
"Come on, we both know I’m the most compatible with you."

Vaporeon relaxed into his touch, giving him a small kiss in agreement. The pervert began to back away, shaking.

Lil Eve (whispering to Keldeo):
“Why do humans do that thing?”

Keldeo:
“…No idea. Let's never ask.”

Gardevoir (to the woman, unfazed):
“May I memory wipe him again?”

Human Woman:
“Please.”

One psychic flash later, the pervert turned, muttering something about needing to do laundry, and vanished into the distance, blissfully empty-headed.

-

And so the final chapter of Pokétopia: Unhinged ends not in chaos nor combat, but with hospitality, gentleness, and refusal to entertain even the worst memes. The Immortal Six stayed a little longer, helped with dinner, and when the stars rose again, they returned to their wandering journey.

Not as gods. Not as trainers.
But as polite, absurdly powerful guests.

The bell tolls not for the end… but for the ones who outlived it.

[Well there's more... endlessly]

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 2: The titan from villain to punching bag

Regigigas really be trapped in the cosmic equivalent of a cursed TikTok loop, doing Gangnam Style in a death tablet while the immortals are peacefully asleep on a futon, unmoved.
Then out of nowhere: Mewtwo jump scare.

"Oppa Mewtwo style!"
[PUNCH]
"Guh… not again…"

This guy went from ancient titan to eternal comedic timing. The Regigigas Death Loop Tablet is basically Looney Tunes meets Dante’s Inferno, and he’s Bugs Bunny if Bugs kept dying horribly.

At this point, Regigigas is no longer a tragic villain, he’s a performance art piece.
A grim reminder that immortality isn’t always a blessing.
But at least… he dances.

-

Even in death loop eternity, Regigigas can't catch a break, just chilling (or rather, writhing) in his tablet prison, only to get collateral damage from a historical playback beatdown of Rayquaza getting pummeled by Tyranitar.

Rayquaza: "Tyranitar, wait, I can explain!"
Tyranitar: "NOPE."
[Punch-punch-punch]
Regigigas (off-screen): "Wait, why am I on fire agai..."
[BOOM. Dead x5.]

Poor guy is stuck in a cosmic highlight reel where he’s not even the main event, yet still dies five times out of proximity. Like a background character in a war flashback who forgot to duck.

And the immortals? Still sipping smoothies, doing laundry, tending gardens, reading books, completely unfazed.
Just another Tuesday in the post-finale serenity.

-

Regigigas, trapped in the tablet, now forced to endure five separate alternate timeline versions of Rayquaza trying to pitch him gacha-based MLM scams like some cursed cosmic telemarketer:

Rayquaza 1: “Yo bro, just invest ten Ultra Balls and get ten friends to do the same...”
Rayquaza 2: “Limited-time Dragon Orb bundle! Only available if you sell your soul!”
Rayquaza 3: “Ever heard of RaidPassCoin? Totally sustainable, trust me.”
Rayquaza 4: “You too can become a GachaMillionaire if you hatch enough eggs, ”
Rayquaza 5: “Hey Regigigas, I made this NFT of you screaming, wanna mint it?”

Regigigas: [loud mechanical groan] “I DESERVE THIS... I DESERVE THIS...”
He curls into a rock, cringing so hard he practically folds in half, haunted by his own past life as a scammy salesman bot boss in saga 4. A time when he was making those calls... and now karmic justice plays back like a looped nightmare.

And outside?
The six immortals are just calmly setting the dinner table. Vaporeon pours drinks. Flareon flips an omelet. Gardevoir marks “Rayquaza MLM Day #2568” in the records. No one bats an eye.

Regigigas is literally the embodiment of "You either die a villain, or live long enough to get haunted by your old sales scripts."

-

Regigigas, still trapped in his poetic punishment loop, suddenly sees it, 
a sizzling plate of Flareon's signature lava-roasted Magikarp steak and a frosty Vaporeon-blended Oran Berry smoothie placed delicately on a table inside the illusion.

His ancient stone stomach rumbles.

Regigigas (inner monologue):
“Finally... not MLM, not sharks, not Rayquaza… real food…”

He crawls toward it, trembling, eyes glowing with desperation, like a caveman discovering fire.

He devours the steak.
He chugs the smoothie.

Pause... blink... pause...

Then his eyes dilate. The food turns purple.
He opens his mouth, 
“GAAAAAAAHHHH, !!”
He explodes into confetti. Again.

On the tablet display:

"WARNING: LAVA MAGIKARP IS NOT FOR STONE-BASED LIFE FORMS."
"SMOOTHIE: SPIKED WITH LAXATIVE OF GODS."

Back in reality, the six immortals are sipping tea in polite silence.
Alolan Ninetales sips and mutters with a smirk,
“He always falls for the food illusion…”

Flareon shrugs, flipping a pancake.
“Can’t say I didn’t warn him a million deaths ago.”

And Vaporeon, very calmly, updates the counter on the kitchen fridge:
"Regigigas Death Count: 98,745 x 10^15"
Lil Eve sticks a smiling sticker next to it.

Regigigas respawns in the tablet, face-palming in existential agony.
He mumbles,
“Next time... I’ll sniff first...”
Then a Sharpedo-shaped spoon appears from nowhere and bonks him again.

-

As the starlit ocean sky bends above the lonely new world, a colossal silhouette glides through the stratosphere, 
a reincarnated Gyarados, no longer bound by rage but reborn as an ethereal aquatic alien, adorned with bioluminescent scales and gentle eyes.

Hovering silently with cosmic grace, the creature’s eyes scan the landmass below…

It sees them:
The six Hourai-immortals enjoying their peaceful chores, sipping tea, cracking jokes, guarding gardens, and living in polite eternity.

Then it notices the Tablet.
Regigigas, in yet another cycle, is getting stabbed by a giant spoon while trying to apologize to a mirage of Mew.

Gyarados’ fins twitch. The water around it ripples in the airless void.

Gyarados (telepathically):

“So this... is the reward for immortality?
Serene tea parties… and one soul locked in eternal slapstick hell?”

It lets out a deep, bubbling sigh, like a whale ancient enough to remember humanity’s sins.

And for a moment, as it continues to drift past the planet, it whispers across dimensions:

“Irony is… you were stronger than me once, Regigigas.
But now you scream for mercy over snacks.”

The alien Gyarados leaves, weaving back into the stars,
its final thought echoing like a ripple in the void:

“May I never live long enough to end like you.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 3: Hot Reunion

Scene: Alien Planet #47-3X / Twin Moons Horizon

Under the flickering twilight of two suns, Keldeo, in his ever-immaculate gakuran, walks proudly and upright, bridal-carrying Lil Eve, whose seifuku flutters in the alien wind, tails swaying with relaxed delight. Their 2-by-2 walk becomes more of a quiet hover stroll, with Lil Eve poking his cheek now and then.

But the peace is abruptly broken by a grotesque electronic screech.

Behind them, dragged on a levitating cart tethered by forgetful routine, is Regigigas’ Death Loop Tablet, still active.

Regigigas (invisible within the screen):

“AUGH, NO, NOT THE CUDDLE WALK AGAIN, gasp, THE GAPING ROMANCE, urghhh, I DIED, again...”

He flops, dies of cringe, flails, revives, and dies again, all within five seconds.

Keldeo blinks, freezes, then whispers:

Keldeo:

“...Oops. Forgot I brought that.”

Lil Eve giggles and pats his snout.
“Let him cope.”

-

Meanwhile, Sea Shore of Alien Planet #14-ΩB

A sudden mini-earthquake jostles the land, and with a surprised yelp, Flareon slides into the glittering alien sea, steam hissing from his coat.

Flareon (half-submerged):

“I swear I was standing on solid, glub...”

Before he can finish, Vaporeon sighs with grace long practiced and elegantly dives in, lifting him once again in the bridal carry of rescue.

Alolan Ninetales, watching with a popsicle in mouth, lazily mutters:

Ninetales:

“That’s… carry number one million and three. And a half. I counted.”

Gardevoir, standing near the spaceship gangway with a clipboard and sun visor, doesn’t look up.

Gardevoir:

“Ship's fine. But Flareon’s ego isn’t.”

Flareon (blushing through steam):

“I could’ve gotten out myself… eventually…”

Vaporeon (deadpan):

“Sure. When the magma tide comes back in?”

They all share a silent, eternal sigh of immortals tired of routine but committed to kindness.

Somewhere in the far cosmos, Regigigas dies of secondhand embarrassment. Again.

-

Scene: Aboard the Immortals’ Ship, “Hourai Drifter”

Several centuries had passed since the last shared outing, but as time loops casually brushed against timelines and long naps ended in stretches and yawns, the Immortal Six found themselves together again, on the bridge of their ship, sipping beverages or polishing tools, as if no time had passed at all.

Gardevoir:

“So. Reunion log confirmed. Estimated time since last gathering: 274 years, 9 months, 2 weeks, and… six skipped loops.”

Keldeo:

“Regigigas has… not fared well.”

He gestures solemnly to the Death Loop Tablet, flickering at the back. Within it, Regigigas spasms in silent agony as he cringes through flashbacks of Vaporeon fanfiction lines, endless romantic walks, lava baths, gacha scams, and, worst of all, attempted karaoke.

Regigigas (from the tablet):

“MAKE IT STOP, WHY IS THERE AN ACCORDION VERSION OF GANGNAM STYLE, AAAAA, ”

-

Moments later, approaching Planet 934-RX, A Lava World

Flareon (tail wagging like a puppy):

“A whole planet made of lava! A paradise!”

Alolan Ninetales (already backing away):

“Nope. Too spicy. Not even the fridge can handle that atmosphere.”

Vaporeon (blinking calmly):

“I could make obsidian out of that sea. It’d look nice next to the kitchen counter.”

Lil Eve:

“I wanna see if magma tastes like fizzy cola!”

Gardevoir:

“Absolutely not.”

Keldeo:

“...Maybe just a peek?”

As the ship hovers into orbit for a closer look, someone fumbles a corner of the bridge. A clunk. A bump. A dramatic slip.

Flareon:

“...Did we just drop something?”

Everyone turns slowly toward the now-missing Regigigas Tablet, which had been accidentally nudged into the planet's core lava geyser.

For a moment, silence.

Then, POOF!

A shimmering void tear opens mid-air on the ship’s bridge… and the Death Loop Tablet rematerializes, right back in its spot, dripping magma and screaming slightly louder than before.

Regigigas (roaring from within):

“YOU CAN’T KILL WHAT’S ALREADY IN HELL!”

Keldeo (dryly):

“It’s bound to us. Like a cursed fridge magnet from a haunted souvenir shop.”

Vaporeon (sipping iced tea):

“Should’ve just gift-wrapped him for Heatran.”

Gardevoir:

“Can we mute him this time?”

Tablet:
“NO, NOOOO, THE FIZZY COLA MAGMA TASTES LIKE...”

Gardevoir taps a psychic button. Silence.

The six sip in peace. Reunion successful. Regigigas… very much not.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 4: NaclCraft Beacon is Absurd

[Scene: Inside the Hourai Drifter – 69 Years Post-Lava Tablet Incident]

The Immortal Six gathered once again in their orbiting spaceship, sipping experimental teas made by Vaporeon and dodging Regigigas’ latest “I died again” notifications from the corner.

Keldeo dusted off a device labeled "Chronoscene Reflector", more commonly known as the Flashback Machine, an artifact that lets immortals project ultra-ancient memories into immersive holographic panoramas.

Lil Eve:

“Let’s see something from… 2.0003738292 billion years ago. Just before the long nap era.”

Flareon (chuckling):

“Oh wow. Poketopia Saga 4? That was peak grinding era.”

The machine buzzed to life, light streaming like memory waterfalls as it displayed a lively ancient Poketopia scene, sunset orange skies, impossibly tall structures, and yes…

-

Flashback Scene:

Crustle (waving blueprint scrolls):

“If I stack NetherSalt blocks from void to world top, and fill every single cubic meter, I’d finish the Beacon in about... 666 million years! Haha!”

Flareon (in the past, distracted by Vaporeon cooking):

“Mhm. Sounds cool. Can I eat NetherSalt?”

Garganacl (stoic):

“It’s pointless. Even immortals won’t waste forever on something so… grindy. I’d rather learn all dialects of Pokémon speech. Or nap.”

Crustle (grinning):

“C’mon! You just don’t appreciate true legacy structure design!”

Suddenly, Greedent waddles in, twinkle-eyed and grinning.

Greedent:

“Hey guys, did you know that in terms of...”

Click.

-

Back to Present:

Vaporeon, now stirring a drink, had abruptly shut off the flashback machine, her eye twitching in exhaustion. Without warning, she lifted her swimming maid skirt just slightly with a teasing glance at Flareon.

Flareon (sputtering):

“Wh–?! Not here!”

Vaporeon (innocently):

“Just distracting you from cursed dialogue starters, dear.”

Regigigas (muffled, from a wall-mounted tablet wedged into the corner):

“I CAN’T BREATHE IN PIXELS, PLEASE STOP TEASING EACH OTHER, ”

He was currently wall-clipped into a suffocation loop, eyes twitching as memories of Greedent’s unfinished sentence looped in his cursed neural net.

Keldeo (not looking up):

“Reminder: install Flashback Machine parental filters.”

Gardevoir (writing notes calmly):

“Also: install psychic firewalls against perversion triggers. They age poorly.”

Alolan Ninetales (sipping a snowcone):

“It’s okay. I still think building a beacon that size sounds worse than Regigigas' loop.”

Everyone nodded in agreement, even the tablet buzzed sadly, acknowledging the truth.

Lil Eve:

“So what’s next, lava surfing with obsidian fins or...”

Tablet (Regigigas' final scream of the day):

“NO MORE FLASHBACKS!!”

The ship drifted onward, the immortals relaxed, the cringe contained, for now.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 5: Immortal Couples from Another Universes

[Scene: Lush Planet “Erosbloom-89” – 69 Years After Landing]

Verdant vines stretched skyward as flowers pulsed softly in time with the planet’s heartbeat. The Hourai Immortals, eternally young yet cosmically seasoned, wandered its alien Eden with a bizarre serenity only billions of years could cultivate.

-

Lil Eve and Keldeo strolled side-by-side under glowing moss canopies. Their gakuran and seifuku fluttered as pollen shimmered in the air.

Suddenly, ahead: Two human figures, seemingly locked in perpetual embrace.

A muscular man in a futuristic quarterback uniform, carrying his wife, a cheerleader with glasses, tightly hugged in bridal style. Their smiles sparkled as they floated rather than walked. Occasionally, they exchanged gentle kisses like it was still their honeymoon, 3 billion years ago.

Keldeo:

“...Are we hallucinating this?”

Lil Eve’s tail glowed bright pink in embarrassment, a full-on tail boner, spiking her skirt and radiating unfiltered moe shock.

Cheerleader Woman (smiling warmly):

“Aww, you two are adorable! Especially you, little one. May I pet you?”

Lil Eve (still frozen):

“T-Tail… b-bonerrrr…”

Keldeo (gentle sigh):

“Here we go again…”

He lifted Lil Eve bridal style, her face steaming as he turned toward the cheerleader, who gently stroked Lil Eve’s head with motherly affection.

Cheerleader:

“Soft like starlight...”

Then, 

RRRAAGHHRGGHHHH!!!

A muffled screech erupted from Keldeo’s back, yes, it was Regigigas, still strapped in his Tablet of Eternal Loop, dying from sheer cringe suffocation.

Lil Eve (snapping):

“THAT’S ENOUGH!”

She jumped off and unleashed Pulsive Foul Play, smacking the tablet with a grassy shockwave that muted Regigigas’ cries mid-gurgle.

Lil Eve (bowing):

“Forgive us. He’s… a walking embarrassment.”

Quarterback Man (still holding his wife):

“Been there. Respect, young ones.”

Cheerleader Woman (still stroking Lil Eve’s ears):

“Come visit again.”

After a respectful farewell, Lil Eve, cheeks flushed and giddy, suddenly sprouted vines and bride-lifted Keldeo in return, her seifuku fluttering as they flew into the treetops.

-

Meanwhile, on another continent…

Vaporeon, still in her maid swimsuit, carried Flareon across mountain peaks. The "One-Year Maid Carry Challenge" was reaching month 11.

Ninetales and Gardevoir, sitting nearby under parasol shades, politely ignored alien suitors who tried pick-up lines ranging from galaxy poems to poor haikus.

Then, they saw it:

A human woman in classic seifuku, forever carrying her blushing gakuran-clad husband, bridal-style. She had been doing so for 2.5 billion years, and still wasn’t tired.

Seifuku Woman (grinning):

“You four are so cute! Real marriage material.”

Gakuran Man (softly):

“She’s the strongest lifeform I know…”

Flareon (to Vaporeon):

“I feel slightly under-carried now.”

Gardevoir (murmuring):

“This planet… is deliciously unhinged.”

She sipped her cosmic coffee and stared into the middle distance.

“We’re not leaving anytime soon.”

And no one disagreed. Even the Regigigas Tablet tried to clap… before breaking itself again in cringe silence.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 6: Alien Yuri Fan-boy

[Scene: Lush Planet “Erosbloom-89” – Galactic Café, Under the Mind-Coral Pavilion]

A quiet breeze brushed over the amphitheater, where various immortal and post-mortal lifeforms lounged on coral recliners and drank fluorescent smoothies. All was peaceful until Gardevoir, dressed eternally in her pencil skirt police-uniform ensemble, stood on a psychically conjured platform, giving a calm lecture.

Gardevoir:

“Through consistent exposure to multidimensional minds, I’ve perfected a psychic field that nullifies language barriers across the galaxy. Meaning is conveyed directly, bypassing syntax, ”

She gestured gently as even non-carbon-based aliens blinked in awe, understanding words they never knew existed.
Keldeo and Lil Eve, holding hands near a levitating bonsai tree, looked on in stunned silence.
Even the Death Loop Tablet on Keldeo’s back vibrated briefly in reverent understanding.

Then… from the side…

Alolan Ninetales, lounging on a frosty couch in her light blue sundress, raised a paw and commented dryly:

Ninetales:

“She’s just a Nine Ball.”

Gardevoir:

“...Thank you.”

And that was when trouble arrived.

-

From behind a psychic pillar, an Octopus-shaped Yuri Fanboy Alien with hearts for eyes burst forth, flailing tentacles and gurgling in passion.

Octopus Alien:

“LESBIANS. ON. SCREEN.”

He pointed dramatically at Gardevoir and Alolan Ninetales, who blinked at each other.

There was a long pause.

Then, with perfectly neutral expressions, they gently leaned in and kissed, brief, soft, and aesthetically correct, like they were checking off a galactic request form.

Gardevoir (telepathically):

“Sorry, Lucario.”

Ninetales (telepathically):

“Apologies, Mamoswine.”

The Octopus alien wept tears of joy, bowed, and floated away satisfied.

Meanwhile, 

Regigigas, still imprisoned in his Death Loop Tablet, witnessed it all. His tablet shook violently, and a pixelated ROCK BONER icon popped up. In sheer shame and overstimulation, the loop force-ejected itself into the nearest interplanetary shredder, with a muffled scream trailing off:

Regigigas:

“I REGRET NOTHINGGG, grrhhhkk...”

A pause.

Gardevoir:

“He’ll respawn. Again.”

Ninetales:

“One day, he’ll stop screaming. I hope.”

They both sipped their cosmic drinks, the breeze now slightly more awkward.

Lil Eve (to Keldeo):

“...Do you think they’re actually into each other now?”

Keldeo:

“I think they’re into not saying they’re into each other.”

The girls exchanged a silent glance.
Somewhere, a bisexual awakening softly bloomed like pollen in the air.

-

And thus, on a planet full of cuddle couples, alien voyeurs, and resurrecting cringe legends, the immortals carried on.

Forever serene. Forever weird. Forever unhinged.

-

Scene:
As the crew lounges in their interstellar living room, the Death Loop Tablet begins flickering violently. Flareon lazily lifts a paw, glancing at it with mild disinterest.

Tablet Display: Regigigas flailing in an uncanny yellow lake, face twisted in slow-motion horror. No audio, only a subtitle: “No smell detected.”

Vaporeon: “Did we forget to flush another simulation?”

Alolan Ninetales (sipping an iced drink): “Don’t look at me. I’m ice-type.”

Gardevoir: “...Should we help him?”

Keldeo: “He’ll reset in 15 seconds anyway.”

Lil Eve (giggling): “He always makes it weird.”

Regigigas (subtitled as he sinks): “I have seen eternity. It smells like nothing.”

The crew goes back to watching soap operas from a parallel universe.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 7 : Terraform Project for New Mortals

Scene: A breezy afternoon on the deck of the ship orbiting a lush, green planet.

Vaporeon and Lil Eve walk in confidently, tails swaying with suspicious pride. Under their frilly skirts, very noticeable oval bulges jiggle with each step.

Flareon (squinting): “...Again?”

Keldeo (deadpan, arms crossed): “Third time this century.”

Vaporeon (grinning): “It’s tradition!”

Lil Eve (mock-innocent): “We wanted to see if you'd cry again.”

Flareon dramatically drops onto his back, tail twitching.
Keldeo just sighs, pulling out a tiny terraforming control device.

Keldeo: “Alright, that’s it. We’re making a planet where Pokémon mortals can live. With pranks banned by law.”

Flareon: “And no oval-shaped anything.”

Regigigas, faintly from the tablet on the table: “Too late… I choked on one... again…”

Everyone ignores him.

-

Scene: 69 years after the terraforming project, lush valleys sprawl beneath a violet sky, speckled with two suns and a slow orbiting moon made of crystal.

Lil Eve sits beneath a massive glowing tree whose roots hum softly in tune with the soil. Around her gather her descendants, some furred, some scaled, others shimmering with alien traits inherited from unknown corners of the multiverse.

One of her newly born siblings, a Steel-type Eeveelution, Steelvee (male), with chrome fur and luminous, gear-shaped tail fins, sits beside her. His eyes, devoid of pupils, lock onto the flickering Regigigas tablet resting on a mossy stone.

Steelvee: “...Is he always like that?”

The tablet screen shows Regigigas being slowly crushed by two planetary-scale magnets. No sound, just a looping image of his metal frame folding like scrap.

Lil Eve: “Yes. He says it’s better than the shark tank, though.”

A tall, sleek Cosmician Rapidash (male Fire/Dark), one of her children, now grown, approaches, his black flames speckled with fuchsia stars and vapor trails. He squints at the tablet.

Cosmician Rapidash: “He knows we can turn it off, right?”

Lil Eve: “I think he finds meaning in the suffering.”

Steelvee: “Cosmic masochism... noted.”

Lil Eve chuckles softly and gazes up at the dual suns. Her leafy tail sways with contentment and unease alike.

Lil Eve (softly): “From Pokétopia… to this. The universe sure knows how to unhinge.”

The camera slowly zooms out, the laughter of her mixed kin echoing faintly, while Regigigas silently gets pancaked again in the background.

-

Scene: The terraformed planet, early evening. Bioluminescent plants begin to glow. Lil Eve's family sprawls across a serene garden-plateau, some relaxing, some playing, some just... existing.

A moment of quiet.

Then...

Steelvee (standing atop a rock, dramatically raising a chunk of scrap metal like a guitar):
“I… AM STEELVEE!!”
His voice inexplicably echoing in perfect Jack Black impersonation.

A record-scratch level silence pierces the air.

In the nearby moss-den gaming alcove, Alolan Ninetales and a newly introduced Dragon-type Eeveelution, Dragonvee (female, coiling tail, pastel scales, and ethereal antennae), are locked in a fierce bullet hell danmaku battle on a holographic screen.

Ninetales (mid-dodge, expression icy): “Don’t.”

Dragonvee (laser-focused): “Ignore the cringe, dodge the crin...”

Too late.
Both characters get sniped by a curtain of pink star-bullets.
GAME OVER flashes across the sky.

Ninetales (deadpan): “Great. Now I have to restart Lunatic Mode.”

Dragonvee (hissing): “His cringe has splash damage.”

Back by the rock, Steelvee bows with over-the-top flair. Lil Eve just buries her face in her leaf-paws, laughing.

Meanwhile, in the background, the Regigigas tablet flickers alive just to show him slapping his own stone face in sheer defeat.

Regigigas (muffled): “...Why am I still here… just to suffer…”

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 8: Flashback Tapes for the New Custom Mons

Scene: Twilight on the terraformed planet. The stars begin to shine, and the descendants of the immortal circle gather around flickering archives of memory, gifted from the ones who came before.

Lil Eve, after a long day in inherited Leafeon form, finally blinks and shifts back to her base Eevee form with a soft pop and a leafy sigh.

Lil Eve (rubbing her head):
“Oops… forgot Gramps mode was still on. No wonder I was photosynthesizing all afternoon.”

Nearby, Steelvee, her new and same cosmic but mortal brother, ever the curious gearhead, sits cross-legged with a hovering Cosmic Flashback Tape, its core glowing with blue and orange, Flareon’s color signature. He inserts it into an old projector-flask.

-

The tape plays:
Crustle, long gone, appears in vintage stream overlays, fidgeting in his first attempt at NaclCraft. The commentary is janky, the gameplay clunky, but there’s charm, genuine joy in the grind as he builds a beacon slowly, one salt brick at a time.

-

Steelvee chuckles, adjusting his armor plates.
“Dad said this was peak stream-core... I kinda get it now.”

From across the grove, Dragonvee, the dignified, airy female Dragon-type, carefully reactivates a Mystic Vales Chronicle highlight tape, gifted long ago by Vaporeon herself.

-

The scene:
Galarian Rapidash, elegant and stern, dances across a bullet hell battlefield. No damage taken. Not even grazed. The music is intense; her horn sparkles with starfire. A frame-perfect lunatic-mode performance.

-

Dragonvee (quietly):
“She did it all for the playerbase... not even for the score. Just so others could believe it’s possible.”

Lil Eve joins them, ears twitching gently.

“I miss them sometimes,” she murmurs, “even if we’re... not alone.”

The air hums, not with sorrow, but with resonance. Their ancestors are gone, but through archives, DNA, and legacy, they’re still right here. Watching. Inspiring.

In the background, the Regigigas tablet turns on, showing him sighing through bloodied slapstick trauma.

Regigigas (muffled):
“You’re welcome, by the way. I carried the cringe so you don’t have to.”

Steelvee tosses him a tiny salt cube in tribute.

“Rest easy, stone uncle.”

-

Scene: The family grove on the terraformed planet, beneath bioluminescent trees glowing softly in the dusk. The immortal trio, Keldeo, Vaporeon, Flareon, arrive silently, still dressed in their immortal uniforms as if time refused to move around them. Lil Eve, unchanged too, curls her tail as her many descendants respectfully step aside.

-

A Flashback Tape floats from Steelvee’s archive projector. It whirs and glows:

A much younger Flareon, bruised and limping in a battered quarterback uniform, limps out from a foggy football field.

Then, Vaporeon, youthful and radiant in her pleated cheerleader skirt, scoops him up bridal-style without hesitation.

The tape glitches. The locker room floods out of nowhere, water sloshing from every pipe.

Cramorant, in the shadows, gulping guiltily and flapping wildly under Mr. Mime's orders.

-

Steelvee and Dragonvee exchange snickers.

-

The projector clicks, jumping forward 13 years into the next tape.

Cramorant, older now, wearing a sunhat and vest, stands calmly by a lakeside stall handing out fish wrapped in seaweed.

Flareon, now in a modest apron, quickly slaps coins onto the counter and grabs the fish, but flinches.

He turns, Buzzwole is there, posing dramatically with a bento box.

They lock eyes.

Buzzwole screams internally and flees full sprint, crashing through a billboard and vaulting into the distant forest toward Urshifu's manor.

The tape ends. The descendants giggle.

-

Back in the present, Flareon exhales deeply.
“They both moved on... but I swear, Buzzwole still avoids anything spicy to this day.”

Vaporeon leans over, kissing him on the cheek gently.
“You helped them survive their pasts. Now you’ve outlived yours.”

Keldeo, standing tall beside them, adds quietly:
“And their stories live in our blood. Cringe and all.”

The breeze carries laughter, past and future merging softly. A few young Eevee descendants are already reenacting the locker room flood scene with plushies.

Lil Eve, still in her sailor uniform, whispers with a smirk,
“Should we tell them the library bento incident was technically my fault?”

Flareon and Vaporeon, in perfect sync:
“No.”

-

[Scene: The Descendant’s Grove, nightfall. Glowing vines hum faintly. Lil Eve sits among her siblings and children, projector humming as another tape loads in.]

The title blinks on screen:
“Origin Tape 3: The Bento, the Bot, and the Birth”

It begins with Cramorant, sneaking from the library's chest. He grabs a bento box, not knowing it belonged to Espeon, Flareon's powerful psychic mother.

The box then swalloed by Cramorant, then he was seen catching Flareon, as Cramorant was trying to eat him mid-air until rescued by Vaporeon. Traumatized, his tail sticks out at a 90-degree angle for a full hour.

Espeon was already collapsed after her DNA stolen during the commotion.

-

The footage glitches, cutting to a Bot War Raid at school.

Espeonbot, a mechanical doppelganger with glowing red eyes, assaults the school with an army of Sylveonbot, Absolbot, and Pikabot.

Flareon, mid-meltdown, is rescued by a swift Vaporeon, clad in her school uniform skirt. She bridal-carries him out of the collapsing entrance room, shielding him from other rogue bots.

The projector shows the two resting under moonlight at Vaporeon's room, Flareon recovering, held tightly in Vaporeon's arms. Espeon watches from afar the next morning after the war was over, her cold demeanor melting.

A voiceover, Espeon’s psychic tone:

“I never ordered it... but I allowed it. For once, I trusted love more than legacy.”

-

Then:

Months later, baby Lil Eve was born inside Umbreon's hospital. Her tail sparkles. Vaporeon (in bed) and Flareon cry silently. Espeon and the rest of eeveelution family, Umbreon (grandpa and hospital owner), Glaceon (grandma), Leafeon (grandpa), Jolteon (honorary uncle) and Sylveon (honorary aunt) looked on, distant but softened.

Back in the present, the tape ends. The hum fades.

-

Lil Eve sits still, eyes moist but smiling.
“So... I was born from a stolen bento, a bot war, and trauma hugs.”

Steelvee, quietly:
“Best origin story I’ve heard since Buzzwole’s boxing match with Wigglytuff.”

Flareon, nostalgic:
“I’d suffer it all again. A thousand bentos. A million bots.”

Vaporeon reaches over, nuzzling her daughter.

Lil Eve replies, hugging both of her parents.
“I’m glad you did.”

A new star twinkles in the terraformed sky. The grove breathes. The future is weird, but loved.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 9: Flashback Tapes about origin of Saga 1&4

[Scene: The Descendant’s Grove, again. The vines hum as a deeper, older tape clicks into the projector. The screen flickers into sepia tones, this is before even the first saga.]

Title card:
“Prologue Tape: The Bandit, The Betrayal, and The Heroes”

It begins in a dust-worn village, half-lit by lanterns. A starving Pikachu, cloaked in tattered fabric, stumbles behind a merchant stall, clutching his stomach.

A silent shadow approaches. It's Umbreon, stoic and calm, dropping a wrapped rice ball without a word. Pikachu devours it, gasping.

Pikachu:
“You… you're kind. Are you a hero?”

Umbreon stares out into the stars.

Umbreon:
“No. I’m just missing someone.”

He mumbles about Espeon, his lost girlfriend, kidnapped not long ago by a former childhood friend: Tyranitar, twisted by power.

Pikachu:
“N-not my business, sir...”

Umbreon grips Pikachu by the tail.

Umbreon:
“It is now.”

The tape freezes there.

-

Back in the present, Lil Eve, eyes reflecting the projector's light, exhales.

Lil Eve:
“Grandpa Umbreon was strict even when he was saving lives. Now I get why Dad turned out the way he did.”

-

[Another tape clunks in, older still.]

Title card:
“114 Years Before Tyranitar Clash: The Scam That Shook the Titans”

A golden desert. Regigigas and the other Regis gather around an interdimensional flip phone.

Regice (on speaker):
“They say the deposit makes us immortal. We just have to wire, ”

Regigigas:
“Perfect. I trust this. I’m a genius.”

Moments later, a cosmic explosion. They're left bruised, mortal, and broke.

Enraged, Regigigas begins forging a glowing needle, his “Anti-Arceus Lance.” The scene glitches before the fatal confrontation can be shown.

-

Cut to present day.

Regigigas, now skewered one hundred times over by poetic irony, watches the tape playing.

He coughs, half-immortal blood leaking.

Regigigas:
“I regret nothing!”

Then pauses. Screams.

Regigigas:
“Actually, maybe a little bit!”

-

The projector powers down. The grove falls silent again.

Reality itself seems to chuckle in the vines.

The past is chaotic. The future is weird.
But for now, the immortals rest, amused… and still watching.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 10: Ice Nine Bridge

[Scene: The same planet, glimmering under a twin sunset. The ice bridge arcs across a vast chasm, suspended in cold mist.]

Alolan Ninetales, regal and graceful, conjures the bridge with elegant sweeps of her tails, layering frost into shimmering threads for everyone to cross.

Keldeo, impatient, surfs ahead at high speed, blades of water sparking as hooves kiss the ice.

Gardevoir glides after him, not touching the surface, psychic energy cradles her in perfect poise.

Lil Eve, humming to herself, crafts delicate Frost Prints into the shape of custom skates, made entirely from charged ice. She rides them with finesse, initiating an Electric Drift as her ribbon tail sparks behind her.

Flareon, determined but incompatible with the medium, takes a single step.

Hissssss.

The ice under him steams and crumbles. He yelps, sinking waist-deep, but before panic can rise, 

Vaporeon, swift as ever, dives in and lifts him bridal-style, rising from the fog like a soft rescue cliché.

Alolan Ninetales, amused but practiced, calls out as they float by:

Ninetales:
“That’s the six hundred sixty-nine millionth time, you two. Should I start charging rescue fees?”

Flareon (grumbling):
“I was doing fine.”

Vaporeon:
“Sure you were.”

As laughter echoes across the bridge, Keldeo loses control for once, slipping on a curve, sending a strange black object skittering from his saddlebag.

It bounces once, twice, and slides off the bridge’s edge.

Death Loop Tablet.

Cutaway:

Far below, Regigigas, still recovering from psychic trauma and poetic irony, opens one eye as the tablet whizzes past his head.

Regigigas:
“Oh no. Not again.”

Cue the familiar fin of a Sharpedo emerging from dimensional slush nearby.

-

Back at the far side of the bridge, awaiting the others:

- Steelvee (male), arms crossed, scanning.

- Dragonvee (female), wings gently flapping, yawning in disinterest.

- Galaxian Gastrier (female Water/Psychic), glowing with constellation marks, ears twitching at the psychic distress call.

- Cosmician Rapidash (male Fire/Dark), mane flickering with astral flames, watches silently.

Galaxian Gastrier, with a calm breath, extends her hand toward the abyss. Her eyes glow, and water from mist and psychic energy swirl together into a spiral.

She lifts the tablet mid-fall, slows it, and pulls it toward her with care, handing it to Steelvee.

Steelvee:
“We’re going to need to lock this thing up.”

Dragonvee:
“Or just stop inviting Keldeo to casual travel.”

Rapidash (finally speaking):
“…Too late for that.”

- 

Everyone eventually gathers on the other side. The bridge holds. The sun dims. The night is young.

Another cosmic accident has been narrowly avoided.

But just barely.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 11: Fireboy & Watergirl Game

[Scene: Inside a glowing crystal den carved into the side of a mountain. Aurora vines pulse faintly above as a screen flickers. Lil Eve sits with a controller, immersed.]

On-screen:
A pixelated platformer. Two elemental characters, one fire, one water, solve puzzles cooperatively, triggering levers and avoiding traps.

Lil Eve (grinning):
“Go, Dadbot! Hit the switch! No, not into the lake again!”

Her Fire character sizzles out dramatically in the in-game water. Again.

From behind, Flareon peeks over her shoulder, puffing his cheeks.

Flareon:
“That game’s rigged. No way fire types slip that much in real life.”

Vaporeon, leaning against the den’s wall with a cup of moss tea, doesn’t even look up.

Vaporeon:
“Says the one who melted his way into a ravine this morning.”

Flareon:
“That was terrain sabotage!”

Lil Eve (laughing):
“Mom had to spoon you out again.”

Cue a flashback ripple:

Vaporeon, expression flat, stands in waist-high water with a literal ladle made of hardened bubble energy, scooping a soggy Flareon from a crater lake while Ninetales in the background silently counts with her tail.

Back to present.

Flareon, shaking imaginary water from his ears, mutters:

Flareon:
“…You call it rescue. I call it aquatic abduction.”

Vaporeon (gently):
“You’re still warm. It’s cute.”

Lil Eve (playfully smug):
“I think you two were the original Fireboy and Watergirl.”

Both parents glance at the screen. The pixel characters hold hands after solving a puzzle.

A moment of quiet. Flareon and Vaporeon exchange a glance.

Vaporeon:
“…Okay, that’s pretty poetic.”

Flareon (blushing):
“D’aww…”

-

Cutaway panel:

Meanwhile, Regigigas, his consciousness still partly bound to the Tablet of Eternal Mistakes, is sitting inside a volcano.

He hums as molten lava bubbles around him, using it like bathwater.

Regigigas:
“They mocked me once. Who’s the fool now?”

The Death Loop Tablet, floating nearby the gaming scene, begins flashing red. Again.

Regigigas (sighing):
“Not again.”

Galaxian Sharpedo fin (fire-type) breach from lava.

-

Back at the den, Lil Eve starts a new level. Vaporeon settles beside her. Flareon sits on the other side, tail curled close to avoid scorching the rug.

They play together. This time, Flareon almost makes the jump.

Almost.

Splash.

Lil Eve:
“Six hundred sixty-nine million and one.”

Flareon:
“I'm starting to think it's fate.”

Vaporeon (already conjuring her spoon):
“Good thing I kept this handy.”

The screen glows on. Outside, the stars begin to fall upward.

A low-stakes evening, in a high-concept world.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 12: Firegirl & Waterboy Movie

[Scene: The Descendant’s Grove. Lil Eve has set up a side projector for a "spin-off spin-off night." The film begins with charming, orchestral music,  whimsical, hopeful.]

Title Card:
“Firegirl & Waterboy: A Tale of Steam”

Starring: Firefox & Frogger

Act 1: Emberport

Firefox, a fire-elemental fox with glowing script patterns on her tail and a mischievous spark in her stride, lives in Emberport, a glowing city of warm light and controlled chaos. She runs her family’s incense bakery, where the air smells of cinnamon and static. Inspired by Delphox.

Enter Frogger, a cool blue swamp-dwelling water boy with slick reflexes, wide-set eyes, and a quiet voice. He arrives in Emberport as a delivery runner, skating along pipes and vapor trails with his custom water-slick boots. Inspired by Greninja.

Their first meeting is literal: he crashes through her bakery’s steam vent window.

Firefox (deadpan):
“You owe me seven buns and a wall.”

Frogger (blinking):
“Do you... take payment in puddlecoin?”

-

Act 2: Sparks & Splashes

They don’t like each other. Then they don’t not like each other. Then... they’re racing down the city’s molten slideways together, dodging hover-carts, co-steaming dumplings, and arguing about the ethics of water extinguishing scented candles.

Montage moments:

They compete in an Elemental Dance Festival and accidentally invent “steam-syncing” (the crowd goes wild).

Frogger teaches Firefox to relax in a hot spring.

Firefox tries to teach Frogger how to handle spice. He cries and eats more.

-

Act 3: Flood & Flame

A sudden infrastructure glitch causes Emberport’s heat to spike dangerously. The city faces a risk of evaporation... or meltdown.

Together, Firefox and Frogger devise a plan using their combined powers, he cools the flow lines while she redirects energy to prevent a chain reaction. It’s awkward, messy, heartfelt.

As they succeed, a steam cloud rises, painting the sky in rose and violet hues.

-

Final Scene:

They sit on the edge of a copper tower, city safe below. Her tail flickers. His webbed hands rest in hers.

Frogger:
“You’re not as explosive as I thought.”

Firefox:
“And you’re wetter than I expected.”

They laugh. A soft kiss. Then the camera pans up to a sky where clouds and sun rays swirl like brushstrokes.

-

Back in the reality:

Lil Eve giggles.
“This is exactly like how you two flirted when I was still just an egg.”

Flareon hides his face.
“I wasn’t that awkward.”

Vaporeon just grins.
“You melted the school’s hydration fountain.”

The grove hums with laughter. Another surreal love story... Firefox and Frogger, characters inspired by the couple of the seer and the bounty hunter and old allies back then they were there, Delphox and Greninja, but with their own identities. With just enough steam to feel real.

End credits theme: A duet called “Boil and Flow.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 13: Fire & Water Dual Date Past

[Scene: The Descendant’s Grove, Night. The vines pulse gently as another old reel spins up. Lil Eve munches popcorn made of crystallized berries. A familiar hum buzzes the clearing.]

Title Card:
“Flashback Tape: The Double Date of Boil & Flow”
(Year 11 of the 13-year gap, Lil Eve was age 11)

-

[Cut to: A glowing evening patio in a ritzy Elemental Cuisine Lounge. A gentle stream flows beneath a transparent floor. Waiters float on lily pads. The ambiance is soaked in soft light and steamy aromas.]

At the 2x2 table:

- Vaporeon, elegant in a flowing blue date dress, sits beside

- Flareon, dashing and nervous in a crisp red tuxedo.

Across from them:

- Greninja, wearing a sharp shounen protagonist-style suit with exaggerated shoulder flair and dual belts, his eyes hidden behind calm determination.

- Delphox, serene in a shoujo mage-style gown, sleeves draped like comet tails, her ears adorned with tiny lantern charms.

-

The table is split perfectly.

- Greninja and Vaporeon share the cool side: chilled fruit soups, frozen cocktails, mist-infused mochi.

- Delphox and Flareon share the spicy side: magma noodles, ember dumplings, firecracker skewers.

Greninja (coolly sipping frost tea):
“Arrested four bandits before sunrise. They were smuggling counterfeit Evolution Stones in soda cans.”

Delphox (without looking up):
“Mmm. That explains the third moon in your fortune today.”

Flareon (choking slightly on a fire dumpling):
“I-Is that why the waiter called you Officer Frog?”

Vaporeon (grinning):
“He’s technically a bounty hunter. But I think it’s the belts.”

-

Greninja suddenly stands, scooping up Delphox bridal style in a smooth, practiced motion.

Greninja:
“We’ve steamed long enough.”

He places a glowing receipt gently on the table, its numbers absurd, enough to buy a pool the size of a city plaza.

In a blink, they vanish in a swirl of mist and psychic light.

-

Flareon (blinking):
“They left.”

Vaporeon (grabbing the receipt):
“And left the grace to us.”

Without hesitation, she sweeps Flareon into a bridal carry, tails brushing the stone steps as they stride away from the glowing patio, past stunned waiters and flickering lanterns.

[Cue soft piano melody.]

The camera pans up to the crescent moon, framed by steam and starlight.

-

[Back in the present, Lil Eve sighs dreamily.]

Lil Eve:
“That was your most theatrical date ever... and you weren’t even the dramatic couple.”

Vaporeon (smirking):
“They inspired the dramatics.”

Flareon (blushing):
“I only wore the tux because I lost a bet.”

Steelvee (offscreen):
“You two are the reason I trust water and fire type synergy.”

The projector dims. The grove chuckles. The romance lingers in the leaves.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 14: More Post-Immortal Siblings

[Scene: The same vibrant, terraformed planet. Noon. A crystalline sky hums above rustling alien forests. Lil Eve walks a floating trail of semi-organic stones, humming to herself.]

[Suddenly: The path ends.]

Bugvee (female), a twitchy, mischievous Bug-type Eevee with antennae made from woven moss and a leaf-pod tail ,  has constructed a towering barricade of alien cicada shells, their translucent forms still echoing with chirps from another ecosystem.

Bugvee (smirking):
"None shall pass, unless they love bugs."

Lil Eve (raising an eyebrow):
"I do love bugs. Just... warm."

She casually walks forward, leaving behind a Flamethrower Trail, the flames licking up the shells without harming the flora. They pop and vanish with soft “plink” sounds like bubble wrap. The path clears.

Bugvee (sighs):
“That's not entomologically respectful... but fair.”

-

[Moments later: The ground rumbles.]

Groundvee (male), a stoic Ground-type Eevee with mineral-crusted fur and eyes like cracked opals ,  rises up from a fissure in the path. The terrain splits and quakes in a miniature earthquake.

Groundvee (monotone):
“None shall pass... unless they respect tremors.”

Lil Eve:
“I do. But I also respect dry skin a little less.”

She leaps, forming a Surfing Waterfall beneath her feet. The crashing water rushes through the quake, saturating the soil and silencing the tremors in a gentle hiss. She lands neatly on the re-stabilized path.

Groundvee (sighs):
“Tectonics are underappreciated.”

-

Lil Eve (grinning at both):
"You two realize you're pulling pranks that are type-weak to your own sister... whose parents are literally Fireboy and Watergirl."

Bugvee (defensively):
“It’s called type-acceptance therapy.”

Groundvee (gruffly):
“...I just wanted someone to admire my plates.”

-

[All three start walking together. The path ahead glows faintly in tune with their steps.]

Lil Eve (smiling):
“You know, this is the weirdest family ever. I wouldn’t trade it for anything.”

The cicada shell remnants echo one last chirp. The path reforms. A leaf flutters by in a gust of stardust.

-

[Scene: The outer edges of a bioluminescent canyon, same planet, late afternoon. Unstable terrain marked by strange fungi and floating boulders. The air hums with odd tension.]

[Enter: Rockvee (male) ,  wide, silent, and always seen stacking rocks in increasingly absurd shapes. A balanced sculpture resembling a golem’s face teeters behind him.]

Rockvee (quietly, to himself):
“One more pebble... and balance is real.”

[Nearby: Poisonvee (female) ,  elegant but eerie, with bioluminescent stripes and toxic bloom petals along her tail ,  pokes at a cluster of extraterrestrial mushrooms that breathe when touched.]

Poisonvee (softly):
“These could paralyze an Onix... or make great nail polish.”

-

[Suddenly: chaos.]

Steelvee ,  still channeling angry Jack Black energy, chrome-slick and loud ,  storms in, clanging his shoulder plates together.

Steelvee (yelling):
“ROCKVEE, YOUR STACK SUCKS!”

Rockvee (turning slowly):
“You insulted sediment.”

[They charge. A boulder is thrown, a steel beam snapped.]

-

[Elsewhere: Poisonvee and Dragonvee face off.]

Dragonvee (female) ,  serpentine and cosmic-hued, floating just above the ground in a perpetual low-hover, wings made of aurora-light.

Dragonvee (snarling):
“Toxic mushrooms again? That’s your obsession.”

Poisonvee (hissing):
“At least I don’t sniff comets and pretend it's ‘aesthetic.’”

[Tail lashes and psychic bursts flare.]

-

[Enter: Lil Eve. Calm. Radiant. Holding a sandwich mid-bite.]

Lil Eve (sighs):
“Alright. Playtime's over.”

[She tosses the sandwich and enters battle mode.]

- Dazzling Gleam, a blinding flash across the sky, strikes Dragonvee, who yelps and spirals into a bush.

- Psybeam Focus, a tight spiral of light, locks Poisonvee mid-leap, trapping her in a dizzy hover.

- Surfing Waterfall, a smooth wall of water, crashes down onto Rockvee, flattening his stack into skipping stones.

- Flamethrower Trail, hot and elegant, singes Steelvee’s edges as she skates past him.

Steelvee (arms wide, yelling as sparks fly):
“I... AM STEELVEE!!”

Lil Eve (deadpan):
“Yeah, and I’m your fire extinguisher.”

[She flicks his nose with a final Ember. Steelvee dramatically crumples.]

Steelvee (softly):
“I... surrender... but... still Steelvee...”

-

[Up on a crystalline cliff, watching silently: Flareon and Vaporeon. Flareon is leaning against her; Vaporeon has a drink made of cloudfruit.]

Flareon (quietly, nostalgic):
“Our chaos extended family... so very us.”

Vaporeon (smiling):
“I blame you.”

Flareon:
“Fair.”

[Below, Lil Eve raises her arms. The kids groan, but start helping each other up.]

Vaporeon:
“She’s got it handled.”

Flareon:
“She is the balance point.”

[They watch the sun bend like a prism over the canyon. The future is weird, and they wouldn’t have it any other way.]

-

[Scene: The neon mist of the lower forest, thick with floating spores and luminous pollen. Lil Eve wanders through the glowing underbrush, tail flickering gently. Her senses tingle.]

Lil Eve (to herself, tired but amused):
“Another elemental sibling cluster. I can smell the pranks already.”

-

[Pan to a grassy glade where the next trio hangs out with older siblings.]

- Fightvee (male): Shirtless martial artist vibes, bandaged paws and a constant bounce in his step. Sparring with air.

- Flyvee (female): Light and carefree, hovering just above the grass, wind spiraling gently around her.

- Ghostvee (male): Shaded, partially translucent. His eyes glow dimly like candles under water. A gentle smile but slightly haunting.

Nearby: Bugvee and Groundvee chilling like tired camp counselors.

Bugvee (sipping mushroom tea):
“They’re the youngest batch. Haven’t wrecked a building yet. I’m proud.”

Groundvee (grunting):
“Yet.”

-

Lil Eve steps forward. Ghostvee notices her and floats closer.

Ghostvee (softly, wistful):
“Do you wanna know how I evolved?”

Lil Eve (smiling):
“Always.”

Ghostvee (looking to the stars above):
“I ran away after stealing sweets. Slipped off a cliff in a cave that shouldn’t exist. Found a soul gem mid-fall. Caught it. Felt myself... unmake... and remake.”

Bugvee (dry):
“He came back glowing and said, ‘Oops.’”

Groundvee:
“We all had therapy.”

Lil Eve (smirking):
“That's the most Ghostvee way to evolve.”

-

[Scene: The glowing glade fades into surreal low gravity as Lil Eve watches from the thistle-throne of moss and woven vines.]

[Across the floating field, Keldeo is now surrounded by nine glowing emblems suspended in the air, each one pulsing with a different elemental aura.]

A Cosmician Claydol speaks in monotone grandeur:

Cosmician Claydol:
“Keldeo of the Azure Spiral, you have been chosen for the Nine Elemental Trials.
These are your challenges: Bug, Fighting, Rock, Flying, Ground, Poison, Steel, Dragon, and Ghost.
Complete them, and ascend as the Cosmic Knight Prime of Balance and Buffoonery.”

Keldeo (nervous):
“...That last part wasn’t necessary.”

-

[Cut to Lil Eve watching from afar, crouched behind a gently levitating boulder.]

Lil Eve (sighs, amused):
“Here we go again. But this time, it’s his turn to get emotionally pulverized by symbolic elements.”

Ghostvee (hovering beside her):
“He’s gonna fail the Ghost Trial. No one’s ever ready for the mirror full of dead dreams.”

Bugvee (arms crossed):
“Bug Trial’s underrated. Giant cicada queen makes you relive every time you didn’t believe in yourself. Brutal.”

Groundvee (eating mud granola):
“Steel Trial turns your emotions into metal. You gotta literally forge your own heart. I cried.”

-

[Lil Eve stands up, tail glowing.]

Lil Eve (grinning):
“I better pack two towels, some Full Heals, and a big hug for after the Fighting Trial.”

[As Keldeo fumbles through his first trial, a temple made entirely of toxic mushrooms (Poison Trial), his allies and weird family watch from across the warped horizon, cheering, groaning, or taking bets.]

The grove sparkles. Absurdity blooms. The weird saga continues.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 15: Bastardized 8 Trials Plus 1

[Scene: Beneath a twinkling double-moon sky, Flareon and Vaporeon sit side-by-side on a hovering terrace of polished crystal moss, watching Keldeo stumble through the chaotic Poison Trial, where a pool of bubbling purple goo sings opera at him.]

Vaporeon (squinting):
“…That’s supposed to be the Water Trial?”
(gestures to the bubbling pool as a poison octopus throws sarcasm at Keldeo)
“My original trial was about learning to flow with direction. To become water, not drown in it.”

Flareon (grumbling):
“And the Fire Trial used to be about channeling one’s inner fire to create, not…”
(he points toward Keldeo being forced to flambé something called ‘Molten Custardbeast’)
“…not overcooking ancient meals made for lizard gods. What even is that?”

[Vaporeon sighs, presses a gentle button on a retro cassette remote. A reel-to-reel tape whirs. The sky dims slightly.]

Narration Tape: “Lil Eve: The Original Trials”

Eight glowing plates shimmer in order across the mist:

1. Grass – “Tests balance. Without harmony in temperature, nothing grows. You must learn when to yield and when to root.”

2. Water – “Tests direction. Flow without panic. Swim not just with strength, but purpose.”

3. Fire – “Tests temper. Fire creates, warms, comforts, when you will it, not when you lose it.”

4. Ice – “Tests preservation. Calm yourself, even when everything slips away.”

5. Fairy – “Tests the art of presence. Beauty, kindness, and charm, they shape how others feel your power.”

6. Dark – “Tests justice. Not all that’s right is gentle. Learn to see through shadows, and strike without cruelty.”

7. Psychic – “Tests wisdom. See the unseen. Solve the puzzle that is yourself.”

8. Electric – “Tests speed and consequence. A surge gives life, or ends it. Control the charge within.”

[The tape stops. Flareon casually tosses it into the air, where it combusts into glitter.]

Vaporeon (shaking her head, smiling):
“And now they’re just… copied. Worse, bastardized.”
(counts on fin)
“Poison tries to imitate Water. Steel took Ice’s exam and added anger. Ground’s mimicking Grass but with more tectonic guilt. Flying stole Electric’s homework. Fighting’s… Dark but with punches.”
Flareon adds dryly:
“Rock thinks it’s Fairy but is really just loud. Dragon completely misunderstood Fire. Bug thinks it’s Psychic but won’t stop buzzing.”
Vaporeon:
“…And Ghostvee’s just abusing immortality cooldowns for free retries.”

[Cut to Ghostvee lazily flying upside-down, sipping ethereal tea.]
Ghostvee:
“I learn best from posthumous failure.”

[Lil Eve, watching her boyfriend now being serenaded by sentient poison mushrooms, sighs and gets up.]

Lil Eve (stretching, then activating three moves at once):
“Well, someone’s gotta guide him through these knockoff nightmares…”
(tail flaring, water swirling, eyes glowing)
“Time for a cameo assist.”

[The elemental grove glows brighter again. The weirdly grand tale, as ever, continues.]

-

[Scene: Somewhere near the outskirts of the Elemental Trial Grounds...]

Regigigas (echoing like a broken temple bell):
“Pfft. Trials? More like playgrounds for type gimmicks. In my day we moved continents. This is baby mode.”

[He scoffs just as a faint “glorp” is heard below.]

Cue rapid-fire karma montage within Death Loop Tablet, Trial Style:

1. Poison Trial:
Regigigas slips, falls face-first into the poison pool. The goo sings a triumphant aria as he’s dragged under by tentacle-shaped mucus.
Poison Octopus (singing operatically):
“Ohh Giiiiiigas, you mock the test~ you now digest~”

2. Bug Trial:
Bursts out of goo, only to be swarmed by Bugvee’s alien cicada army. They start lecturing him about ancient entomological ethics while nibbling his joints.
Bugvee (mildly):
“Should’ve respected the shell stacks.”

3. Dragon Trial:
Still screeching, Regigigas is launched into the Dragon kitchen trial. A misfired Molten Custardbeast explodes on him. Flames dance, pans slap.
Dragonvee (snickering):
“He’s medium-rare now.”

4. Steel Trial:
Tries to escape but gets Iron Head’d by a steel door slamming shut on him. Then Steelvee suplexes him into a recycling furnace.
Steelvee (bellowing):
“I. AM. STEELVEEEEE!!!”

5. Ground Trial:
A quake splits the floor, Regigigas plummets into a collapsing subterranean garden. Crushed by giant dirt roses. Groundvee nods slowly.
Groundvee:
“The tectonics always win.”

6. Rock Trial:
Explodes out of the ground only to be instantly Wile-E-Coyote'd by a falling rock wall labeled “Rockvee’s Wall of Aesthetic Violence.” Blood spatters like jam.
Rockvee:
“Beauty hurts.”

7. Flying Trial:
Still limping, gets airlifted by Flying drones only to be pecked repeatedly by angry birds and swooped by aerial Sylveonbots illusions. One steals his wallet.
Flyvee (twirling midair):
“Do not question the winds, fossil.”

8. Ghost Trial:
Hauled into a mind-space by Ghostvee and a Gengar illusion. Reality distorts. Regigigas turns around, only to see his own face screaming.
Gengar (illusion, whispering):
“Death is a hallway with too many doors…”
Then they all vanish.

9. Fighting Trial:
Slams back into the arena gasping, only to be immediately met with an illusion of Machamp Requiem Mode.
Machamp Illusion (four fists pulsing, JoJo-style):
“This... is Fighting Wind Requiem.”
(he poses as thunder crashes)
“You mocked resolve. You mocked truth. Now:
ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA ORAAAA!!!”

Regigigas is pounded back into a crater so deep it breaks through the bottom of the test field and hits the cinematic archive room beneath.

[Cut to silence.]

Regigigas (from the hole, quietly):
“…I regret 12% of everything.”

Lil Eve (peering in from above, deadpan):
“Progress.”

[Scene: Crater pit. Regigigas wheezes, twitching after the brutal elemental combo. Goo drips, feathers scatter, illusions fade.]

Lil Eve peers down at the Death Loop Tablet, arms crossed, the poisoned mist parting around her.

Lil Eve (quietly, a little wistful):
“…The real Gengar and Machamp have been gone a long time.”

[She looks up at the sky where the stars seem to shimmer with echoes of old laughter and grunts.]

Lil Eve (softer):
“I still miss them sometimes…”

[Regigigas, still shivering, burbles through cracked stone and psychic burn marks:]

Regigigas:
“W-Who were they?! Ghosts?! Gods?! Punching nightmares?!”

Lil Eve (dry):
“Just friends. The kind that left echoes strong enough to slap sense into a titan.”

[She walks off. The crater hums as the past lets go, but not entirely.]

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 16: Trials but with Romantic Help

[Scene: The Nine Elemental Trials unfold across increasingly surreal domains, twisting the legacy of the original Eeveelution rites. Lil Eve supports from the shadows, while Keldeo forges his way, wielding the shifting sword bestowed by Ghostvee.]

=POISON TRIAL=
Toxic sludge pulses in concentric ripples. Keldeo begins coughing.
Lil Eve narrows her eyes and fires a Psybeam Focus, parting the miasma with psionic clarity.
She lifts him with gentle telekinesis over the bubbling pool.
Keldeo acquires: Poison Jab, the sword briefly glows virulent green, edges laced in venom.

=BUG TRIAL=
Puzzle-hives swarm with metallic cicada logic traps.
Lil Eve: “Nah.”
With a shrug, she incinerates the maze via Flamethrower Trail, leaving a scorched, clean path.
Keldeo earns: Bug Sting, a rapid, pinpoint jab mode.

=FLYING TRIAL=
A gauntlet of erratic drones and gust chambers.
Lil Eve: “Time to short-circuit.”
She zips through using Electro Drift, supercharging the drones to stabilize their erratic paths.
Keldeo receives: Dashing Upward Strike, optimized for aerial pursuit.

=FIGHTING TRIAL=
An octopus-shaped battle mech mimicking ancient martial styles.
Lil Eve blinds it with Dazzling Gleam, then locks limbs using Psybeam Focus.
Keldeo rushes in, parrying and striking in perfect form. Fightvee watches, nods, then yields.
Keldeo gains: Passive boost to fighting-type abilities + Knuckle Mode for the sword.

=GROUND TRIAL=
The subterranean garden rumbles violently.
Lil Eve wields Grassy Vines to root the terrain and Surfing Waterfall to irrigate, calming the quake.
Keldeo is rewarded: Ground Slam, sword can shift into a seismic anchor.

=ROCK TRIAL=
Crude boulder puzzles tower high.
Lil Eve beautifies the trial again, reshaping the area with Grassy Vines and Surfing Water, sculpting natural harmony.
Keldeo gains: Stone Edge Mode, juts of jagged stone spike from his strikes.

=STEEL TRIAL=
Giant spinning steel traps hover over molten platforms.
Lil Eve: “Unwinnable setup?”
She obliterates the hazard zones with Flamethrower Trail, melting traps to slag.
Keldeo makes it through. His sword morphs into Slash & Shield Mode.
He pauses, holding it with reverence.
Keldeo:
“…Reminds me of someone... Aegislash. Taught me form and stance. He was... sharp in every sense.”
Lil Eve nods solemnly.

=DRAGON TRIAL=
Chaos in the form of a cooking contest.
Lil Eve crafts frozen delicacies using Frost Print, then demands fairer judging with Dazzling Gleam.
Keldeo earns: Claw Mode, the blade now slashes with feral, serrated grace.

=GHOST TRIAL=
Ghostvee floats with smug confidence.
Lil Eve: Pulsive Foul Play
Ghostvee: KO’d instantly.
Trial auto-clears.
Keldeo gains: Dash Through Projectiles, brief intangibility step.

[Post-Trials, beneath the twin moons]
The sword now flickers through forms with ease.
Keldeo smiles, triumphant but mellow.

Keldeo (gently):
“…You made all of this… fun.”

Lil Eve (blushing faintly):
“You didn’t mind all the… excessive help?”

Keldeo:
“Not when the help is you.”

[He leans in and kisses her softly. She closes her eyes, hand resting over his heart. Their silhouettes glow gently under the cosmic night.]

Lil Eve (whispering):
“Another saga, huh?”

[The sword hums. Somewhere distant, stars shift.]

-

[Scene: Cosmic Atelier, Somewhere adrift in a quiet solar reef, surrounded by aurora storms and translucent space reefs. Inside a glass-laced observatory dome, Lil Eve and Keldeo sit together at a shimmering terminal shaped like an old arcade cabinet crossed with a star projector.]

Lil Eve (excited):
“Okay, so in EveX Kelzero, you play as us, duh, but like, rebooted.”

Keldeo (grinning, tweaking code):
“You get ranged tech attacks and I get melee slashes and sword styles. But we swap mid-battle when combo meter’s full.”

[A holographic sprite of EveX dashes across a retro cyber-nebula. Kelzero bursts onto the screen in blazing entrance slash, both characters now digitized with fluid pixel-perfect flair.]

-

[Meanwhile: In the same observatory’s testing chamber, neon-slick, low-grav chamber lit by floating screens and AI commentators ,  their two kids, Cosmician Rapidash and Galaxian Gastrier, are locked in joyful combat with digital enemies.]

Cosmician Rapidash (voice blazing, holding the retro-styled controller in flames):
“Dad’s sword combo is broken… I love it.”
He triggers an overheat slash, screen flashes red.

Galaxian Gastrier (calm and giggling, controller glowing in psychic hue):
“Mom’s tech spam is cheating, but I like the hover jump.”
She triggers a psychic wave while floating midair, evading beautifully.

-

[Back at the dev terminal.]

Keldeo (glancing proudly at the test feed):
“They’re better than we were at that age.”

Lil Eve (playfully smug):
“Correction: they’re better than you were. I always carried the team.”

Keldeo:
“Oh really now? Rematch, dev-side debug tools only?”

Lil Eve:
“You’re on.”

[The camera pans out. Stars swirl. A faint silhouette of Megaman X and Zero is briefly seen reflected on the glass, fading into EveX and Kelzero.]

[Title splash appears: “EveX Kelzero: Beyond Data & Soul”]

Cosmician & Galaxian (cheering in unison):
“MAKE THE DLC!”

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Lil Eve's Megaman X-ish Abilities Recap:
1. Grass -> Grassy Vines - A living tether she could now control like a grappling hook in warm, balanced environments.
2. Water -> Surfing Waterfall - She could now generate clean surges of water to cross rivers, ascend streams. (renamed from Surf Waterfall)
passive: Cool her body in moments of stress. Infinite water breathing.
3. Fire -> Flamethrower Trail - Leaving blazing paths behind her, capable of melting ice, searing grass, and igniting new possibilities. The flames burned brighter when fueled by spicy food.
passive: Heat-resistant. But cannot swim during activation.
4. Ice -> Frost Print - The power to conjure and 3D-print icicle sculptures for tools, weapons, or art.
passive: Cold and slip resistance.
5. Fairy -> Dazzling Gleam - Emits radiant light in dark zones, capable of stunning or blinding opponents.
6. Dark -> Pulsive Foul Play - A slap infused with mind-numbing force, scaling with the opponent’s own strength.
7. Psychic -> Psybeam Focus - Can fire a precise mental beam. Can levitate and manipulate objects. Can create minor localized tremors
8. Electric -> Electro Drift - Dash at lightning speed. Electrify objects and surroundings.
passive: Gain temporary resistance to Electric damage.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Keldeo's Megaman Zero-ish abilities
- Poison -> Poison Jab =  the sword briefly glows virulent green, edges laced in venom.
- Bug -> Bug Sting =  a rapid, pinpoint jab mode.
- Flying -> Dashing Upward Strike =  optimized for aerial pursuit.
- Fighting -> Passive boost to fighting-type abilities + Knuckle Mode for the sword.
- Ground -> Ground Slam =  sword can shift into a seismic anchor.
- Rock -> Stone Edge Mode =  juts of jagged stone spike from his strikes.
- Steel -> Slash & Shield Mode = Aegislash's training throwback.
- Dragon -> Claw Mode =  the blade now slashes with feral, serrated grace.
- Ghost -> Dash Through Projectiles =  brief intangibility step.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 17: Boss Rush Hall

[Scene: Ghostvee’s Boss Rush Hall, an ever-shifting arena lined with elemental banners, gleaming crystals, and runes pulsing with eerie light. 
No Normal or Ghost types appear, by design. Each combatant faces their legacy.]

-

Lil Eve’s Path – The Original 8
1. Flareon Illusion
Her father’s fiery echo. The moment the illusion roars, Lil Eve responds with Surfing Waterfall, extinguishing it with a wave of graceful instinct, a symbolic nod to her inherited elemental balance.

2. Jolteon Illusion
An old school friend of her parents. The speed nearly overwhelms her. She channels Psybeam Focus, causing terrain disruption, not enough to win easily, but enough to break the rhythm. She improvises, and learns.

3. Vaporeon Illusion
Her mother’s soft yet fluid echo. Lil Eve counters with Grassy Vines and Electro Drift, barely holding momentum as the battlefield keeps shifting. She wins, drenched but smiling.

4. Espeon Illusion
Her paternal grandmother’s measured presence. She unleashes Pulsive Foul Play, raw, dark and precise, dissolving the illusion with surprising ease.

5. Umbreon Illusion
The harsh stern energy of her paternal grandfather. Dazzling Gleam lights up the shadowed hall. The dimly lit battle forces her to focus, she perseveres through the murk.

6. Leafeon Illusion
An elderly projection of her maternal grandfather. She combines Flamethrower Trial and Frost Print, destabilizing temperature and throwing the illusion off balance, a blend of burning fire and crystalline control.

7. Glaceon Illusion
Her maternal grandmother’s cold projection. Melted away by Flamethrower Trial, Lil Eve does not flinch as she clears the ice with respect.

8. Sylveon Illusion
The most unpredictable, her former teacher’s echo. Resistant to direct counters. Lil Eve uses the arena itself: redirects poison pools with Psybeam Focus, and attracts steel arms with Electro Drift, letting the environment assist. She stands victorious… just barely.

-

Keldeo’s Path – The New 8
1. Bugvee Illusion
Crushed swiftly with Dashing Upward Strike and Stone Edge Mode. He moves fast, no hesitation.

2. Dragonvee Illusion
A raw duel of draconic forces, Claw Mode versus Claw. Blow for blow, he wins with sheer agility and experience.

3. Rockvee Illusion
Using Ground Slam to shatter the battlefield, and switching to Knuckle Mode and Slash & Shield Mode for defense. Tactical victory.

4. Groundvee Illusion
Toughest for him. No elemental edge. He improvises with weaker water-based techniques. Grit and tenacity get him through.

5. Poisonvee Illusion
Handled swiftly with Ground Slam, shaking the arena under toxic fields.

6. Flyvee Illusion
High-altitude battle. Stone Edge Mode intercepts from below, Keldeo times his strikes with sharp precision.

7. Fightvee Illusion
A brutal test. His own skills are mirrored. Dashing Upward Strike proves essential for interrupting Fightvee’s aerial barrages.

8. Steelvee Illusion
The wildest. Slamming down with Ground Slam, then switching mid-combo to Knuckle Mode for close quarters, he finishes with sheer brute force.

-

[Finale: Reunion Hall]

[Lil Eve walks into the lighted exit corridor, where her parents Vaporeon and Flareon await, both real. Without a word, she hugs them both, a calm, nostalgic grin on her face.]

Lil Eve:
“Sorry for the wham. They weren’t you… but still.”

Vaporeon (smiling):
“They were us, once. But we raised you for this.”

Flareon (laughing):
“Besides, you really smoked my illusion. Oof.”

[Behind them, a crystal display shows the whole montage, broadcasted sneakily by Ghostvee. The parents watched every second.]

-

[Keldeo arrives just as Lil Eve finishes her hug.]

Keldeo (wiping forehead):
“That… was something.”

Lil Eve (smirking):
“I know.”
She pulls him in for a kiss.

-

Final Chamber – The Regigigas Illusion
A massive chamber filled with suspended gravity and floating ruins. The illusion roars.

Keldeo (cracking knuckles):
“Let’s finish it.”

[He activates Knuckle Mode and rushes in, slamming the illusion Regigigas with a blow charged with all his trial-earned powers.]

[However… far away… the real Regigigas, who was watching through the Death Loop Tablet, suddenly twitches. He feels it.]

Regigigas (distant voiceover):
“WAIT NO, AAARGH NOT AGAIN!”

[He's slammed into molten metal, slammed by bugs, spooked by ghosts, and now gut-punched from another dimension. The poor titan flips over, face-first into steel goo.]

-

Lil Eve (watching the illusion fall):
“...Did that feel a bit too real?”

Keldeo (nervously):
“...We might need to check on the real one.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 18: They Noticed Saga 1 Humor is Back

[Scene: Somewhere nearby, a pristine snowy ledge overlooking the Boss Rush arena’s aftermath.]

Alolan Ninetales (lounging dramatically on a floating glacier platform):
“Two. Billion. Years. That’s how long it took to bring the tone back to something resembling the first saga's goofy energy.”

[She looks directly at the screen. 4th wall breaking.]

Alolan Ninetales:
“I mean, remember when Lil Eve was just trying to figure out how to slap with Dazzling Gleam without vaporizing the floor? Now we got ghost trials, death mirrors, and reality-splitting swords. Somebody had to say it.”

[Gardevoir walks in through a sparkle-teleport, folding her arms.]

Gardevoir:
“It’s not our fault the tone dipped. Everything went downhill when Ceruledge showed up with that edge-core monologue and, oh, right, temporary killed Jolteon and Zoroark.”

Alolan Ninetales:
“Yeah. That arc was all smoke, swords, and soul trauma. Pure trauma spice. I swear the only jokes back then were… well, none.”

[Cut to Vaporeon and Flareon, quietly sitting nearby with hot cocoa in their paws.]

Vaporeon (staring into the mug):
“That… actually still gets to me. But...”

Flareon (gently patting her back):
“...we’ve moved forward. It doesn’t hurt as bad anymore.”

[Vaporeon nods quietly, holding the warmth close.]

-

[Meanwhile, Lil Eve and Keldeo are just a bit further away, examining the aftermath of the Regigigas incident.]

Keldeo (looking back):
“…Was that Alolan Ninetales talking to the wall?”

Lil Eve:
“She’s probably just rebooting the comedic meta-thread.”

Keldeo:
“Should we be worried?”

Lil Eve:
“…Nah. Let her cook. We earned a breather.”

-

[Scene: Inside Ghostvee’s completed Boss Rush Archive. The Immortal Six sit before a screen projecting curated tapes, memories and records of centuries past.]

[Footage: Tinkaton's divine gavel crushes a torn Darkrai into a 200-year dream sentence, sped into 1 real-life month. Cut to: Tinkaton lying beside her husband Tyranitar, both silently haunted, no revealed dialogues, only shown regretful gazes.]

-

Gardevoir (stoic, but voice tinged with memory):
“…That was the turning point. When Ceruledge killed Jolteon and Zoroark, the tone of our journey changed. The comedy left. Everything became real.”

Alolan Ninetales (half-grin, half-grimace):
“And it took two billion years to finally get that comedy back. Just a moment of levity, a touch of absurdity again.”

Flareon (quiet, eyes shadowed):
“They weren’t family, but they were friends. Jolteon had a spark that outlived his own lightning. Zoroark… made illusions feel honest. Ho-Oh brought them back… only to die much later. We all saw it.”

Vaporeon (calm, but heavy):
“Ho-Oh used his miracle to bring them back in Saga 2. And he fell with final revival during Regigigas' rampage in Saga 4. He gave us time… but not eternity.”

Lil Eve (nostalgic):
“I remember Jolteon. His pranks made me snort-leaf out of my ears. Zoroark told me illusions are just stories in motion… I loved that.”

Keldeo (smiles wistfully):
“Jolteon zapped my water spells for fun. Zoroark made me look ten years older just to sneak me into a movie once. I never forgot them.”

-

[Screen glitches. Regigigas appears, spectral and sour, still locked in the Death Loop Tablet.]

Regigigas (deadpan):
“Oh great. Flashback theatre again. Meanwhile I’m getting Arceus-lasered every hour and watching fake Mew perform interpretive dance death moves.”

Gardevoir (dry):
“You earned it. We're all here because you survived... and because you broke so much first.”

Alolan Ninetales (flicking tail):
“There are seven of us. You included. Two billion years... we lived it together. Don't act like we forgot.”

Regigigas (grumbling):
“Yeah? Then why am I the one watching fake Machamp whisper ‘Fighting Wind Requiem’ before punching my soul into a spreadsheet?”

Flareon (gruff):
“Because Ho-Oh died cleaning up your mess. And that debt’s still unpaid.”

Vaporeon (firmly):
“You did save us in the end. We took on the immortality burden so the world wouldn’t fracture again. But salvation doesn’t erase destruction.”

Lil Eve (grinning):
“By the way, we added you as the first boss in EveX Kelzero. You’re the tutorial punching bag.”

Keldeo (elbowing the air):
“Knuckle Mode says hi. We even gave you comically large hitboxes.”

-

Regigigas (groaning as a Machamp illusion reloads in the background):
“Great. Two billion years later, I’m downgraded to comic relief. Mewtwo had it easy. He just left.”

[Off-screen: Illusion Machamp loads again.]

“This is… Fighting Wind Requiem. You will never reach the truth…”

-

[The screen fades. Silence falls.]

Gardevoir (softly):
“…Ho-Oh believed in rebirth even after ruin. His fire may be gone, but he lives in every act of defiance against despair.”

Alolan Ninetales (eyes closed):
“We miss him more than we admit. But we live... because he chose to fall instead of letting us.”

Lil Eve (quiet smile):
“Then we keep moving. Light steps forward, even if the shadows follow.”

Keldeo (stretching):
“That’s all that matters. Now… time to go prank Regigigas with a new debug patch.”

-

[Scene resumes in the ancient echoing halls of Ghostvee’s Boss Rush Archive. The screen now dims, fading from Tinkaton's verdict footage. A new tape quietly ends. A single image lingers, Ho-Oh’s final recorded still: wings ablaze, casting radiant light across a devastated battlefield.]

[Silent reverence holds the room.]

Alolan Ninetales (lowering head):
“…Thank you, Ho-Oh. For bringing Mamoswine back… even if only for one more winter.”

Gardevoir (bowed posture, voice calm):
“You returned Lucario to me… long enough to say goodbye the right way. I am grateful.”

Flareon (hushed, nodding):
“You saved our daughter.”

Vaporeon (softly):
“And gave her the future she never would've had… with Keldeo by her side.”

-

[Lil Eve and Keldeo stand quietly at the back, both solemn.]

Lil Eve (reflecting):
“…We died, didn’t we? That first stone slam.”

Keldeo (nodding, quiet):
“All five of us. Regigigas went out of control. Ho-Oh… brought us all back. Us two… Tyranitar, Lucario, Mamoswine…”

Lil Eve:
“And paid for it with himself. Too old, too tired. But still chose us.”

[The screen flickers to the Death Loop Tablet. Regigigas is seen getting stone slammed repeatedly, this time by his own illusion within the loop. A glowing counter hovers above his head: “Karmic Repayment Remaining: 2,096,434,269 years.”]

Keldeo (deadpan):
“Well, he’s still busy. We got time.”

Lil Eve (smirking):
“Let’s go. EveX Kelzero isn’t gonna code itself.”

-

[Later: inside Lil Eve and Keldeo’s cozy dev chamber. The two are at a pixel art desk. Lil Eve adjusts a sprite: Regigigas, oversized and ridiculous, mid-explosion.]

Keldeo:
“So… he’s the first boss and the final boss?”

Lil Eve:
“Exactly. Classic Sigma. Tutorial dummy who comes back with cosmic vengeance.”

Keldeo:
“Still easier than fighting Machamp’s Requiem spam.”

Lil Eve:
“And ten times more dramatic.”

-

[Back in the tablet loop, Regigigas lays face-down, smoking after a dramatic combo from his own illusion.]

Regigigas (groaning):
“I wish Ho-Oh would just finish me off already. Be poetic. Full circle, right?”

[Suddenly, a random flaming phoenix swoops in from the sky, screeches, and vaporizes Regigigas in one fiery slam.]

Regigigas (voice from offscreen):
“…That wasn’t even Ho-Oh. Who the hell was that?!”

[Text flashes: “Respawning in 7 minutes… 2,096,434,268.986 years remaining.”]

Regigigas (distantly):
“Kill me slower next time, you off-brand turkey!”

-

[End scene. The camera pans upward as soft light glows from the flashback image of Ho-Oh, forever suspended in glory. The six immortals, and one bound titan, continue on their paths, stories eternal.]

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 19: EveX KelZero Cozy Devs

[Scene opens in a cozy glowing dev room, cluttered with retro monitors, snack wrappers, and sketches pinned to the wall. A large stylized poster reads: EveX Kelzero, Beta Test Begins!]

[Lil Eve sits in her usual seifuku, now sporting large oval glasses that slightly slide down her nose as she types. Her expression is calm, laser-focused. Her long ears twitch with each keystroke. A mug labeled “debug me gently” sits by her keyboard.]

Keldeo (in gakuran, leaning against her chair, arms crossed):
“…You know, you look insanely cute with those glasses.”

Lil Eve (adjusts glasses, without looking up):
“Thanks.”
[She glances up with a smirk. Her tone dips to velvet.]
“Wanna test more than just the game?”

Keldeo (blinks, then grins):
“You’re not subtle anymore.”

[Without hesitation, he scoops her up in a smooth bridal carry. Her glasses jostle slightly, but she laughs softly.]

Lil Eve (resting her head on his shoulder):
“You’re warm.”
[She kisses him on the cheek.]

Keldeo:
“Your glasses are… soft. They’re touching my face weirdly. I like it.”

-

[They return to work ,  Lil Eve now coding with one hand while sitting cross-legged in Keldeo’s lap, Keldeo sketching animations of sprite enemies with his pencil stylus.]

[A monitor displays a test level: pixel Lil Eve in magical attire firing Psybeam arcs while Keldeo slashes glowing hex-bugs with Knuckle Mode.]

Lil Eve (softly):
“…This is the kind of story I used to daydream about. Nerdy magical girl saves the world with a soft but strong boyfriend.”

Keldeo (smirking, still sketching):
“Plot twist: you’re both the magical girl and the boss fight. I’m just the sword.”

Lil Eve (giggles):
“You’re the whole combat system, dummy.”

[A message pings on the side monitor: Cosmician Rapidash and Galaxian Gastrier have logged in to playtest. Their kids are online. The screen splits to show them excitedly button mashing in their cozy room.]

Cosmician (male Fire/Dark):
“Can I play as Dad? I wanna punch that fake Regigigas boss again!”

Galaxian (female Water/Psychic):
“Mom has like… ten movement options. This is so unfair.”

[Lil Eve and Keldeo glance at each other.]

Keldeo:
“They grow up so fast.”

Lil Eve:
“Let’s make sure they never outscore us.”

[They fist bump, the screen flashing as the beta test begins in earnest.]

-

[Final shot: Regigigas’ sprite appears on screen, with the words “FINAL BOSS ,  VERSION BETA 0.01.” A debugging textbox on the side reads: “Regigigas AI: broken (again). Respawn loop enabled.”]

Regigigas (voice from tablet background):
“Stop coding me to suffer!”

-

[Scene: EveX Kelzero - In-Game Stage 3: “Labyrinth of Lost Signals”]

[Player 1: Cosmician Rapidash – Fire/Dark hybrid armor, red flame trail as he dashes, gauntlet-based melee. Moveset: Dash Burst, Flame Spin, Shadow Jab]
[Player 2: Galaxian Gastrier – Water/Psychic themed dress, levitating idle stance, glowing eyes. Moveset: Wave Cannon, Mind Pull, Reflect Bubble]

[HUD reads: CO-OP MODE – Team: LilKnight and PrismSiren]

Cosmician (via voice chat):
“You got the left corridor, sis? Bet I finish my half faster.”

Galaxian (coolly):
“Bet you die to the first laser crab like always.”

[Split screen: Cosmician zips forward through flame pillars, lands a perfect combo on glitching bugbots. Galaxian calmly levitates past a spike maze, disables traps with psychic pulses.]

Cosmician (punching corrupted Regigigas mini-bot):
“This guy again?! Mom and Dad love putting him everywhere.”

Galaxian (sighs as she Reflect Bubbles a second one into a wall):
“Mom coded it. Dad kept designing new helmets for him. You know how they are.”

-

[Cutscene Trigger: Double boss fight ,  Holo Illusion of “Sigma Gigas Beta” appears, splits into two clones mid-battle. Music kicks up in glitchy techno rock.]

Cosmician:
“Call it: I punch mine, you psychic nuke yours?”

Galaxian:
“Try not to get uppercutted into space again.”

[Cosmician uses Shadow Jab into Flame Spin, bouncing between walls like a pinball. Galaxian charges Wave Cannon while floating in reverse gravity, spirals her attack through shifting portals.]

[Double KO lands at same time. Game slows to cinematic slow-mo finish with pixel confetti. Text pops up: “Sibling Sync Bonus Achieved!”]

-

[Scene shifts to in-game reward room: pixel chibis of Lil Eve and Keldeo wave at them, giving each a badge: “Beta Explorers”]

Cosmician (grinning IRL):
“Yo… we crushed it. You think Dad saw that?”

Galaxian:
“Definitely. He’s probably sketching a boss version of us already.”

[Back in dev room: Lil Eve and Keldeo watching proudly from debug monitor, sharing instant ramen and giggling at the kids’ banter.]

Lil Eve:
“They’re stronger than we were.”

Keldeo:
“…but just chaotic enough to be ours.”

Lil Eve (smiles with soft tone):
“Think they’ll carry the game if we ever... need to stop?”

Keldeo (without hesitation):
“Nope. They’ll evolve it.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 20: The Devs School Immortals Origins

[Flashback Tape: Title – “The Day the Two Were Born”]
Presented in soft faded colors, lined with gentle ambient harp and strings.

[Scene: Umbreon’s Hospital – Moonlight Pediatrics, 2 billion years ago (9 days after 3rd Saga events)]
Umbreon (in white doctor’s coat and glasses) gently holds a newborn Keldeo, freshly wrapped in blue blankets. His voice is calm but firm.

Umbreon:
“Healthy. Sturdy build. But he won't carry Mythical blood, his structure’s based on the form, not the lineage.”

[Next to him, Espeon flips through a glowing book titled ‘Divinity, DNA, and Heritage.’ She adjusts her crescent glasses.]

Espeon:
“His mother’s a mortal. A Galarian Rapidash, no divine link. And Gastrier, the father… pure Ice-type, but fully mortal, and properly male. It's not a bad thing, but sensitive.”

[In the recovery bed, Galarian Rapidash looks tired but smiles.]

Galarian Rapidash:
“…Can I… Can I see Umbreon’s granddaughter? I heard she was just born days ago…”

[Umbreon nods, leaving momentarily and returning with a very small newborn Lil Eve, swaddled in lavender cloth with star prints. Their tiny forms face each other on the bed’s edge.]

[The infants reach with barely-coordinated hooves and paws. They touch gently. The room is silent, reverent.]

Umbreon (quietly, observing):
“…We still need to ensure Lil Eve gets proper feeding from her mother.”

[The door opens, Vaporeon, in maternity school uniform, walks in, looking warm and radiant despite visible tiredness.]

Vaporeon:
“There you are, my little star.”

[She kneels beside the bed, takes Lil Eve into her arms, and nurses her gently while humming. Galarian Rapidash watches with calm joy. Moments later, Flareon enters, wearing his schoolboy uniform with his badge tilted.]

Flareon:
“…She looks just like you.”

[He leans in to gently kiss Vaporeon’s cheek as she cradles Lil Eve. The family moment is warm, quiet.]

[Once they leave, Galarian Rapidash calls softly.]

Galarian Rapidash:
“…Aegislash?”

[The loyal ghost-steel knight floats in silently through the corridor, saluting.]

Aegislash:
“…You called.”

Galarian Rapidash:
“This foal will grow up as more than just a colt. When his time comes… train him.”

Aegislash:
“I swear it upon my blade. He shall become a knight worth the honor.”

-

[Back to present: EveX Kelzero HQ – cozy couch corner]
The room is warm-lit. Retro console sounds hum in the background. Outside, virtual auroras shimmer on the debug monitors.

[Vaporeon (still in her forever-maid outfit) has Flareon (in his tidy butler attire) peacefully napping on her lap. She bridal-carries him while humming a slow tune, stroking his fur with her tail as he sleeps.]

[Lil Eve and Keldeo are seated nearby on a couch, hand-in-hand, fingers interlaced more tightly than usual. A hint of warmth on their cheeks. Keldeo stares into the soft lights, pensive.]

Keldeo (softly):
“…I didn’t know they brought us together that early.”

Lil Eve:
“I didn’t either. But maybe we remembered. Somehow.”

[Vaporeon looks up from Flareon to the young couple. Her voice is dreamy but heartfelt.]

Vaporeon:
“You two were adorable even then… just small and sleepy little things. Now look at you… lovers, creators, warriors… immortals.”

[Flareon stirs slightly in her arms, but stays sleeping. Vaporeon kisses his forehead.]

Vaporeon (whispering):
“…Thank you… for giving her to me.”

[Scene fades gently to the soft glow of the debug monitor, "EveX Kelzero – Beta Patch Ready."]

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 21: Trainings Since 8 Years Old

[Scene opens: VHS-style flicker, cue flashback tape #X121-C]

Eight years after Saga 3, five years before Saga 4.
Keldeo, age 8, stands firm in a dirt arena surrounded by trimmed hedges and floating training dummies in Aegislash’s private garden dojo. Aegislash, formal as always, floats beside him and swings his sacred sword in deliberate, instructional arcs.

Aegislash: “Focus. Blade and shield are not extensions of you, they are you.”

Keldeo mimics the movements, replicating a melee combo that transitions into a guard stance. He stumbles, but Lil Eve, also 8, watching from the side with her normal Eevee fur and small ribbon, claps excitedly.

Lil Eve: “You’re so cool, Kel! Beat those dummies up!”

Keldeo blushes slightly and grins wide.

Keldeo: “I promise, I’ll protect you. Forever. No matter what.”

From the sideline, Galarian Rapidash, Espeon, and Leafeon quietly observe.
Leafeon comments in his calm, rustic tone:

Leafeon: “I’ve already given her a good amount of self-defense… in my garden. Absol helped. It’s not just flowers anymore.”

They watch proudly as the next generation begins to bloom.

-

[Scene cuts to present day training room]
Keldeo now, with immortality in his eyes and strength in his form, uses Slash & Shield Mode against a robotic dummy that fights back. Sparks fly as he counters effortlessly, ending with a stylish parry and knockback.

Lil Eve, in her seifuku and glasses, nods with nostalgic recognition.

-

[Flashback tape #X122-A rolls]
Lil Eve, younger, is seen in Leafeon’s garden, now fully a training ground. She spars against Absol, ducking and weaving, her tiny body built for speed. Leafeon barks light corrections as she strikes. The camera pans to the sideline, 

Glaceon, calmly licking a shaved ice at the time, watches the session. Nearby, Pikachu, her shop assistant, stands nervously as his girlfriend, Alolan Raichu, holds out a Thunderstone.

He watches Lil Eve train, looking down at his paws.

Pikachu: “Even the next gen’s movin’ forward…”

Without much hesitation, he touches the stone.
A flash.
He becomes Kantonian Raichu, taller and more grounded.

Raichu: “Guess it’s time I stopped pretending to be the chosen one. Let’s do this… together.”

He hugs Alolan Raichu. They plan their future, kids and soft electric ice cream dreams.

-

[Back to the present, soft fade-in]
Alolan Ninetales, walking in from the hallway, chuckles and looks into the camera like it’s a sitcom.

Alolan Ninetales: “Even Pikachu figured it out, huh? No more plot armor. Just life.”

She winks and walks away as faint electric giggles are heard from the past.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 22: Giga Math Balls

[Scene: Immortal Six HQ, training room corner – the Regigigas Death Loop Tablet screen flickers.]

Display: 2096434268.6969 years remaining

Gardevoir squints and lets out a soft, elegant giggle.

Gardevoir: “.6969… Really? After everything, this is what fate settled on?”

She chuckles in disbelief, shaking her head, until... 

Alolan Ninetales SLAMS a chalkboard beside her with a clang and whips out a pointer like she’s in an over-the-top anime teacher role.

Alolan Ninetales: “FOOL! You’re missing the deeper beauty of the number!”

She spins around dramatically, drawing furious circles and numbers.

Alolan Ninetales: “Observe:
2096434268.6969 equals 2.0964342686969 × 10⁹!
See?! The 9 sitting above the 10! This is mathematical foreshadowing! An ice-type prophecy!!”

Gardevoir, bemused but polite, listens with grace.

Gardevoir: “That… is scientific notation in the Giga scale. Gigigas, if you will. Also... ‘wtf is this coincidence?’”

They both burst out laughing, Gardevoir’s refined and musical, Alolan Ninetales’ more maniacal and smug.
From within the Death Loop Tablet, Regigigas begins laughing too.

Regigigas: “PFFFF, Giga scale!! That’s my brand!! HAHAHA...”

Suddenly, sharp ice spikes erupt from beneath him.

Regigigas: “...AAAAAAAAGGGH NOT AGAIN!!”

Blood sprays violently, and chunks of his body freeze solid as the loop resets.
His scream echoes like a banshee tossed in a freezer.

Tablet voiceover: “Resetting loop. 2,096,434,268.6968 years remaining…”

Alolan Ninetales twirls around smugly again.

Alolan Ninetales: “And thus, the power of math delivers justice… and punchlines.”

Gardevoir: “...I still don’t know if you’re a genius or an absolute fool.”

Alolan Ninetales: “Why not both?”
She throws a snowball at the fourth wall.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 23: Math and Code Duel

[Scene continues in the training room, where Regigigas just suffered another ridiculous death in the Death Loop Tablet.]

Alolan Ninetales adjusts her new square-rimmed glasses, still dazzling in her eternal blue frilly sundress. She raises a paw with the elegance of a pompous academic.

Alolan Ninetales: “You see, back when I was a young Alolan Vulpix on the original Alolan islands, about 2 gigayears ago…”

Regigigas immediately flails and dies again on screen.

Regigigas: “NOOOO STOP CALLING IT THAT... URKGHGH...”

The screen flashes:
Resetting loop. 2,096,434,268.6967 years remaining…

Meanwhile, Lil Eve, still in her eternal seifuku uniform and stylish oval nerd glasses, is sitting peacefully in front of her glowing terminal, coding game logic using mathematical formulas.

Alolan Ninetales notices.

Alolan Ninetales: “A fellow math user?! I challenge you to a math duel, nerd-to-nerd!”

Lil Eve (smiling shyly): “Okay… but this is gonna be a breather after that 80-line bug.”

-

Math Duel Begins
First Challenge: Trigonometry

Alolan Ninetales grins smugly and draws a perfect triangle.

Alolan Ninetales:
Right triangle with sides:
- a = 9
- b = 9
- hypotenuse = √18
She cackles like she just summoned a legendary Pokémon with Pythagoras’ ghost.

Lil Eve calmly draws on her 2D grid instead:

Lil Eve:
Let point A = (6, 9)
Let point B = (-6, -9)
Distance formula:  
√[(6 - (-6))² + (9 - (-9))²] = √[(12)² + (18)²] = √(144 + 324) = √468 = 6√13
Lil Eve: “So the distance between A and B is 6√13.”

Alolan Ninetales gasps.

-

Second Challenge: Sigma Notation

Alolan Ninetales scribbles wildly:

Alolan Ninetales:
∑ (x^9) from x = 1 to 9
Then she freezes.

Alolan Ninetales: “...uh... does anyone want to expand that?”

Lil Eve spins in her chair and opens her code editor:
total = 0
for x in range(1, 10):
    total += x**9
print(total)

Terminal Output: 220008135489

Lil Eve: “And that’s the sum. Easy.”

-

Alolan Ninetales collapses into a dignified sitting pose, defeated but admiring.

Alolan Ninetales: “You win. Teach me, Lil Eve. How do you apply math in real life?”

Lil Eve (softly):

“We upgraded. Your era’s math teaching was stuck in chalkboard purgatory. Ours lets us build games with math.”

Alolan Ninetales (nodding): “No wonder I failed to understand Sigma properly back in the day… I thought he was just a boss from Megaman X…”

They both laugh as the screen behind them shows Regigigas dying again, this time getting flattened by a π-shaped meteor.

Regigigas: “WHY IS PI INVOLVED NOW...”
Resetting loop...

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 24: While True Death Loop

[Scene resumes in the EveX Kelzero dev room, monitors glowing, and game engine open.]

Keldeo, still in his signature black gakuran and holding his training sword, leans over Lil Eve’s shoulder.

Keldeo: “Hey, Eve. Mind using my Regigigas sprite as a test dummy? Let’s stress-test the death loop code.”

Lil Eve, adjusting her oval nerd glasses, nods casually and types:

-

while True:
____spawn(Regigigas)
____move_to_crusher(Regigigas)
____wait(1)
____explode(Regigigas)
-
On the dev screen, Regigigas appears…
crushed.
explodes.
respawns.
crushed again.
explodes again.

Repeat. Infinitely.
-
Meanwhile, actual Regigigas, still trapped in the Death Loop Tablet, is visibly disturbed.

Regigigas: “Is… is this your revenge, Keldeo?! You mocking me?!”

Keldeo, squinting at the screen, replies bluntly:

Keldeo: “What? No. That’s just… coincidental. That’s literally the game engine doing a while true. Chill.”

Regigigas: “It’s the exact same pain!!”

Lil Eve pauses, smiles playfully, grabs a blank sheet, draws a giant ∞ symbol, and carefully tapes it over the Regigigas Death Loop Tablet screen.

Lil Eve: “Fixed.”

Then, with no warning, Lil Eve slides her hands under Keldeo, lifts him in a bridal carry, catching him off-guard.

Keldeo: “Wha...!?”

She kisses him sweetly on the cheek and begins walking out of the room calmly, still wearing her oval glasses and eternal seifuku.

Lil Eve (softly): “Break time. You worked hard.”

-

As the two leave, a muffled explosion is heard from the dev monitor.

Regigigas: “AAAAAAAAHHHHHH!”
Respawning...

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 25: Otaku and Nerds Corners

[Scene: Dev studio courtyard, pink evening glow under sakura-like pixel tree. Lil Eve still bridal-carrying Keldeo in eternal school uniforms.]

They wander past rows of developers, gigabytes of WIPs, and find…

Poisonvee, wearing a slightly torn frilly labcoat over her purple-black seifuku, working on her latest bizarre creation:
"Yandere.exe: Toxic Love Simulator"

She spots them and instantly wheezes in awe.

Poisonvee: “OHHHH, you’re actually carrying him?! Eve, you’re peak seifuku shoujo romance energy!! This is giving me material for DLC!”

Lil Eve sighs with a smile, still holding Keldeo effortlessly.

Lil Eve: “I’m too immortal to be a Yandere. That kind of insecurity doesn’t suit me.”

Keldeo: “Yeah, Yandere girls would treat me like a sex object. Lil Eve’s above all that. She's just… her.”

Poisonvee, with a devilish grin, leans forward and pecks Keldeo on the cheek to "test" the waters.

Poisonvee: “Let’s see if she snaps~”

Lil Eve doesn’t even flinch. She simply turns, adjusting her glasses, and walks away calmly, still bridal-carrying Keldeo, leaving Poisonvee behind in her cringe Yandere sim clutter.

Lil Eve (deadpan): “Not today, toxic trope.”

Moments later, under the bloom of a soft-pink, gently glowing tree sprite, Lil Eve sets Keldeo down with care.

She leans in.

Lil Eve: “No need to fight over you. You’ve been mine for 2 billion years.”

And she kisses him, gently, eternally.

Poisonvee watches from afar, muttering to herself while scribbling notes.

Poisonvee: “...They're so secure it’s boring. Too immortal for jealousy. Dang. Gotta rewrite Act 3.”

-

[Scene continues, after the romantic moment under the pixel tree, Lil Eve and Keldeo continue their stroll through the immortal dev garden.]

They pass a small hill of blocky metals, pixelated gray-blue with gears turning softly.

Lil Eve: “Looks like Steelvee’s hard at work again.”

Steelvee pops up from behind a steel beam, wearing dark goggles and a vest that barely fits. He waves a wrench with pride.

Steelvee (with full Jack Black energy): “I... am Steelvee!!”

Keldeo stares blankly.

Keldeo: “Cringe.”
Lil Eve laughs, covering her mouth gently.
Lil Eve: “Crustle would’ve loved this. He’d be screaming ‘BLOCKS!’ if he were still around...”
She smiles softly, nostalgic. Keldeo nods in agreement, placing a hand on her shoulder.

-

Next, neon bullets glow in the distance.

A glowing purple sign: "Dragonlet - Lunatic Dev Build"
A danmaku prototype demo with hyperactive lasers and minimal cutscenes. All-female cast. Bosses with long titles. Spell cards. Excessive stars.

Dragonvee, sunglasses on indoors, slouches proudly behind a CRT monitor.

Lil Eve (smiling): “So cute… they’re all like magical idols.”
Keldeo (dodging bullet patterns): “Even with no male cast, I can confirm, it still appeals. My mom made something like this, long ago.”
Lil Eve: “Galarian Rapidash would’ve been proud.”

-

Finally, they return to the living room of the Eternal Home.

Daddy Flareon, dressed in his crisp butler uniform, is struggling with a decorative pillar of flame.
Mommy Vaporeon, dressed in her classic frilly maid outfit, is fine-tuning a mini water fountain.

Vaporeon: “We have fire. We have water. But where’s wind and earth?”

Lil Eve steps forward.

Lil Eve: “On it.”
She summons Grassy Vines, weaving a gentle, living sculpture of leaves and soil.
Keldeo flips upward, landing a Dashing Upward Strike, slicing the air into a breeze that activates wind chimes above.

Flareon (smiling): “Wonderful teamwork.”

He serves a plate of vegan food, mushroom dumplings, rice-sprout wraps, and fire-roasted sweet roots.
Vaporeon offers drinks, one citrusy, one berry-sweet, both sparkling and suitable for all ages.

Poisonvee strolls in casually.

Poisonvee: “Y’know… maid café with butler boyfriends could totally work as a subgenre.”

Vaporeon: “Only if the butlers are trained properly.”

Flareon (adjusting tie): “And only if they’re handsome and romantic.”

Lil Eve and Keldeo chuckle quietly, sipping drinks side by side, their hands still intertwined.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 26: 3D Fireboy and Watergirl

[Scene: Eternal Home - Living Room, the next day.]

The giant TV now displays a vibrant, animated 3D platformer puzzle game with split-screen coop mode.
Flareon and Vaporeon, both still in their butler and maid outfits, are deeply focused. Controllers in hand, they're navigating a complex level with glowing tiles, reflective water, lava pools, and floating platforms.

-

In-game characters:

- Fireboy emits a warm glow, igniting torches to open doors or detonate explosive crates.

- Watergirl splashes gracefully, filling reservoirs to raise platforms or freezing surfaces into icy bridges.

-

Highlighted Mechanics:

- In a flooded tunnel, Fireboy climbs onto a pushable metal crate.
Watergirl, immune to water, swims below and carefully pushes the block while Fireboy balances on top, any fall into even shallow water would vaporize him.

- In a lava chamber, Watergirl cools the glowing molten floor using ice mist, slowly forming a fragile stone path so Fireboy can pass.

- In a toxic waste vault, both characters must avoid deadly green goo, neither can purify it, making those sections especially tense.

- A dark cavern level features Fireboy needing to light ancient braziers to reveal invisible platforms for Watergirl.

- One of the hardest stages has dynamic flooding, forcing players to alternate activating floodgates and freezing cycles to survive.

-

Lil Eve and Keldeo walk into the room, catching the duo in mid-puzzle.
They pause to watch Flareon and Vaporeon solve a beautifully chaotic stage that requires five elemental interactions in sequence.

Keldeo (grinning): “That game was so made for them.”
Lil Eve (adjusting her oval glasses): “Like it’s their couple aura... coded.”

The level ends with a synchronized jump over an acid pool and a double button press, triggering a confetti explosion and an “Elemental Harmony” clear message.

Vaporeon (smiling, wiping forehead): “Whew... Level 43. That was intense.”
Flareon: “Only 26 to go.”

Lil Eve: “Narrate the juicy ones for us. We’ll grab the snacks.”
Keldeo: “Also… someone record the lava-freezing scene. I need that for... science.”

They all laugh, as the screen fades to the next elemental challenge.

-

[Scene: Outside the Living Room – Next Day Continues]

Suddenly from the hallway, a green alien fox, sleek and stylish with galaxy-patterned fur and a body shape similar to Thievul, leans in with a grin.
This is GreenFox, Poisonvee’s boyfriend from beyond the stars.

GreenFox (cheerfully calling out):
“Hey guys! Did you know that in terms of br...”

SLAM!
A sudden, blaring “GAME OVER!” SFX from the big screen obliterates his sentence.

On screen, Fireboy just got completely vaporized.

[Game narration:] “Critical burn. Cooperation failed.”
Vaporeon (innocently turning down the volume): “Oops...”
Flareon (calmly, with a soft smile): “It’s okay.” (leans over and kisses her)
Vaporeon: (giggles and returns the kiss)

-

[Cut to Poisonvee, off to the side, watching GreenFox with a dreamy sigh]

She pulls out a tablet, sketching out exaggerated, sparkly fanart of her and GreenFox surrounded by mini Galaxian Theivul children. One’s wearing sunglasses. Another breathes sparkles.

Poisonvee: “Yeah… he is the most compatible species-wise. Sorry mommy Vaporeon, wasn’t even about you this time.”

-

Back to the game:

A new level begins.

A vast aquatic aviary filled with giant, serpentine water birds that swoop down and attempt to swallow Fireboy whole.

Flareon (alarmed): “Oh great, not these things again...”
Vaporeon (laughing): “Come on, I’ve got this.”

She skillfully guides Watergirl, distracting the birds with clever splashes while opening a steam vent puzzle that lets Fireboy pass safely behind her.

Another close call. Another perfect sync.

Lil Eve and Keldeo, now snacking on Flareon’s vegan spread, watch in awe.

Keldeo (munching): “You know, they’re kinda cracked at this.”
Lil Eve (glasses glinting): “Elemental soulmates. Peak synergy.”

-

[Final Stages of “Elemental Bond: 3D” - Highlight Reel]

-

Level ?? – The Boulder Gauntlet

A room with pressure plates that trigger giant stone boulders.
They rain from above, smashing Fireboy instantly on contact.
Watergirl is immune, easily slipping past the traps.

Flareon: “Oh come on! That boulder was off-screen!”
Vaporeon: “I told you to stop running ahead.”

-

Level ?? – The Piranha Pit

Piranha Plant-like creatures erupt from the ground, hungry for Watergirl.
One lunges, chomp! Watergirl's devoured.
Flareon just sighs.

Flareon (controlling Fireboy): “Get behind me.”
He walks through the pit, every Piranha dies on touch.

Vaporeon (grinning): “Who’s the main DPS now, huh?”

-

Level ?? – Electric Labyrinth

Sparking walls and voltage arcs light up the maze.
Watergirl zaps on contact. Fireboy takes partial damage.
The key: Fireboy overheats circuits to blast safe paths for Watergirl.

Vaporeon: “Remind me to never install smart lighting in our house.”
Flareon: “You installed the last fridge.”

-

Level ?? – Earthquake Tremor Core

The screen rumbles constantly.
Fireboy stumbles violently, every step risks fatal missteps.
Watergirl’s path is stable, and she leads the way calmly.

Vaporeon: “Follow my lead. One step at a time.”
Flareon (sweating): “This better not awaken anything in me...”

-

Level 69 – Boss Fight: HEATRAN CORE

A towering molten beast, Heatran-shaped, roars.

It launches:

- Lava floods (kills Watergirl)

- Supercooled geysers (freezes Fireboy)

- Summons: Piranha Plants and Giant Water Birds as reinforcements

Fireboy takes on the boss head-to-head.
Watergirl dances between hazards, clearing adds and solving floor puzzles.

Barely, they win.

Boss Defeated!
Completion: 69/69 Levels

-

[Cutscene: Celebration]

Back at home base, Flareon yawns in exhaustion.
Suddenly, Vaporeon lifts him bridal style, matching their daughter’s earlier pose with Keldeo.

Vaporeon (smiling): “Time to reward you, Fireboy.”
Flareon (blushing): “W-Wait...”

They walk into a cozy side room, still just a makeshift kitchen for now.

Poisonvee (watching, snacking): “Maid café prototype, huh? Not bad.”

Cue soft music. Snacks are served. All’s peaceful.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 27: Haunting or Healing Memories

[Scene: The spaceship. Quiet, dim lights. Ghostvee sits alone near the Chronoscene Reflector, playing back an unauthorized recording.]

The footage rolls, grainy and muted. It shows Darkrai ruthlessly executing Decidueye and Cinderace. Just as Greninja and Delphox arrive on the scene...

Ghostvee (pauses the footage, shaken):
"...I shouldn't have recorded this..."

He stares at the recorder in silence, then hurls it across the room. It clatters to the floor. He mutters:

Ghostvee:
"That kind of death... it's too brutal for anyone to see."

Footsteps. Gardevoir enters, having witnessed everything. Her expression is unreadable, calm, but far from amused.

Gardevoir (coolly):
"...That right there? That was the moment Saga 2 killed the tone."

She walks over, picks up the discarded recorder, looks at it briefly, then tears open a tiny singularity in her palm. The recorder is devoured by a silent black hole.

Gardevoir (without turning back):
"No more ghosts from that era."

She closes her hand, the singularity gone.

She then waves her hand toward the spaceship's core systems. Locks engage, barriers reinforce.

Gardevoir:
"You're not phasing through walls anymore, Ghostvee. Not when they’re meant to protect, not haunt."

Fade out.

-

[Scene continues from earlier, Ghostvee still stunned after Gardevoir black hole-shredded the grim footage. The atmosphere lightens slightly as Gardevoir, arms crossed in her sharp police uniform, speaks more softly.]

Gardevoir (stern but thoughtful):
"If you insist on using that Chronoscene Reflector, then do something useful with it."

[She approaches Ghostvee, adjusts her pencil skirt subtly, then kneels slightly to his eye level.]

Gardevoir (gently, but firm):
"Start archiving memories worth revisiting. Ones that heal, not haunt. Consider it… community service."

Ghostvee (quietly, guilt still in his tone):
"...Like what?"

Gardevoir (standing again):
"Try this:"

- "The beach day with the original eight Eeveelutions. That one where Vaporeon kept dragging a too-proud Flareon out of the waves. Deliver that to the HydroPyro Maid Café, they'll appreciate it."

- "The moment post-Saga 3, before everything crumbled in Saga 4, when Hatterene finally accepted the Iron Valiant figure as a companion. Brother Gallede and I were there. It deserves a place in the archives."

- "And others... accessible only to those with clearance. We both know not every memory should be public."

[Scene fades to black, then opens at the HydroPyro Maid Café. Warm light, the soft clinking of dishes. A small TV hums to life.]

[On screen: grainy but vibrant footage of the original 8 Eeveelutions at the beach, splashing, laughing, relaxing. A much simpler time.]

Flareon (chuckling through a mouthful of mochi):
"Ugh... I still remember how salty that water was. And how you kept dragging me back up like I was a lost Magikarp..."

Vaporeon (smiling, leaning against him):
"I wasn't about to let you dissolve in the ocean, Fireboy."

They laugh gently. No mention of what happened after. Just a warm breeze of nostalgia.

[Scene ends with Ghostvee watching from a security monitor quietly, before fading to white.]

-

[Scene fades in: dim spaceship archive room. The Chronoscene Reflector is still warm from the recently deleted playback. Gardevoir has just finished securing the room… but unnoticed, the Regigigas Death Loop Tablet lies nearby, faintly flickering with residual energy.]

[Suddenly, the tablet screen lights up. Regigigas’ pixelated face appears, twisted into a smug grin.]

Regigigas (tablet voice) (mockingly):
"Hah! And they say I was the monster. At least I never turned the whole saga into a funeral march. What a tone killer that Darkrai was."

[Gardevoir pauses, arms crossed, eyebrow raised, but silent.]

Regigigas (proudly):
"I am... the true savior of comedy! Witness me, bearer of slapstick and punchlines!"

[Suddenly, the tablet screen flickers violently. Dark tendrils surge from the tablet edges, black and crimson, spiraling with static and blood-like splashes. Regigigas’ pixelated face contorts as he lets out a glitchy scream.]

Regigigas (garbled):
"Wait, what?! No, this isn't part of the bit, AGHH!"

[He is consumed in a swirl of corrupted void, the screen flashing "VOIDED" before going pitch black.]

[Gardevoir, still watching, blinks once. Then shrugs.]

Gardevoir (dryly):
"Villains insulting other villains. Karma has better timing than the Chronoscene Reflector."

[Beat. The screen on the tablet twitches back to static. Regigigas flickers on briefly, trembling in pixel form.]

Regigigas (shaky):
"I-I saw something… before the seal fully broke. A trace... of that same Dark Aura. Opposite end of Poketopia... He’s not the only one who left a stain..."

[Before he can finish, the tablet goes black again. A soft hum of sealed energy pulses one last time before silence.]

Gardevoir (muttering):
"And there it goes again. He’s going to keep rebooting until his comedy catches up with his karma."

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 28 : SteelCraft and Titan Mining

[Scene: A sprawling metallic workshop glinting under soft neon lights. Half-assembled constructs line the walls. At the center, STEELVEE ,  still in goggles and armor, half blacksmith, half coder, is joyfully clanking away at his own creation: SteelCraft, a blocky, elementally-driven sandbox game.]

Steelvee (proudly, raising a steel hammer):
"I... AM STEELVEE!"

[Beside him, a sleek feline-shaped alien with shimmering silver-blue fur and starry pupils ,  Alexian, a Persian-like alien from the stars ,  giggles softly, adjusting her cosmic tail bow while rotating a 3D block structure on her screen.]

Alexian (amused):
"Yes, you are, sweet-forged goof. Your hammer nearly woke the reactors again."

[Nearby, Regigigas Death Loop Tablet has been awkwardly set down on a steel workbench, previously placed by Keldeo. It’s been loop-playing his infamous ‘respawn-explode’ cycle. But now? A steel pickaxe gently tink-tink-tinks at the screen as part of a mining animation from SteelCraft's own terrain test tool.]

Regigigas (tablet voice, muffled and tired):
"You people mined me into a crafting game…? I WAS A COLOSSUS."

Steelvee (laughing):
"Now you're a crafting node, buddy! Look how much iron you drop per loop! You're basically an infinite ore vein!"

[Regigigas groans electronically. Meanwhile, Alexian pauses, tilts her head curiously at the strange relic of ancient chaos now being used as game terrain.]

Alexian (quizzically):
"This… is supposed to be a cosmic threat?"

Steelvee:
"Was. Now he’s community loot."

[Alexian shrugs, flicks her tail once, and gets back to her building. Her screen shows charmingly blocky depictions of her imaginary children, hybrid Cosmician Persian kids, with sparkly eyes, hovering toys, and tiny gauntlets like Steelvee’s. She smiles dreamily.]

Alexian:
"Our future kids better have adjustable claws and anti-vacuum fur."

Steelvee (grinning):
"Done and done. Crafting table’s right here. Let’s build their room."

[In the background, the Regigigas Tablet lets out one final muffled “bruh,” before exploding in-game again, sending blocky shrapnel into the in-game sky.]

-

[Scene: Back at Steelvee’s workstation. The clinks of code and clanks of machinery quiet down for a moment. Alexian, lounging on a floating stool, pulls out a shimmering bag of cosmic popcorn, kernels softly glowing like tiny galaxies.]

Alexian (smirking):
"Flashback time? This better not be one of your 'pretend you're a SteelCraft NPC' tapes again."

Steelvee (grinning):
"Not this time. This one's legacy."

[With a flick, Steelvee inserts a tape labeled “NaClCraft Origins - 2 Billion Y.A.” into the Chronoscene Viewer. The screen projects a grainy, filtered flashback in front of them like a live hologram. Everything’s pixelated but majestic.]

-

[FLASHBACK: An ancient stone amphitheater. Standing proudly at the center is Garganacl, blocky and dignified, the original developer of NaClCraft ,  a precursor to SteelCraft. Garganacl waves to the crowd, made up of primitive but enthusiastic Pokémon.]

Garganacl (booming voice):
"Welcome to the first ever Create-a-Mob Event! May the saltiest build win!"

[On stage: Crustle, Greedent, Gengar, and Sableye, each with their own quirky entries. Gengar's is haunted, Greedent's is... edible. Sableye's glows too much.]

[But Crustle, with a sly grin, unveils Decorative Boulder Wall AI™, a maze-like defensive artpiece using stone blocks with accidental tactical function. The crowd gasps.]

Garganacl (impressed):
"The balance of offense and art. Genius! Winner: Crustle!"

[Everyone cheers. Gengar raises Crustle’s claw like a champion’s. Sableye reluctantly claps. Greedent eats half the prize.]

-

[FLASHBACK ENDS. Steelvee sighs in awe. Alexian munches on her cosmic popcorn, nodding in approval.]

Steelvee:
"Crustle… true legend. My pixel walls are pebbles compared to that masterpiece."

Alexian:
"You build better explosions though. And nobody streams stone passion like you, Spark-Hammer."

[Steelvee chuckles. Just as the screen fades out, a shadowed illusion briefly flickers, an eerie Crustle silhouette shoving something into a wall.]

[Cut to: Regigigas Tablet, nearby, wedged awkwardly between two metal slabs. He lets out a hollow gasp, like being force-suffocated in a geometry puzzle.]

Regigigas (tablet voice, distorted):
"Is… this… Crustle…?"

Steelvee (widening eyes):
"...Whoa. That was his signature move. Wall suffocation."

Alexian (teasing):
"Don’t worry, sweet-forge. Yours is pickaxe bullying. Every great crafter has a legacy."

Regigigas (flatly):
"Legacy? This is abuse."

[They both laugh. In the corner, a framed pixel art of Crustle slowly twinkles, a tribute to the builder who started it all.]

-

[Scene resumes in the workstation, the tape continuing to roll on the Chronoscene Viewer. The flashback continues, warming the screen with nostalgic pixel hues.]

-

Garganacl (booming with pride):
"My creations may be salt-themed, but not that kind of salty! No stingy gacha rates, no micro-scams, just pure, handcrafted fun! Unlike those cursed gacha games from the long-fallen past!"

[A roar of applause echoes through the pixelated crowd. Gengar, standing among the hosts, awkwardly chuckles and steps up to the podium.]

Gengar (clearing throat):
"Aha… yeah, about that. I, uh… used to run a gacha company... Darkspin Studio. Not proud of it. I thought 0.003% was funny, okay? But now... I just host indie events. No more greed pranks, just… ghost energy and genuine games."

[Crustle gives him a respectful claw-salute. Sableye claps wildly with his gem-hands. Greedent doesn’t look up, too engrossed in smashing berries into a smoothie with his face.]

[Garganacl then unveils a visual punchline on a pixel banner: a massive Salt Block falling from the heavens, stomping a wailing, sparkle-covered gacha ball flat like a bug.]

[Crowd goes wild. Sableye is seen wiping tears of joy with a crystal. Crustle lifts his boulder in celebration.]

-

[Back to present: Steelvee and Alexian snort from laughter, nearly falling off their stools.]

Alexian (laughing):
"Did… did that Salt Block just ratio a whole business model?"

Steelvee (cackling):
"And crushed the 'ultra-legendary drop rate' while at it. That’s what I call... justice mining."

[Suddenly, a faint sizzling noise is heard from nearby. They look over to see, ]

Regigigas Tablet:
"Ssskkksshhhhhhh!" (smoke and light steam rising)

[Turns out, broken gacha balls, discarded over time, had scattered nearby. The leftover salt and glitter fragments are now melting painfully into Regigigas's tablet surface.]

Regigigas (screaming internally):
"WHY, WHY IS THIS ACTUAL SALT?! I AM NOT A PRE-REG GIFT!!"

Steelvee (grinning):
"You should’ve read the user agreement, buddy. Legacy karma never forgets."

Alexian (cheekily):
"I think you unlocked the secret Pain Tier. Too bad it’s unskippable."

[As the tablet continues to hiss and glow faintly from saltburn, Steelvee adds a “Do Not Touch – Gacha Cleanup in Progress” sign next to it and returns to his crafting table, inspired.]

Steelvee (under his breath):
"...One day... Salt Mode... coming soon to SteelCraft..."

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 29: Softly Unhinged Extraterrestrial Family

[Wide shot: Skies above the continent’s far edge. 
Flyvee soars gracefully through the clouds with her boyfriend, the alien avian BraveBeak, a Braviary-like creature with shimmering feathers. 
The wind whooshes past as they dip and spin in harmony, their laughter echoing.]

[Back at HydroPyro Maid Café...]

Flareon (dusting the window with a butler's towel):
"Would you look at that... Our family on this planet keeps growing wings."

Vaporeon (polishing glasses behind the café counter):
"Mmhm. We used to be just 8 furballs at the beach. Now? We’re an empire with extra planets and a beverage menu."

[Two daughters walk in: one is Lil Eve, ever-youthful in her eternal seifuku; 
the other, Poisonvee, sporting a temporary school uniform as a grown mortal. 
Each is flanked by their respective partners: the radiant Keldeo in a crisp gakuran, and the smug, green Thievul-like alien, GreenFox.]

Poisonvee (smirking as she surveys the kitchen):
"With this population growth, this place could run as a planetary food factory. Naturally, I’ll be in charge."

[Before she can even bask in her ambition, Bugvee bursts through the double doors in full energy.]

Bugvee (waving her wings dramatically):
"You’ll not make poison food for mortals again, sis! Mom and Dad’s café deserves better! Even bugs have taste buds, you know."

[Then enters their niece, Galaxian Gastrier, daughter of Lil Eve and Keldeo, wearing sparkles and psychic elegance. She floats in with a glowing aura.]

Galaxian Gastrier (stern but polite):
"My immortal grandparents' café must remain pure. My psychic analysis confirms: 0.003% impurity is unacceptable."

[Vaporeon claps her fins gently.]

Vaporeon (smiling):
"Thank you, girls, but no need to overdo it. This is a kitchen, not a science lab."

[Bugvee and Galaxian Gastrier glance at each other, then silently sit down at a table. A moment later, poof!, they're both wearing maid outfits.]

Bugvee:
"So… do you think wearing a cute uniform helps you get a boyfriend faster?"

Galaxian Gastrier:
"Emotionally unlikely. Statistically... maybe?"

[Flareon walks to the front with pride and poise.]

Flareon (grinning):
"Alright, class! Watch and learn."

[He flamboyantly flips a frying pan, plating a deliciously balanced dish. 
Vaporeon follows with a twirl, mixing drinks with grace. The newcomers are in awe.]

Poisonvee (grumbling):
"Ugh. Not toxic enough. But fine... I’ll just add my own spice after."

[She sprinkles something green into her own plate while glaring at her sister Bugvee.]

Bugvee (leaning toward GreenFox):
"So... how ‘bout ditching the toxins and coming with me for dessert?"

Poisonvee (eyes glowing, yandere smile):
"Touch him and I’ll lace your tea."

[GreenFox, unfazed, takes another bite of food.]

GreenFox:
"...Tastes like drama. Nice seasoning."

[Keldeo and Lil Eve watch from a corner booth, sipping tea and chuckling at the generational chaos.]

Keldeo:
"This place could be a sitcom."

Lil Eve (smiling):
"Except it's real. And we never run out of episodes."

[Bugvee then casually hands a paper to Vaporeon and Flareon.]

Bugvee:
"Oh, almost forgot. Fightvee and Rockvee left these goodbye notes. 
They’ve joined some interplanetary adventuring guild... chasing alien girlfriends or something."

[Vaporeon reads the note and sighs with a mix of pride and worry.]

Vaporeon:
"Well... at least they’re chasing something other than explosions now."

Flareon (grinning):
"Give it a week."

-

[Far across the continent, golden rays bathe lush alien crops. A part-human, part-Pokémon figure, Solarian Gallade (male, Psychic/Steel), radiates elegance as he stands beneath two suns. With a soft sigh, he sets aside his space-trowel, having finished another day’s harvest.]

Solarian Gallade (to himself):
"Perhaps it’s time I returned… Mother always said the café near the HydroPyro Ridge had good atmosphere. And food."

[Moments later: The HydroPyro Maid Café, midday bustle. Inside, Galaxian Gastrier floats lazily while stirring purified soup with her mind.]

Galaxian Gastrier (half-bored):
"Everyone here has a boyfriend but me. Unless you count test tubes..."

[Suddenly, the café doors slide open with a soft chime. A brilliant light pours in as Solarian Gallade steps through, eyes scanning with curiosity.]

Solarian Gallade (calm, curious):
"...This is where Mother’s friends serve emotion-enhancing cuisine?"

[Galaxian Gastrier drops her spoon mid-float and lets out a psychic wheeze. Her eyes spiral into heart shapes.]

Galaxian Gastrier (flustered, blushing brightly):
"H-he came! Finally, the solar prince of my literal dreams…!"

[She quickly levitates a plate of her specialty dish, Psychic-friendly Starflower Dumplings, and teleports in front of him with it.]

Galaxian Gastrier (stammering):
"I-I made this for you! It's calibrated for your hybrid digestive aura and infused with, uh, stellar affection?"

Solarian Gallade (smiling faintly):
"…Thank you. That’s... very considerate. You’ve improved your psychic focus."

[He takes the plate, sits down, and begins eating gracefully. Galaxian Gastrier hovers nearby like a lovesick satellite, vibrating.]

[From behind the counter, Vaporeon leans toward Flareon with a knowing smirk.]

Vaporeon (chuckling):
"Oh no... it’s happening."

Flareon (sighs):
"Yup. Another chapter in our book of ‘Unhinged Interplanetary Families’..."

Vaporeon:
"And this one’s... extraterrestrial."

[In the background, Bugvee whispers to Poisonvee at another table.]

Bugvee:
"You think it’s safe to ship cousins across galaxies?"

Poisonvee (eating glowing noodles):
"With our family tree? That tree grew upside-down and tangled in a black hole years ago."

[Keldeo, sipping tea, just grins knowingly.]

Keldeo:
"Love in this universe sure doesn’t come with a user manual. But it does come with a menu."

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 30: Unhinged Across Galaxies

[Planet Erosbloom-89 – a radiant, love-drenched world blooming with eternally pink skies and fields of floating heart-shaped flora. The camera zooms in on a lone clearing where the legendary couple remains locked in their ancient embrace.]

[A meteor-like streak blazes down from the upper atmosphere, BOOM!, a rocky crater forms. Out crawls Rockvee, a bit scuffed but unbothered, steam rising from his fluffy stone tail.]

Rockvee (gruffly brushing dust off):
"Hff. That landing was a 9.4... on the Emotional Impact scale."

[He scans the landscape, then blinks. Just a few feet away, the same immortal quarterback stands, still effortlessly carrying his cheerleader wife bridal-style, both unchanged, both smiling like it’s still prom night... from 3 billion years ago.]

Rockvee (walking up, curious):
"Wait a minute. Are you two seriously... still like that?"

Cheerleader Woman (beaming, cradled in his arms):
"Mhm! I’ve been in these arms for over three billion years now. No back pain, no regrets!"

Quarterback Man (smirking confidently):
"She’s the real MVP. I’m just the permanent lift system."

[He leans down and gives her a soft kiss. They both giggle like newlyweds on an infinite honeymoon.]

Rockvee (half-muttering):
"Sturdy couple... like, tectonic-level sturdy."

[He pauses, slightly awkward, but sincere.]

Rockvee:
"Y’know... kinda jealous. Immortal doesn’t always mean anchored. But I respect this... rock-solid bond."

[The couple nods warmly. Rockvee exhales, shakes off the mood, and turns to go.]

Rockvee (gruff but friendly):
"Alright, you lovebirds enjoy eternity. I’ve got... space gravel to chew or something."

[As he walks away, the pink wind swirls gently, carrying the couple’s laughter behind him. Rockvee looks back once and smiles faintly, quietly inspired.]

-

[Several days later, far across the love-sick fields of Planet Erosbloom-89, Rockvee finally finds himself wandering through a continent saturated with floating flower petals and eerily serene romantic ballads on loop.]

Rockvee (grumbling):
"Tch, everything here smells like perfume and commitment… Where even is the exit port?"

[Meanwhile, above on a scenic balcony overlooking the valley, Solar Valiant, a dignified yet dramatic psychic/steel hybrid daughter of Gardevoir, spots something. Her metallic cheeks tint pink.]

Solar Valiant (sparkling eyes, flustered voice):
"...What is that heavenly sight?!"

[She gazes at a bizarrely picturesque scene: an other way around immortal couple, this time, a seifuku-clad woman cradling her gakuran husband, bridal-style, their smiles unfading. They’ve been like this for a modest 2.5 billion years, and their hair now flows like stardust.]

Solar Valiant (dramatically gasping, hand over chest):
"My circuits… d-doki-doki…"

[She rushes over, floats politely near them, and bows with regal curiosity.]

Solar Valiant:
"Excuse me, esteemed… paragons of love... how long have you two been like this?"

Immortal Seifuku Woman (grinning serenely):
"Oh~ about 2.5 billion years, dear. He just loves being held, and I don’t mind keeping him close."

Immortal Gakuran Man (snuggled like a galactic teddy bear):
"Every second still feels like the first."

[Cue a sparkly psychic malfunction. Steam erupts faintly from Solar Valiant’s armored cheekplates.]

Solar Valiant (voice cracking):
"I-I… I didn’t think I'd find true ship fuel IRL!"

[Back at ground level, Rockvee is still scanning his weird compass for a direction, muttering to himself. Solar Valiant finally floats down, attempting to compose herself, still hot under the collar.]

Solar Valiant (playfully flustered):
"Y-you there, mineral muffin… need directions?"

Rockvee (squinting, confused):
"Uh, yeah. Trying to find the next launch point or… uh, anywhere that isn’t… pink."

Solar Valiant (blinking, then wheezes):
"...Aww, you’re cute when confused."

Rockvee (half-muttering):
"Are all of Gardevoir’s kids this weird?"

[They walk side by side into the horizon, Solar Valiant occasionally looking back toward the immortal bridal carry, cheeks still steaming, as Rockvee tries to pretend nothing’s weird about any of this.]

-

[Aboard the secured spaceship, Gardevoir lounges elegantly in her police uniform, pencil skirt sharp as ever, sipping hot berry tea while monitoring the Chronoscene Reflector like a bored space detective flipping TV channels.]

Gardevoir (murmuring):
"Let’s see what that rock-headed child is up to..."

[She types in "Rockvee - Erosbloom-89" and fast-forwards through a meteor-style crash that flattened half a hill. Then she sees Event 1, the quarterback and cheerleader couple, and squints.]

Gardevoir (flatly):
"...They’re still at it? After three billion years? And not even a sore arm?"

[She adjusts her tea. Onscreen, Rockvee gives a thumbs-up to the immortal piggyback champions and stumbles off like a tsundere caveman.]

[Then Event 2 plays: Solar Valiant absolutely melting over the seifuku-gakuran bridal-carry couple in her full maiden-in-love psychic drama.]

Gardevoir (deadpan):
"Ah. There it is. The unhinged part of the family tree."

[She lets the tape roll for a few more moments. Rockvee cluelessly accepts directions from a flustered Solar Valiant, who is clearly still short-circuiting from her previous 2.5-billion-year-old-couple high.]

Gardevoir (sighs, smirking slightly):
"My kids are going to out-weird the universe at this rate."

[She then rewinds further, the Reflector shimmering into a softer scene, an old day, long gone. A warm-lit memory: a human male astronaut, lost and tired, stumbles across Gardevoir in her forest patrol vest in the terraformed planet. She helps him up. No words are heard. Just gestures, respectful glances. The moment where admiration bloomed, one she never expected to evolve into anything more… until Solarian Gallade and Solar Valiant were born later.]

[She pauses the tape before anything spicy occurs, speaking to the Reflector itself like an old friend.]

Gardevoir (firmly):
"No porkyman scenes. We run a classy archive."

[She sits in silence for a while longer. Her eyes flick once toward the Lucario image that used to sit beside her. For just a second, her psychic field dims, then warms again.]

Gardevoir (softly):
"...You’d have enjoyed these absurd kids."

[She presses a button, sealing the Reflector memory, then returns to her tea, with the faintest smile and a heart full of nostalgia and muted longing.]

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 31: Planets have Names too

On planet 934-RX, a scorched lava world once visited by the main cast, a team of heat-resistant alien astronauts surveys the terrain. Deep in a canyon, they stumble upon an odd geological imprint, etched clearly into the blackened rock is the unmistakable pose of regret and shame. The silhouette? Regigigas. Embedded from 207 years ago, forever fossilized by the residual heat pulses of the Death Loop Tablet. 

One astronaut squints and mutters, "What in the flaming crust is this clown beast?"

-

Back on the now-named planet Evoir, Gardevoir casually logs the designation in her records.
Alolan Ninetales glances over, unimpressed. “Huh. Evoir? Sure. Not like I care.”

Their attention shifts to the Regigigas Death Loop Tablet, which is now flickering with another real-time suffering loop: Regigigas bathing in lava with fake confidence, only to be violently yeeted by an eruption, again and again, then landing gracelessly into jagged rocks like some molten ping pong ball. The girls watch in silence.

“…Is this entertainment or karmic art?” Ninetales finally asks.
Gardevoir just sips her tea. “Both.”

-

Inside the observation deck of Evoir’s central archive dome, Gardevoir is deep in the Chronoscene Reflector’s interface. As she rewinds through eons of star charts and incident logs, her eyes pause on two familiar data entries. She taps her fingers with a soft sigh.

“Pokeplanet. That’s what we used to call home... back when everything was... less exploded.”
A few more swipes. “And Neo-Earth... the first big interdimensional leap, 208 years ago. Lush. Crowded. Kinda noisy.”

Alolan Ninetales lounges on a levitating pillow beside her, tail flicking lazily. “Wow, names now? You’re telling me all these super-critical, lore-loaded planets finally got their dramatic titles... after all this time?” She smirks at the invisible audience. “Took ya long enough, narrator.”

Gardevoir glances sideways. “They’ve always had names. We just finally cared to say them out loud.”

Ninetales chuckles, the kind that comes with centuries of patience. “Better late than retroactive continuity.”

-

Scene: Chronoscene Reflector Room, Evoir ,  Dim starlight filters through crystalline panels as Gardevoir and Alolan Ninetales focus in.
The Reflector hums, shimmering with calibrated gravelight. It locks onto a stable rift-view:

[POKEPLANET – Present Day]

The image sharpens, verdant valleys sliced by shining chrome highways, floating cities with struggling green domes. It's still the old world... but altered.

From deep craters and tectonic scars, new forms of Pokémon emerge:

- Eeveelution hybrids with magma-plated pelts like Heatran

- Ralts forged in full steel, born of ore veins beneath the surface

- Electric-typed Vulpix darting through neon forests

- Fairy Riolu training under holographic auroras

- Piloswines sparking like batteries in snowless tundra

The planet breathes, industrial, spacefaring, but clearly struggling. Resource scarcity. Melting poles. Rings of debris satellites. And yet... life thrives.

A separate stream flickers open: ancient soil churned by careful Ground-type paws.
A team of Ground/Fairy Pupitars and archaeologist Terra-Ninetales uncover weathered stones. They read inscriptions aloud:

“Flareon... Vaporeon... Lil Eve... Keldeo... are immortal ancestors...”
“We are their descendants...?”
History blooms in the soil.

-

Alolan Ninetales hums. “No humans yet. Not even aliens. Just Pokémon pushing evolution forward... alone.”

Gardevoir smiles faintly. “Much like the Earth. Life clings where it can.”

She hits record. “Let’s archive this. For the cousins.”

-

Later, at the cozy HydroPyro Maid Café...

The monitor glows beside the café hearth. Vaporeon’s teacup halts mid-sip. Flareon leans closer, steam puffing from his mane. Lil Eve folds her sleeves neatly. Keldeo grins.

The tape plays: their legacy, branching through another reality.

No commentary needed.
Just awe.

Vaporeon exhales. “Even across time, across dimensions... they still remember us.”

Flareon nods. “We left more than just stories. We left seeds.”

Lil Eve wipes a tear, then demands another parfait to emotionally stabilize.
Keldeo toasts the screen with his cup. “To the other side. Still fighting. Still evolving.”

-

Scene: Chronoscene Reflector Room, Evoir

Gardevoir gazes into the flickering light of the Reflector, her eyes soft with nostalgia, then narrows them at the spatial reading.

“…Pokeplanet is 6.9 million light years away from Evoir now...” she finally murmurs. “Even with folded warplight and third-gear drift... it’d take too long. Maybe it's best to just let it be. A legacy out there, alive in silence.”

Alolan Ninetales shrugs, unimpressed by sentimentality. “Mmm. Emotional distance is just as far.”

-

Then, suddenly, the Reflector glitches and phases as a hulking, metallic silhouette crashes through the viewfield:

A pure Steel-Type Mudsdale clanks past the screen, his hooves clashing like anvils, and beside it, an evolved Flying-Type Rapidash, no longer a simple unicorn but a full mythic pegasus, her wings shimmering with ion flames, whooshes by too close, briefly phasing through the image and causing the Reflector to hiccup.

-

Both disappear past the camera’s range with uncanny grace.

Silence.

Keldeo, still calmly holding his cup of psychic-flavored tea, nods sagely.

“…Evolution is magic.”

Flareon spits out his drink. Vaporeon claps slowly.

Alolan Ninetales rolls her eyes.
Lil Eve whispers, “He’s not wrong.”

Cue title screen stinger:
Poketopia: Unhinged – Beyond Cosmic Episodes
(“Evolution is Magic” reverbs dramatically in the background.)

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 32: 6969 Evoir Years later

6969 Evoir years later:

The neon skies of Neo-Evoir glimmered like aurora soda, striped in plasma blue, citrus gold, and glitchy pink. 
Towering silver trees hummed in harmony with orbital satellites overhead, and at the planet’s heart, Poketopia:Neo-Evoir pulsed like a utopian overgrown circuit board, filled with hovering traffic and crystalline sound gardens.

In the center of the city, nestled between skyscrapers shaped like Gardevoir’s gown and Flareon’s tail flames, a memorial park glowed with subtle dignity.

- A statue of Bugvee mid-jump into a garbage bin stood beside Poisonvee’s bronze plaque engraved with "NOT TOXIC ENOUGH" and a cartoon skull.

- GreenFox’s was simply, “He vibed till the end.”

- Steelvee’s blocky gravestone, “I... AM STEELVEE”, had survived twelve earthquakes, three kaiju fights and left a legacy to SteelCraft for centuries. Right next to Alexian's blocky grave.

- Flyvee and BraveBeak’s names were etched into a small obsidian cloud that occasionally floated upside down. 

Fightvee’s tale was now an Evoir-wide legend. He had saved a doomed planet by punching a collapsing moon in half, at the cost of his life, fist raised in heroic salute mid-disintegration. A golden statue in another solar system bears his battle cry:
“I’LL FIGHT EVEN THE MOON IF I HAVE TO!”

And on the far reaches of Erosbloom-89, among lavender canyons and diamond meadows, Rockvee and Solar Valiant now rested together, forever engraved in each other’s arms in a statue that accidentally made tourists blush.

-

Back on Evoir, under a centuries-old Cherry HexaTree (a pink biomech tree that sings lo-fi beats at night), Lil Eve rested her head on Keldeo’s lap, both still dressed in eternal gakuran and seifuku. 
They watched a parade of glitter-furred hybrid descendants: electric Piloswine DJing over a crowd of Fairy-Lucario fans, a Galaxian Thievul breakdancing in zero-G, and a Fire/Ice Eeveelution roller-skating with flames on one foot and frost on the other.

Meanwhile, at the rebuilt HydroPyro Café HQ, Vaporeon rang the “bridal challenge complete” bell after carrying Flareon around for a full Evoir year. She didn’t even sweat. Flareon? Melted with joy.

Alolan Ninetales looked at the ridiculousness and sipped her frozen herbal tea, muttering, “Still don’t care about the planet’s name, but this circus of descendants is oddly charming.”

Gardevoir, holding her Chronoscene Reflector like a bored deity with a TV remote, sighed.
“We’re missing a soap opera episode back on Pokeplanet… oh wait, here comes the Ground/Fairy Tyranitar trying to marry a Psychic/Fighting Deerling. Again.”

And from the Death Loop Tablet in the corner, Regigigas, submerged in magma (again), emitted a resigned ding, its loop temporarily paused because someone spilled iced coffee on the control rune.

-

Despite the years, the café remained the same, a meeting place of immortal oddballs, new life, memories, and legendary nonsense. The world had changed beyond recognition, but they hadn't. And that’s how they liked it.

After all, when you’ve lived for millennia, the only real tradition is chaos with a dash of love.

-

Just outside Neo-Evoir, beneath a hollowed asteroid converted into a luxury skybedroom, a glittering containment pod burst open with a hiss.

Dragonvee stretched for the first time in 6,890 years, still in maid dress. Her wings cracked with a sound like breaking keyboards, and she blinked with pixelated irises, still processing the world update.

"*Status check... game revenue streams... still booming... DLC number 4927 released... plush line stable... fandom still toxic, oh good, nothing’s changed..." she murmured with a smug grin.

As she soared across the skyline, cyber-billboards instantly recognized her presence and shifted to display Dragonlet: Retro Reloaded DX Eternal Edition, with her iconic in-game quote:
“I’m not overpowered, I’m just under-slept.”

-

Arriving at the Memorial DataGarden, she found a newly activated flashback cube, one marked gently with spectral symbols. It flickered to life, and Ghostvee’s translucent form appeared, casually drifting in orbit while holding a comically large “oops” sign.

"Hey Dragonvee... if you're watching this, I'm probably long gone by now, don't cry, unless it’s to charge up your ultimate.
So, funny story... I was trying to sneak into the candy moon but forgot to turn on my float brakes.
Next thing I knew, I bumped into a lonely alien on a suicide path toward that hot star you liked... the one shaped like Flareon’s butt."

The cube showed Ghostvee giving a gentle smile.

"I swapped places with him. I guess even ghosts can be useful sometimes.
He promised to name his next starchild after me. Or you. Whichever sounds cooler in his language.
See ya later, sis. Keep the chaos alive."

-

Dragonvee wiped her face with a wing-spike.

"Dammit, bro… even gone, you still got better plotlines than most of my DLC writers."

She smiled, looking up to the orbital sky where a new star glimmered purple and faintly glitched, named in the alien tongue as "V'geist-7", meaning He Who Turned Back the Fall.

-

Back at HydroPyro Café’s Dragondome Extension, Gardevoir was already narrating the whole event via psychic loudspeaker.
Vaporeon sniffled while flipping takoyaki.
Flareon just said, "Classic Ghostvee."
Alolan Ninetales paused sipping her frozen tea, muttered, "Still not crying. Just iced."
Lil Eve, emotionally compromised, hugged Keldeo, while Keldeo saluted toward the sky.
Even Regigigas' tablet loop paused to display a single teardrop emoji.

And just like that, chaos and heart carried on. Because the immortal saga never ends, it just evolves.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 33: Dual Boss Rush Hall Mk-II

Scene: The Boss Rush Hall – Neo-Evoir Sector

Inside the Boss Rush Memorial Hall, formerly maintained by the long-gone Ghostvee, Lil Eve and Keldeo stepped through neon gates.
They were invited by Heatranvee, a heat-forged Eeveelution hybrid in a tanktop and pixel scarf, eyes gleaming with fanboy energy.

“You two are legends. I grew up watching EveX Kelzero. Please… bless this hall with one more run.”

The duo exchanged a nod and entered. As the doors sealed behind them, the Regigigas Illusion’s aura no longer mirrored the real one, but the challenge still grew heavier.

-

The Original 8 Illusion Battles:
1. Leafeon (Lil Eve’s Maternal Grandfather) –
Lil Eve danced around piranha plant minions with Flamethrower Trail and Frost Print, while Keldeo combo’d Poison Jab + Bug Sting + Dashing Upward Strike to land clean hits midair.

2. Vaporeon (Lil Eve’s Immortal Mother) –
Keldeo calmly tanked water blasts while Lil Eve launched Grassy Vines and a well-timed Electro Drift to short-circuit the illusion inside a flooded arena.

3. Flareon (Lil Eve’s Immortal Father) –
Lil Eve used Surfing Waterfall to nullify flames; Keldeo switched into Stone Edge Mode, hammering through fire walls with Ground Slam for stun-and-smackdown cycles.

4. Glaceon (Lil Eve’s Maternal Grandma) –
Lil Eve’s Flamethrower Trail melted through icy hail, while Keldeo juggle-swapped between Stone Edge, Slash & Shield, and Knuckle Mode, the illusion shattered in a frostburn.

5. Sylveon (Lil Eve’s Old Teacher) –
Lil Eve stood her ground as a tank while Keldeo chewed through defenses using Slash & Shield Mode and Poison Jab. Easy clear, emotionally confusing.

6. Umbreon (Lil Eve’s Paternal Grandpa) –
Lil Eve illuminated the arena with Dazzling Gleam, stunning the illusion; Keldeo capitalized with Bug Sting + Knuckle Mode while the darkness was down.

7. Espeon (Lil Eve’s Paternal Grandma) –
Keldeo Bug Sting-dashed through psychic waves, setting up Lil Eve’s precise Pulsive Foul Play, a shadowy slap of divine disrespect.

8. Jolteon (Lil Eve’s Family Friend) –
Keldeo went full-on Ground Slam, smashing through electric bursts while Lil Eve served as projectile distraction bait, high voltage teamwork.

-

The Newer 8 Illusion Battles:
1. Poisonvee –
Lil Eve cleared toxic clouds with Psybeam Focus, enabling Keldeo to Ground Slam the gunk out of the illusion.

2. Bugvee –
Duo-style takedown with Flamethrower Trail + Dashing Upward Strike, then Stone Edge Mode. Bug fried.

3. Flyvee –
Keldeo grounded it with Stone Edge Mode, Lil Eve followed up with Electro Drift and a Frost Print icicle anvil. Wings clipped.

4. Fightvee –
Keldeo air-countered with Dashing Upward Strike, Lil Eve stunned with Psybeam Focus, then nuked with Dazzling Gleam.

5. Groundvee –
Keldeo tanked the quakes while Lil Eve went element overload with Surfing Waterfall, Grassy Vines, and Frost Print until the floor cracked under the illusion.

6. Rockvee –
Lil Eve softened it with Surfing Waterfall and Grassy Vines combos, and Keldeo went Full Combo Mode: Slash & Shield Mode + Knuckle Mode + Ground Slam. The illusion fossilized itself out of fear.

7. Steelvee –
Lil Eve's Flamethrower Trail burned bright, Keldeo’s Knuckle Mode and Ground Slam dented the armor, easy melt.

8. Dragonvee –
Keldeo unleashed Claw Mode for a dragon duel while Lil Eve supported with Dazzling Gleam and defensive Frost Print walls. The illusion snarled and fizzled.

-

Final Boss Room – Regigigas’ Illusion:
Each of them activated their eight signature modes in sequence, syncing their strikes.
Keldeo’s Knuckle Mode dealt the final blow, cracking the illusion’s mask.

Heatranvee applauded wildly and ran in with an art book full of co-op boss designs, fan theories, and romantic alt endings for EveX Kelzero. Lil Eve politely refused to read the shipping section.

-

Exit Scene – Trouble Outside:
Outside, chaos struck again:
A female Ground/Rock Galaxian Onix had coiled Flareon hostage, declaring:

“Your butler aura belongs to me now, maid-furball be damned.”

Vaporeon tried to intervene but got caught by Electric-Grass vines from a smug male Cosmician Serperior, who slithered close and smirked:

“Hey cutie maid, did you know that in terms of...”

FWOOSH.
Lil Eve’s Flamethrower Trail incinerated the line, and the vines.

Vaporeon splashed free with Surf, hitting both the Onix and her own husband.
Flareon, soaked but unfazed, looked up starry-eyed:

“You saved me... again.”

She bridal-carried him effortlessly.

“Always, my little flame biscuit.”

Cue long kiss while still mid-carry.

Keldeo, already restraining the two former villains in pixel cuffs, offered:

“Instead of flirting with someone else's immortal parents... how about making a game with us instead? Time’s too precious to waste on thirst.”

The Onix and Serperior nodded sheepishly. The group moved on, Flareon still carried in Vaporeon’s arms, still blushing.

Lil Eve sighed, “I swear my parents are the main couple sometimes…”

Keldeo replied, “Let them have their romcom. Ours is the boss rush genre.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 34: Absurd Math Years Logic

Scene: HydroPyro Café, Retro Media Room

Lil Eve inserts a dusty old holo-tape into the Chronoscene Player. The screen flickers to life with a grainy, sepia-toned recording marked “2 BILLION-ISH YEARS AGO - Pokeplanet.”

-

[Flashback begins]

A five-year-old Lil Eve sits cross-legged in a wildflower meadow, holding up eight colorful cards shaped like evolution stones. Nearby, a cheerful Pikachu and a laid-back Absol (with a goofy grin) hand her each card one by one.

Lil Eve (young):
“Mommy Watervee!” She waves the blue card proudly.

Pikachu (snickering):
“She nailed it! That’s 10/10 waterbaby energy.”

Lil Eve:
“Daddy Firevee!”

Absol:
“Pfft, Firevee? That’s still better than some other usernames as MysticFlame69 from Mystic Vales Chronicles, HA!” He nearly chokes laughing.

Off-camera, a faint Flareon groan is heard.

Lil Eve:
“Uncle Electricvee!”

Pikachu (whispers):
“Not even blood-related, by the way.” Absol thumbs-up.

Lil Eve:
“Teacher Fairyvee! She teaches my pre-battle naps!”

Lil Eve (pointing to the rest):
“Grandpa Darkvee... Grandma Psychicvee... Grandpa Grassvee... Grandma Icevee!”

[Flashback ends with a taped giggle from Lil Eve, screen freezes mid-laugh.]

-

Scene: Present day, HydroPyro Café

Vaporeon and Flareon walk in just as the recording pauses. Both stare at the screen for a moment, then burst out laughing.

Flareon:
“Oh nooo, not Firevee again! I thought we buried that cringe back in Mystic Vales!”

Vaporeon:
“I always thought it was cute. Honestly, I fell in love with Firevee before I met the Flareon.” She winks.

Flareon blushes under his fur, and Lil Eve just smiles, eyes misty with playful warmth.

Lil Eve:
“Good thing I kept the tape. Some memories are worth the immortality.”

Vaporeon (softly, after laughing):
“Pikachu would’ve loved this memory… That little shock-rat always knew how to time a punchline.”

And then Lil Eve replies:

Lil Eve:
“He still does, in my replays.”

-

[Scene: Neo-Evoir, Immortals’ Lounge. Holograms flicker, graphs spin, and pie charts (literal pies) rotate in mid-air.]

Alolan Ninetales:
"Let’s calculate exactly how long it’s been since saga 1. Because I’m bored, and numbers make me feel better about cosmic abandonment trauma."

[She conjures a glowing abacus-shaped AI screen and starts tapping with her tails.]

- 13.2 years (Tyranitar's first murder against Rayquasa to Flareon’s high school era)

- 0.7 years (the rest of the Saga 1 duration)

- 1.1 years (gap between Saga 2 and 3)

- 13.7 years (gap between Saga 3 and 4 with womb-based decimal adjustment)

- 1,006,669 years (farewell to mortals on Pokeplanet)

- 2,003,565,250.28 years (galactic sleep therapy, and Vaporeon carried Flareon in stasis bridal-style the most of the time)

- 274.72 years (Keldeo, Lil Eve, Regigigas Death Loop Tablet separation arc)

- 69 years (lava bath for Death Loop Tablet on planet 934-RX)

- 69 years (flashback reflection on beacon from Saga 4.X)

- 69 years (Erosbloom-89 romance observation arc)

- 69 years (terraformation process for Evoir)

- 6,969 years (current time since Evoir’s new age)

[She slams the total into the air dramatically.]

Alolan Ninetales:
“2,004,573,522.7 years.
Or, if you want it hot and spicy: 2.0045735227 × 10⁹ years."

[She spins the hologram, zooms in on the “69” sequence, adds unnecessary sparkle effects.]

Alolan Ninetales (grinning):
"Nice."

Gardevoir (rubbing temples):
"Also… did you know one Evoir year is exactly 1.00069 Pokeplanet years? Coincidence? I think not."

[Cut to: Regigigas in Death Loop Tablet buried waist-deep in steaming π-shaped pies, with a ‘Do Not Eat – Toxic Filling’ sign barely visible. He’s too slow to escape.]

Regigigas (muffled):
"I regret… nothing. This is what I deserve for trying to divide by zero…”

Vaporeon (offscreen):
“Don’t worry, he’ll respawn. Eventually.”

Flareon (bridal carried as usual):
"As long as it’s after pie time."

-

[Scene: Regigigas Death Loop Tablet Core Chamber – a quiet, glitchy stasis void where time moves weird and feelings echo like haunted pianos.]

[The screen displays in cold, glitchy neon:
2096427299.6669 years remaining...]

Regigigas (in a heavy, digital voice from within):
"...Still more than two billion years... again..."

[A projection of the countdown flickers in the background like an eternal clock with a passive-aggressive attitude. The number had dropped only microscopically. Alolan Ninetales squints.]

Alolan Ninetales (tilting head, amused):
"Huh. Looks... the same. But not. It’s technically less. Like you shaved a single molecule off a cosmic glacier."

[She licks a paw, walks off unbothered.]

Regigigas:
"...Please unplug me."

[Gardevoir floats gently into view. Her steps are slow, her glow soft like moonlight on moss. She sits beside the Death Loop Terminal and opens a small, immaterial book titled “Bedtime Tales for the Eternally Trapped.”]

Gardevoir:
"Alright, big guy. Story time. Just one more story. For the next few million ticks."

[She adjusts her psychic voice to a soothing frequency. The chamber hums quietly. Pies bubble in a corner.]

Gardevoir:
"Once upon a time... there was a Titan who tried to punch time itself. But time punched back. So his immortal friends, who were all weirdly hot, overpowered, and emotionally unavailable, decided to keep him sane. With bedtime stories, pies, and cosmic math jokes. The end."

Regigigas (quietly):
"...Can you tell it again, but slower?"

Gardevoir (smiling softly):
"Of course. We’ve got time."

[Camera pans out. The counter still ticks. The pies still bubble. Somewhere far away, Vaporeon and Flareon are probably still kissing. Everything’s fine... for now.]

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 35: Lunatic Danmaku Maid and Fairy

[Scene: Neo-Evoir – Retro Gaming Room #6969F, dim neon lights and digital cherry blossoms falling from above. A sleek console hums. The screen blazes with fast-moving bullets and magical explosions. It’s Dragonlet: Lunatic Spark – a spiritual spinoff from Dragonvee’s legendary legacy.]

Dragonvee (stretching, still in maid uniform):
"...6890 years asleep and they still didn’t nerf Stage 4. Huh."
[She adjusts her frilly maid sleeves, picks up a controller.]
"Let’s see if my muscle memory still works after two eons and a half."

Alolan Ninetales (sipping glacial soda, tails swaying):
"I was the top-ranked ice fairy on Erosbloom servers for 4.2 centuries. Don’t test me, Knife Maid."

Dragonvee (deadpan):
"You still using 9 Ball Fairy Loadout? That was meta... like... 11 comets ago."

Alolan Ninetales (smugly):
"Because I am the meta."

[Game begins. Screen erupts in chaos. Dragonvee’s character throws elegant, arcane knives in spirals; Alolan Ninetales floods the screen with shimmering snowflake bullets and refracting lasers. Both are on Lunatic difficulty. Neither blinks.]

Dragonvee:
"I think I just tried to stop time again... but... nope. Just skipped three frames and stabbed a fairy."

Alolan Ninetales:
"Chronoskipping isn't timestopping, sweetie. That's called lag. You're the maid, not the admin."

[They both simultaneously dodge into a hyperbeam of flower bullets.]

Game Announcer (in sparkly, overly dramatic tone):
“DOUBLE GAME OVER. TRY AGAIN, ETERNAL LOSERS~!”

[Both stare at the screen. Then at each other. Then shrug.]

Dragonvee:
"...Still better than being asleep for 6000 years."

Alolan Ninetales:
"...Still better than being pieburied with Regigigas."

[They hit “Continue” and keep playing. The background music shifts into hyper-speed celestial jazz. On-screen, the stage boss is now a fairy holding a bazooka labeled “Canonically Balanced.”]

Dragonvee (grinning):
"Next run, I’m switching to dual blades and time illusions."

Alolan Ninetales:
"Next run, I’m enabling 9-tail hyper mode. Let’s make the devs cry."

[The screen lights up again. Their laughter echoes across the glowing halls of Neo-Evoir.]

-

[Scene continues from the Neo-Evoir gaming lounge, now dimmed into a purple-glow chill mode. The console's idle screen begins autoplaying fan-submitted content. Alolan Ninetales reaches for the remote with a flick of a tail.]

Alolan Ninetales (grinning, tails fluttering with pride):
“Ohoho~ What do we have here? Look, someone made a full Dragonlet parody video... starring me.”
[She clicks it open. Title: KyukonMiru ~ Strongest Freeze in the Void of Logic. The thumbnail is a sparkly, over-edited image of Alolan Ninetales doing Cirno-style peace signs.]

Dragonvee (smirking):
"You actually got a fairycore remix with your Japanese name as the punchline. I didn’t think they'd go that far."

[On-screen: KyukonMiru flies across absurd bullet patterns, yelling random ice math, voice pitched like a corrupted Vocaloid. Background voiceover screams, “SAYONARA, TEMPERATURE LAWS!”]

Alolan Ninetales (glowing with smugness):
"See? Only the strongest get mocked this epically. I am officially canon meme-tier."

Dragonvee (shrugs, then pulls up another tab):
"Yeah? But I got this..."
[Clicks on a fan music remix titled Claws of Claws, a high-octane, guitar-driven bullet hell remix parodying Knights of Nights. Dragonvee’s sprite art dances in-sync, with glitched time distortions and knife trails.]

*[Heavy distorted vocals kick in: “She doesn’t stop time, she slices through it!”]

Dragonvee (headbanging):
"Now this is legacy. Look at that fan-edited skip-dash cancel frame."

Alolan Ninetales (eyes sparkling):
"...Okay, that bass drop at 2:42 is illegal."

[Both of them sit back, tails and wings fluttering to the beat. Fan chat overlays flood the screen: “KYUKONMIRU SWEEP” “KNIFE MAID FOREVER” “When’s the collab boss fight???” “They’re both our queens.”]

Dragonvee:
"Honestly? These fans make better hype than the dev trailers."

Alolan Ninetales:
"And more lore-consistent, too. Except when they made me melt in Stage 6 to a heat lamp."

Dragonvee:
"Fair. You do canonically lose to a microwave."

[They both burst into laughter. The video ends with pixel sprites of both dancing together, accidentally dodging bullets to the beat.]

Alolan Ninetales:
"Next patch, we mod in ourselves. And KyukonMiru gets a secret EX stage."

Dragonvee (grinning):
"And I’ll finally get my timestop back... in name only."

[They high-five with paw and claw, vibing like ancient legends watching their mythos morph into meme culture.]

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 36 : Centaurs District

[Scene shifts from neon-lit game lounge back to the terraformed valley fields of Evoir.]

[Lil Eve, in sparkly battle-worn seifuku, glides gracefully with Keldeo in her arms bridal-style, his gakuran dusty slightly from earlier battles, but still glittering with magical boy energy.]

Lil Eve (smiling, with mock shoujo sparkle voice):
"Keldeo~ my precious stallion prince~ you've fainted again, haven't you~?"

Keldeo (blushing, arms crossed but clearly enjoying it):
"H-Hey! I could’ve stood up... eventually... just figured I’d let you have the moment, y’know..."

[As they land, Lil Eve pauses mid-step, eyes wide.]

Lil Eve (tilting her head):
"Wait... are those... our descendants?"

[Pan over: an open biome where multitudes of elegant equine beings run across the landscape like surreal herds of elemental pride.]

- Psychic Rapidash Centaurs: Gracefully galloping in midair, each with upper bodies resembling Gardevoirs or Gallades, long psychic manes flowing like galaxies, holding psychic parasols or ancient tomes.

- Electric Gastriers: Sleek, neon-striped equines with tsundere expressions, flicking tails like static-charged whips, one snarling, "It’s not like I wanted to graze next to you, b-baka Grass boy!"

- A timid Grass Rapidash, nervously braiding wildflowers into his own mane, whispering, “I think your electricity is beautiful...” while the tsundere one turns even more flustered.

Keldeo (in wide-eyed awe and confusion):
"...So... this is the legacy we left?"

Lil Eve (half-proud, half-concerned):
"Yep... they’ve inherited our beauty, our power... and our cringe. It’s beautiful and deeply cursed."

[One of the Psychic Centaurs notices Lil Eve and bows mid-air, glowing mane swirling like a halo.]

Psychic Centaur:
"Matriarch Lil Eve. Sire Keldeo. We thank you for the spark of eternity."

Electric Gastrier (still tsundere, glancing away):
"Y-Yeah whatever. Not like you made us on purpose or anything!"

Grass Rapidash (softly, like a shy prince):
"...We made flower crowns for our ancestors. Want one?"

[Lil Eve and Keldeo glance at each other. Keldeo shrugs.]

Keldeo:
"Guess being immortal’s weird and wholesome."

Lil Eve (holding him closer):
"And that's why I’m still the one carrying this relationship."

[Both laugh as the wind carries the sound of hooves, psionic whispers, and awkward elemental flirting across the plains.]

-

[Scene continues on the dreamy plains of Evoir, wind swirling with pollen and psionic sparkles.]

[Gardevoir arrives, gracefully floating in from a warp blossom she opened behind a hill, holding a serene teacup like nothing’s changed in two billion years.]

Gardevoir (smiling gently):
“My, my... what do we have here? Psychic Rapidash Centaurs with my facial structure? And Keldeo’s legs? This is quite the recombinant soup.”

[Lil Eve chuckles and lowers Keldeo gently beside Gardevoir like a princess tucking in a younger brother next to their cool older aunt.]

Lil Eve (grinning, dramatic anime hand-on-hip pose):
“Welp, guess that makes them... cousins-in-law?”

Sudden silence.

Keldeo and Gardevoir glance at each other.

Then: all three burst into a volcanic, undignified laugh.

Gardevoir (wheezing between giggles):
“C-cousins-in-law?? What does that even, why would that even, ”

Keldeo (on his back now, kicking the grass):
“Do we send them cousin-in-law cards?! Like, Happy Cousin-Union Day?!”

Lil Eve (doubled over, tears in her eyes):
“This is what happens when you let immortals intermix elements and genetics without a chart!”

**[Even the Psychic Centaurs pause their solemn floating to glance at each other, confused. One scribbles ‘cousin-in-law’ on a floating scroll labeled Genealogical Nonsense.]

Electric Gastrier (blinking, tail crackling):
“Wait what?? We’re... what now??”

Grass Rapidash (softly, still braiding):
"...I don’t mind if it means we’re family..."

[That just makes Lil Eve and Gardevoir laugh harder, and Keldeo faceplants back into the grass, totally done.]

-

[Cut to: The Regigigas Death Loop Tablet, glowing ominously in the grass beside the trio.]

[Inside the tablet: a horrific but absurdly slapstick scene.]

Regigigas (in slow-mo, voice echoing in agony):
“NoooOOooOoo... not the hoooOOooves agaaaAAiinnn...”

[He’s mid-slam, trampled by a horde of illusion-generated equines, some majestic, some clearly exaggerated OCs.

A Gallade illusion rides a flaming Rapidash illusion, brandishing a glowing greatsword like a Fire Emblem boss. The blade arcs down in divine slow motion, slicing across the screen dramatically as Regigigas flails in the loop.]

[Lil Eve just glances at it, completely unfazed.]

Lil Eve (shrugging):
“Well, we did tell him not to try conquering the Equestrian Bloom again...”

[Then, without hesitation, she turns and kisses Keldeo deeply, sparkles and magical-girl afterglow flooding the scene as if the background war crimes weren’t happening.]

Keldeo (still breathless):
“Do you hear something?”

Lil Eve:
“Only the sound of a very overdue smooch.”

[Gardevoir, now sipping her tea with one raised eyebrow, watches the equine war on the tablet escalate with a sigh.]

Gardevoir:
“I think it’s time this tablet went somewhere far, far away from... whatever this district has become.”

[She lifts it telekinetically, turning away with a flat expression as Regigigas’ voice echoes from the tablet.]

Regigigas (muffled, pleading):
“Tell the centaurs I surrender! I’ll change my stance on universal horse rights!!”

[The tablet dims a little in shame as Gardevoir silently floats off toward a more neutral, non-equine region, maybe the Aquatic-Plant-Psychic Heritage Archive.]

-

[Scene shift: Near the outer edge of the Equine District, where glowing crystalline structures resembling stables shimmer with neon runoff.]

[A tall alien stallion, vaguely resembling Grastrier in structure but with sleeker armor-like plating and celestial markings, approaches alongside his Spectrier-like mare sister, who floats slightly off the ground, ghostly and composed.]

Alien Stallion (in a low, regal tone):
“I am seeking kindred equines... perhaps ones of shared spirit and spark.”

[Dragonvee, still stylishly disheveled from earlier Touhou-esque antics, her maid outfit slightly charred, slithers up in her serpentine-draconic gait, resting her chin in one claw.]

Dragonvee (slyly):
“Oh? You’re looking for mares? Or… are you open to dragons with taste?”

[The stallion blinks slowly. The Spectrier-like mare rolls her ghostly eyes and gestures with her nose toward a glowing ridge where a herd of Zebstrika variants grazes, a mix of Electric, Water, and Fairy types, their manes like flickering neon lightning.]

Spectrier-Mare (deadpan):
“There. Mares. Knock yourself out.”

[But Dragonvee, unphased, circles behind the mare with a mischievous glint.]

Dragonvee:
“Thanks, but why chase the herd when the exotic ghost sister glows this bright? You’re clearly the rare drop.”

[The Spectrier-mare flushes slightly, flickering with static. She huffs but doesn’t retreat. The stallion just lets out a low sigh, half amused.]

Alolan Ninetales (leaning against a wall, sipping ice soda):
“Bisexuality is the baseline setting in the Dragonlet fandom. Honestly, the lesbian ships outnumber the rest three to one.”

[She flips open a fan-zine titled Glacial Vows & Scaled Desires, showcasing top pairings from the fandom, 90% of them sapphic.]

Dragonvee (grinning):
“See? I’m just on-brand.”

[The scene closes with the stallion walking toward the Zebstrikas, the mare hesitantly following... and Dragonvee strolling alongside both of them like she’s already joined their quest for “equine kin.”]

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 37 : Under the Sea, The not-so Little Vapor

At the massive Evoirian Café Pool, where alien fishes shimmered beneath crystalline water and evolved Cosmician Vesula darted around in schools, the atmosphere was tranquil, at least until Flareon climbed aboard a small wooden fishing boat.

A few Cosmician Persians, elegant and aloof, cast their lines nearby, hoping to lure rare catches. Flareon, ever the enthusiast, tried his paw at fishing too… but being a Fire-type, he accidentally ignited the edge of the boat.

"Ah, whoops."
Before he could react, the flames spread, and the boat hissed into collapse.

From the pool's edge, Vaporeon had been watching, soaking in the view, until she dove straight in with a powerful tail splash. She swam like a torpedo, elegant and unhesitating, and reached him just as the boat gave out. In seconds, she had him bridal-carried, soaked but unharmed, while startled fish scattered below.

"That’s the third time this month, Flareon."
"Fourth, technically..." he mumbled, half-embarrassed, half-adoring her.

Perched nearby, a rare female Evoirian Rapidash (Fire/Water), with a fiery mane that danced like lava and water-veiled hooves that steamed on contact, watched the whole rescue and wheezed in delight.

"I have to direct this!" she declared. "It’s a mermaid romance movie waiting to happen!"

Vaporeon raised a brow.
"Fine, but no tired copypasta. And the prince is a firey cook who keeps setting things on fire."

"And the mermaid always rescues him?" the Rapidash smirked.

"Exactly."

Flareon, still in her arms, just gave a sheepish grin.
"Guess that makes me the damsel again."

They all laughed, as bubbles drifted to the surface and the fish cautiously returned to their curious patrols.

-

Title: "Tides of Flame: The Vaporeon & Flareon Romance"
A tale of forbidden love, elemental legacy, and the clash of land and sea.

-

ACT I – The Water Dome

Princess Vaporeon, daughter of King Leafeon and Queen Glaceon, lives beneath the ocean in a shimmering Water Dome City, a sanctuary for those who cannot bear the heat. Her parents, noble rulers of the aquatic realm, strictly forbid her from interacting with Fire-types, especially after witnessing what the dry world did to their own lands long ago.

But Vaporeon, playful and headstrong, always wondered about warmth… and why her heart fluttered every time she imagined the surface.

-

ACT II – The Prince on the Boat

On the other side of the continent, Prince Flareon, heir to King Umbreon and Queen Espeon, sails across an ancient channel, on his way to a diplomatic summit. But a wild Gyarados, vengeful toward all land Pokémon, attacks his vessel. With no hope left, Flareon collapses into the sea.

From the depths, Vaporeon sees the chaos and leaps into action, rescuing him bridal style through swirling currents. He awakens on a quiet beach in her arms, listening to her song echo over the waves, before she vanishes, leaving him with only questions and awe.

-

ACT III – Surface Curiosity

Haunted by their meeting, Vaporeon returns to the surface to learn about land. Queen Glaceon faints when she learns her daughter is missing; King Leafeon charges to the upper world to find her. There, he is confronted by a cold-blooded foe: a strange female Ice-type Malamar, a deep-sea wanderer who freezes instead of hypnotizes.

She attempts to overfreeze King Leafeon as part of her deranged collection.

-

ACT IV – Clash & Change

As King Leafeon struggles, Prince Flareon rushes in with fire blazing, while Vaporeon, realizing her father is in danger, follows behind. The two royals fight together, but Malamar binds Flareon with cold chains and drags him into the sea.

He resists, breaking free, and blasts Malamar into the horizon.

Vaporeon lifts him again, bridal-style, and King Leafeon finally smiles.
“Not bad, kiddo. Just… don’t drown him.”

-

ACT V – New Empire, New Flame

Prince Flareon and Princess Vaporeon marry and build a new empire on a volcanic island, surrounded by steam, coral, and balance. The tale ends joyously, but not without a final hint…

In the background, a Primarina Princess gasps silently, her voice stolen by that same Malamar, now plotting in deeper waters...

-

Behind the Scenes

Back in present-day Evoir, Evoirian Rapidash excitedly commissions artists, composers, and designers to animate the tale into a full-fledged movie. 
Vaporeon offers heartfelt tribute to her parents, Leafeon and Glaceon, remembering their cool wisdom and warm love. 
Flareon, while preparing spicy berry curry for the team, adds his tribute too, thanking Umbreon and Espeon, whose balance of night and light made him who he is.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 38: Surreal Erosbloom Poles Couples

Erosbloom-89: The North Pole Ruins

Beneath the frostbitten skies of Erosbloom-89’s northern pole lies a hidden ruin, a long-forgotten place where coins glitter like ice. Within its silent chambers, an immortal, muscular cheerleader woman stands tall, forever bridal-carrying her wimpy quarterback husband in her arms.

They have lived like this, locked in loving pose, for 2.1 billion years.

One day, Solarvee, a descendant of Rockvee and Solar Valiant, arrived. A Psychic/Rock-type explorer with a curious heart, she found the ancient couple and gently asked, “How old are you two?”

The cheerleader smiled. The quarterback’s soft hand reached up and patted Solarvee on the head.

“Old enough!” they replied.

-

The South Pole Discovery

Far across the planet, buried in the dark, arid crust of the southern pole, cold but windless, another pair slumbers in surreal stillness. Here, a muscular businessman stands unmoved, bridal-carrying his secretary wife, her glasses still perched on her nose, her pencil skirt undisturbed by time.

Discovered by Rock Fox Gallade, another descendant of the same lineage, their age was revealed through a brief conversation:
4 billion years. Forever frozen in a gesture of absolute dedication.

-

Gardevoir's Commentary

High above, observing through her spectral tether, Gardevoir blinked at the scenes in silence.

“…I’m not even going to ask...” she muttered to herself.

Turning to the audience, she folded her arms and sighed.

“They must’ve come from a parallel version of humanity. Maybe they were zapped mid-carry, maybe it was free will. Either way, they chose to stay like that forever.”

She hesitated, then smiled wryly.

“It’s ridiculous. Impossible. But maybe that’s the point. Eternal affection. Stupid, beautiful, silly love. Take comfort in it. Just… don’t overthink it.”

-

Interruption by Alolan Ninetales

Just as Gardevoir started to fade away, Alolan Ninetales scrolled the scene back, rewinding to the moment Solarvee got petted by the quarterback’s gentle hands.

“Show that again...” she said, smirking. “That’s the good part.”

And so, like everything else in this timeline, the absurd and heartfelt moment looped once more, unchanging, yet eternal.

-

Scene: Post-Mermaid Film – Reflector Room

After wrapping up their whimsical mermaid film, Vaporeon, still dressed in her elegant maid uniform, effortlessly bridal-carries her ever-loyal husband Flareon, clad in a crisp butler uniform, into the softly glowing Reflector Room.

The Reflector screen plays an odd, serene recording, the immortal muscular cheerleader woman and her wimpy quarterback husband, still frozen in that eternal bridal-carry pose, gently petting their descendant, Solarvee.

Both Vaporeon and Flareon pause mid-carry, watching in awe.

Vaporeon tilts her head with a grin. “So… how do we end up like that?”

Gardevoir, arms crossed and deadpan as ever, responds without hesitation.
“Don’t ask. Just enjoy.”

Flareon breathes out a quiet, “Phew…”

Vaporeon smirks. “Just joking.”

Alolan Ninetales, flipping lazily through Reflector recordings, adds with a smirk,
“That level of stuck is for one-shot weirdos. Too insane for us mains. But hey… that kind of lovey-dovey peace? Kind of beautiful in its simplicity.”

They all share a small laugh, mid-carry moment still intact, letting the surreal comfort of it wash over them.

-

Still in her elegant maid uniform, Vaporeon glides gracefully through the scene, cradling her ever-dutiful butler husband Flareon in a perfect bridal carry. 

Together, they approach the glowing Reflector screen, where the bizarre yet tender image unfolds: a towering immortal cheerleader forever carrying her wimpy quarterback husband gently petting their descendant, Solarvee, as if she were a beloved family cat. The scene is surreal, serene, and strangely wholesome.

Alolan Ninetales, lounging nearby with a tropical drink in paw and a fan flicking lazily, casts a sly glance toward Gardevoir. 
“So… does this make you a cousin-in-law now, dear Gardevoir? Courtesy of Solarvee’s ever-branching lovevine?”

Vaporeon pauses mid-step, lifting a brow. Gardevoir tilts her head elegantly.

And in perfect harmony, maid and guardian, elegance and wisdom, they answer in sync, voices calm and knowingly exasperated:

“Don’t ask. Just enjoy the unhinged family tree.”

Still nestled in Vaporeon’s arms, Flareon exhales a long sigh of comic relief. 
“Thank Arceus. I was this close to mapping it out.”

“Too late!” hums Alolan Ninetales, flicking open a shimmering holographic chart. The genealogy is a spiraling mess of heart-shaped nodes, cosmic question marks, and a few firework emojis. Somewhere in the corner, the words ‘Love Knows No Logic’ flash gently in pastel pink.

They all stare. Then they all shrug. And then they burst into laughter.

Because on Erosbloom-89, this isn’t unusual.

This is just a perfectly ordinary, beautifully absurd day.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 39 : Scammers be Damned

Neo-Evoir had long stood as a true utopia, a rare sanctuary in the universe. Here, there were no existential crises, no gambling economies, and no survival grind. Civilization thrived on compassion, understanding, and psychically instilled ethics.

Crimes were rare, and most were of a sensual nature. Thankfully, they were manageable. Gardevoir, the matron guardian of Evoir, personally trained the planet’s peacekeepers. Female officers were taught to help civilians manage and redirect their desires with care and empathy. Male officers were taught to protect, defend, and, when necessary... use proper protection.

Alien forces had tried time and again to disrupt this peace, attempting to inject gacha addictions, MLM cults, or scammy social engineering tactics. But all failed. Gardevoir’s security grid, powered by her descendants and reinforced by layers of psychic misdirection, kept the world hidden from those with corrupt intent. Only visitors with verified VISAs and a certified "gamble-free" spacecraft could cross the psychic barrier that shielded the orbit.

Even in deep space, the pressure of gentle psychic judgment was enough to make most malicious captains turn back.

-

Scene shift – Café Observatory, late evening.

Alolan Ninetales leaned back on a velvet cushion, scrolling through the security logs projected in midair. With a small, smug grin, she clapped softly.
“Yay~ no gambles again this season. Good job, security grid.”

Across from her, Lil Eve and Keldeo casually opened a Reflector reel ,  one of the cautionary archives.

The screen flickered to life.

A quiet tape, grayscale with piano ambiance, showed a younger Absol. He had fallen victim to a golden-tongued Rayquaza’s “investment pitch.” Scammed. Penniless. Working under a dispassionate Tyranitar in a waifu-stealing pursuit.
No dialogue. Just mood. Just shame.

A subtle reminder: utopias are maintained by learning from the failures of other worlds.

-

Scene shift – Outer orbit, moments later.

A cloaked alien vessel blinked into the system. Roughly four lifeforms on board. Their ship emitted subtle pheromonal frequencies and data packets loaded with gacha hooks and MLM recruitment templates. Their ship had been chased from five systems already, and Neo-Evoir was their last desperate target.

They activated dark cloaking. Set course for low orbit. Dropped speed. No planetary defense response.

“Easy target,” one muttered.

They didn’t know the real Neo-Evoir lay beneath veils of decoy cities.
They didn’t realize the inviting lights below were projections.
They had no idea Gardevoir herself had redirected them, directly into a simulation city made of mannequins, empty shells, and unbreakable psychic drills.

-

Scene – The Hollow Metropolis, Sector Mirage, Neo-Evoir.

Beneath the simulated skyline of a city that didn’t exist, four figures materialized, bold, confident, and clueless.

They strutted into the empty streets with zero suspicion, unaware every building was a psychic hologram, every citizen a mannequin with only two expressions: "interested" and "too polite to escape."

They were from NFT777 – Enefftia, a planet known for its capitalistic lunacy and genetic theft. 3,777 years ago, their drones had stolen Pokémon DNA from the ancient timelines of Poketopia, mutating their own kind into "Enefftians", twisted, slick, and synthetic.

- Enefftian Emboar (male, Fire/Dark), the Sales Pitch Guru. Every word he spoke ended in a discount.
- Enefftian Arcanine (male, Electric/Psychic), the Horny Gacha Maker. Every eye contact was a lootbox invitation.
- Enefftian Jynx (female, Water/Fairy), the MLM Rep. Her hugs came with tiered subscriptions.
- Enefftian Infernape (male, Electric/Fighting), the NFT Crypto Bro. His entire vocabulary was "decentralized" gibberish.

Their first victim? A seemingly naïve Galaxian Mudsdale citizen.
They huddled around, fangs bared in smiles, energy oozing scam.

Arcanine smirked. “This one’s got ‘microtransaction sucker’ written all over his hooves.”
But as soon as he scanned the ‘citizen,’ his eyes flashed.
“Guys... uh... this is fake data. We’re in a decoy city.”

Silence.
The four looked up, the lights were too perfect. The roads, too symmetrical. The shadows… had no source.

Then came the second mistake.

Enefftian Infernape, oblivious and arrogant, spotted what he thought was a real bystander: a towering Galaxian Golurk (Ground/Fairy) in dark armor trimmed with fairy-light runes.
Big. Silent. Glowing.

Infernape grinned. “Yo bro! Ever heard of ChainBlitz NFT Dragons? Only 0.01 EtherMoonCoins to mint your stake and...”

CRUNCH.

One swing.
Flesh. Bone. Metal.
Infernape collapsed into the pavement, blood and wires spraying in a halo.
His eyes flickered, then dimmed. Permanently.

Jynx gasped. Arcanine froze.
But Emboar? He chuckled, pulling out a bottle.

“Hah! Rough crowd. Say, big guy, ever heard of thermal-optimized frying oil? One sip...”

CRACK.
Skull shattered.
Emboar joined his crypto comrade on the pavement, a sizzling mess of dark bacon.

-

Jynx and Arcanine screamed.
No more words. No more pitches.
Just pure survival.

They sprinted, barefoot on false streets, away from the massive Ground/Fairy Golurk, whose slow steps cracked reality beneath him.
The city's lights dimmed as the psychic simulation began collapsing around them, locking their escape routes, forcing them deeper into the trap.

Back at Command, Gardevoir observed calmly.

“Two down. Two running. Not bad.”

Alolan Ninetales, lounging beside her, exhaled.
“Mmm. Good riddance. Let the love planet stay scam-free.”

-

Scene – The Main City of Neo-Evoir

The two surviving Enefftians, Arcanine and Jynx, dashed into the core of the real city. But their alliance quickly fractured.

“You ditched me last scam, you walking dopamine slot machine!” Jynx snapped.

“Please, babe. It’s just business...”

“Exactly. You are the business I’m dropping.”

Jynx shoved Arcanine away and stalked off, vanishing into the crowded metallic alleys.

-

Jynx’s Fatal Mistake

She spotted a female Galaxian Persian, a sleek Poison/Steel hybrid from the Steelvee bloodline, dressed in metallic threads, calmly tapping into her neural pad.

“Gorgeous! Hey, I got this revolutionary water filter pyramid scheme with fairy essences. Perfect for queens like you...”

The Persian yawned. “Keep talking and I’ll kill you.”

Jynx grinned. “Empty threats don’t sell, honey.”

Fool.

The Persian blurred, and in one brutal motion, slammed Jynx into a side alley's industrial trash can. A SteelCraft badge shimmered on her collar.

“You’re garbage. And this is poetic.”

She whistled. The trash can clamped shut, shot down a rail, and landed inside a steel shredder laced with slow-burning poison gas.

No remains. No sequel.

-

Meanwhile, In the Park

Enefftian Arcanine spotted Lil Eve, calmly relaxing under an energy tree.

His instincts flared. Immortal? Bored? Perfect whale material.

He activated a pocket gacha machine beside her, projecting sparkly eggs with premium sounds and fake rates.

“Hey there, sweetheart. Want a chance at limited edition Porkymon waifus? First pull’s free...”

Lil Eve gave him a look that could rot diamonds.

“No.”

Keldeo trotted in, overheard just enough, and without a word, splashed the dog into the nearest fountain.

Arcanine snarled, then waited until Keldeo turned away and zapped him with a psychic shock, knocking him down. He fled before Lil Eve could retaliate ,  her Pulsive Foul Play slicing only air.

Lil Eve sighed. Carried Keldeo back to HQ.
Keldeo stood up seconds later. “I’m good.”
They shrugged and moved on.

-

Karma Catches Up

Not far away, Dragonvee was enjoying some quiet when the scam dog reappeared, trying to monetize candid shots of her into gacha assets.

“These’ll sell like hotcakes! Dragon royalty! Pay-per-pull! Limited edition...”

SMACK.

Dragonvee’s tail slap sent him flying into a vending machine.
“Pervert.”

Then came the crotch kick.

His entire body twitched. KO’d.

-

Later…

Gardevoir stood above the dazed Arcanine, who was strapped to a memory drain crystal.

“You’re the last one. Congratulations. You’ve won an all-expenses-paid exile.”

ZAP.

Memories of scams, NFTs, crypto, and gacha… gone.

He awoke on Erosbloom-89.
Surrounded by eternally cuddling immortal couples.
Some bridal carrying. Some stuck mid-hug. Some holding hands for 4 billion years straight.

He smiled. Then shivered.

Solar Valiant’s and Rockvee’s descendants were already staring at him like he was fresh chew toy.

“Good luck...” whispered Gardevoir through the monitor.

Fade to static.
Roll credits.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 40: Wonderland of The Vapor Mermaid

One Month Later…

A new immersive VR game swept through Neo-Evoir:
VR Wonderchat, a surreal simulation of dreams and cuteness with zero combat, full roleplay, and lots of tea parties.

Vaporeon, ever loyal to her maid persona, logged in with a gentle hum. Her avatar spawned on a floating glass platform in a map called “Cute Isekai.”

She blinked, now dressed in an elegant blue-and-white dress, frilled just like Alice in Wonderland. The ground cracked like mirror panes below her.

She fell, gracefully, through the glass sky.

-

Meanwhile…

Flareon, ever the butler and ever her husband, logged in right after. He appeared on a candy-colored hill at the bottom of the fall zone.

His attire? A virtual twist on the Mad Hatter, cravat, pocket watch, and teacup belt included.

He looked up.

Splat-glide-landing.
Vaporeon descended like a feather, following after some digital Bunnelbies through the air.

They saw each other.

“Oh, you look mad~” she giggled.

“And you look…wonderful.”

They hugged, of course. Then, naturally, Vaporeon bridal-carried him, again, even in VR.

-

Tea Party Time

A bizarre tea table stood beneath a willow made of candy strings. Flareon, still mid-carry, pointed with a smirk at the selection.

“Lava spice tea. Only safe for Fire types. The rest are watery fluff.”

They sipped, chatted, and ignored the glitchy pixel frog playing piano nearby.

After a while, they both smiled, nodded, and logged out.

-

Back to Reality

They blinked into their home hub room, still in maid and butler uniforms, real-world again.

Waiting was the elegant Evoirian Rapidash, the fiery mare who directed their earlier Mermaid Film.

She clapped her hooves with joy.

“Adorable. As always.”
Her mane swirled with cinematic sparkles.
“Also, great news. The Mermaid film’s almost finished. You two are cinematic perfection.”

Vaporeon and Flareon glanced at each other, still in posture from the bridal carry.

They chuckled softly.

Just another day of strange, sweet love in Neo-Evoir.

-

Then the movie plays...

Title: The Vapor Mermaid
as seen by Lil Eve and Keldeo in the premiere screening room

-

ACT I – The Water Dome

Beneath the shimmering oceans of Pokeplanet lies Water Dome City, a sapphire sanctuary crafted for Water-types who fled the sun-scorched lands long ago.
There lives Princess Vaporeon, the spirited daughter of King Leafeon and Queen Glaceon, noble rulers who forbid contact with Fire-types, fearful of what the dry world once did to their realm.

The city is protected by vigilant Guardians: Suicune, Blastoise, and Lapras, who repel would-be invaders and misguided land Pokémon trying to drown themselves for escape or curiosity.

Yet Vaporeon is restless. She dreams of warmth, of sunlit waves… of something more.

She chats with a wandering Cramorant, asking about life on land. He shrugs, mentions seafood menus, and waddles off. Unimpressed, Vaporeon sighs and swims away.

Soon after, she’s caught by Guardian Blastoise and her father.
King Leafeon, using his water-absorbent vines, grounds her on the spot.
Blastoise attempts to distract her with a jazzy song: a Pokéfied version of "Under the Sea" (Under the Seaweed), complete with warnings about sushi.

But Vaporeon's curiosity only deepens.

-

ACT II – The Prince on the Boat

Far above, Prince Flareon, son of King Umbreon and Queen Espeon, is caught in royal drama.
King Tyranitar, greedy and unstable, demands Espeon join his expanding harem.
Queen Tinkaton, Tyranitar’s confused and underappreciated wife, just shrugs.

Only Flareon’s tact and wit prevent war. With the issue defused (for now), he sets sail toward a diplomatic summit, carrying encrypted scrolls in a fireproof logbook.

But fate has other plans.

A wild Gyarados, enraged by past surface-world scars, attacks Flareon's ship. The vessel is torn apart.

Just before he drowns, a glowing figure emerges from the deep:
Princess Vaporeon, in her shimmering ocean gown, lifts him from the currents, bridal-style, and whisks him ashore.

He awakens on a sun-kissed beach, hearing only the echoes of her voice… before she vanishes.

-

ACT III – Surface Curiosity

Vaporeon can’t stop thinking about the prince.
Disguising her identity, she sneaks to the surface once more.

When Queen Glaceon hears her daughter is missing, she faints on the spot.
King Leafeon, with steam-resistant speed and vines of fury, charges toward the upper world, sensing her location.

There, he encounters a bizarre enemy:
A female Ice-type Malamar, a collector of frozen beings who freezes, not hypnotizes.

She encases King Leafeon in ice, claiming him for her collection.

Meanwhile, Flareon continues his diplomacy and convinces Queen Tinkaton to take a stand.

Tired of Tyranitar’s antics, she delivers a legendary hammer-slap that knocks some sense into him, de-escalating the political threat.

-

ACT IV – Clash & Change

Sensing her father’s danger, Vaporeon dashes into action.
She finds him half-frozen and begins thawing him with gentle water pulses.

At the same time, Flareon charges in, flames roaring, ready to help.

Together, the unlikely trio fends off the Malamar.
But she ensnares Flareon in cold psychic chains and drags him underwater.

With one last burst of willpower, he shatters the chains and blasts her into the abyss.

Weakened, he begins to sink…

Again, Vaporeon lifts him bridal-style, surfacing with triumph.

King Leafeon, dripping and impressed, finally cracks a smile.

“Not bad, fire kiddo.
Vaporeon, my dear… just don’t drown your husband.”

-

ACT V – New Flame, New Empire

One day later, a beachside wedding is held, half on sand, half in water.

King Leafeon and Queen Glaceon cheer from one side.
King Umbreon and Queen Espeon smile proudly from the other.
Both families rejoice in peace and alliance.

Prince Flareon, in a stylish wedding tuxedo, provides gourmet food.
Princess Vaporeon, radiant in her seashell-stitched dress, brings drinks and bubbly waves.

As the ceremony ends, she lifts him again, bridal-style, of course, and kisses him before the cheering crowd.

They build a new empire together on a volcanic island, a place of steam, coral, and harmony.

There, they welcome their daughter:
Lil Eve.

But far beneath, a silent ripple spreads…

A Primarina Princess, her voice stolen, watches from a cold abyss.
The same Malamar still lurks… plotting.

Watching from a crystal screen, Queen Galarian Rapidash narrows her eyes.

“Then we raise Keldeo well… and make sure no more mermaids lose their voices.”

-

Back to reality...

As the credits rolled with a soft orchestral remix of “Under the Seaweed” (complete with Galarian harmonica solos), the lights in the screening room slowly brightened.

Lil Eve was sitting in her floating beanbag chair, wearing her signature hoodie with a poké-pop in one hand and her tail lazily draped across the side. Her usually neutral eyes blinked once… twice… before she turned slowly toward Keldeo.

Lil Eve:
“…So. My parents are ocean theatre idols now.”
(she squints)
“And they just casually made me canon with a full kingdom arc backstory?”

Keldeo, perched next to her on a mossy futon, was still wide-eyed, a half-eaten seagrass cracker hanging from his mouth. He swallowed hard.

Keldeo:
“That was… way more romantic than I expected.
And also, wait, your mom lifted your dad like five times! Does she just do that?”

Lil Eve groaned, tugging her hood down over her head.

Lil Eve:
“She does. And she does it in public. And he loves it.”

Keldeo blinked.

Keldeo:
“…Honestly? Goals.”

Lil Eve paused. She stared. Then grunted.

Lil Eve:
“Don’t get any ideas, sea pony.”

Keldeo:
“No promises.”

They both turned back toward the credits just as a teaser flashed:
“Coming Soon: The Vapor Mermaid 2 – Voice of the Deep”
with a shadowy outline of the Primarina and Malamar drifting into view.

Keldeo’s ears perked up.

Keldeo:
“…I’m in the sequel, aren’t I?”

Lil Eve smirked.

Lil Eve:
“Oh, you are. And I’m not the one getting bridal-carried this time.”

Keldeo froze.

Keldeo:
“Wait. Wait hold on, Lil Eve, wait...”

She was already floating off, tail flicking behind her, humming the movie’s theme.

Lil Eve (deadpan):
“I need to buy a trident.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 41 : N Sanely Suffering for Entertainment

Inside the Death Loop Tablet – Level 89: "Boulders & Bathrooms"

The screen flickers on. Regigigas, that ancient titan of time, is mid-sprint in what looks suspiciously like a Crash Bandicoot-inspired gauntlet. A massive boulder barrels after him, roaring like it too had enough of slow-start abilities.

On-screen HUD:
“TNT COUNTDOWN: 3… 2… 1…”

BOOM.
Three TNT crates explode square into Regigigas’ face. He grunts, tumbles, stands, and immediately steps on a Nitro block.

KA-BOOM.
A dozen cubes detonate midair. His screen avatar gets flung ragdoll-style across the ruins of pixelated Johto, crashing into a fake bush labeled "Not a Secret."

Outside the tablet, sitting in a cushy SteelCraft stream booth, Cosmician Sandslash, a sleek Ground/Steel-type with cybernetic lenses and a sarcasm streak longer than his claws, is streaming live to tens of thousands of viewers.

Cosmician (laughing):
“Oh my Arceus, another TNT to the face! Bro’s doing an explode-to-win speedrun!”

The chat is flooded with emotes of “BOOM GIGAS” and “#ExplodeMyLegacy”.

Back in-game, Regigigas enters a bizarre glitchy "toilet dimension." It’s dim. Tile walls. Echoing drips. It looks like a lost level from a haunted parody game.

Suddenly, 

TNT crates spawn from the ceiling.

“WARNING: LAVATORY OVERTIME” flashes.

BOOOOOOM.

The screen cuts to black.
Sewage splatter.
Blood mist.
The words: “UNLOCKED: REGI-FLUSHED ENDING.”

Cosmician Sandslash stares blankly. His smile is gone.

Cosmician (slowly):
“…Okay, that was not rated E. Why was there blood in the toilet? Why did he scream like that? Why… why is the flush sound still echoing…?”

Chat freezes.
Then explodes with spam:

“NO WAY.”
“THE REGI GOT FLUSHED.”
“I’M CALLING MY MOM.”
“10/10 BEST ENDING.”

Cosmician leans back, one claw to his snout.

Cosmician:
“Okay I’m officially scared. Someone take the tablet away from me before he opens a bathroom DLC.”

-

Regigigas’ Tablet Realm – Aftermath of Level 89

Smoke hisses from the pixelated ruins of the toilet zone. Regigigas lies flattened in a puddle of blood, soap, and what may or may not be pixel sewage. But… he’s smiling.

Regigigas (muttering softly):
“Good… good… let them laugh. Let them all laugh… My penance shall be memes.”

The screen glitches momentarily as his soul resets into the next level, but his voice lingers, so faint yet so content.

Regigigas:
“If this humiliation brings joy… and atones for my... erasures… my war… my old mistakes… then yes. Explode me again.”

-

Outside – SteelCraft Livestream Booth

Cosmician Sandslash blinks at the camera. He’s paused mid-sip of branded SteelCraft Cola™. Slowly, he lowers the can.

Cosmician (half-laughing, half-nervous):
“…Wait. Is he... actually self-aware now?”

A brief cutaway shows a clip from weeks ago: Keldeo, giving an emotional testimony in an ethics class, telling Lil Eve about the time Regigigas accidentally erased an entire early civilization with a poorly-calculated tectonic push.

Keldeo (echoing):
“He didn’t mean to. He just… moved a continent without checking if anyone lived there.”

Cosmician nods, remembering that moment. He shakes his head slowly.

Cosmician (to chat):
“Okay, okay… I get it now. Regigigas ain’t just memeing for the LOLs… He’s doing time. His own weird, toilet-exploding, TNT-munching redemption arc.”

Chat is already spamming:

“#RedemptionGigas”
“RegiRepentance Speedrun%”
“He’s doing this... for US?”

Cosmician leans in with a grin.

Cosmician:
“Well, if the old titan wants to explode himself into forgiveness, who am I to stop him? Roll the next map, make it harder. Let’s see if he can survive Mecha Garchomp’s Strip Mall Gauntlet.”

He taps a button.

“Level 90 loading: Retail Rage.”

The stream continues. And somewhere deep inside the Death Loop Tablet, Regigigas stands again, TNT crates already spawning behind him, as he whispers:

“For the memes… for justice…”

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
